Maryland, session 2026, SB0283.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan of 2026 in the total principal amount of $1,824,782,000
$1,758,261,906 $1,839,940,406 $1,847,099,000. This loan shall be evidenced by the
issuance, sale, and delivery of State general obligation bonds authorized by a resolution of
the Board of Public Works and issued, sold, and delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117
through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(2) The bonds to evidence this loan or installments of this loan may be sold as a
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
single issue of bonds under § 8–122 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(3) The cash proceeds of the sale of the bonds shall be paid to the Treasurer and
first shall be applied to the payment of the expenses of issuing, selling, and delivering the
bonds, unless funds for this purpose are otherwise provided, and then shall be credited on
the books of the Comptroller and expended on approval by the Board of Public Works, for
the following public purposes, including any applicable architects’ and engineers’ fees:
EXECUTIVE DEPARTMENT – GOVERNOR
D25E03.02 INTERAGENCY COMMISSION ON SCHOOL
CONSTRUCTION
(A) Nancy K. Kopp Public School Facilities Priority Fund. Provide
grants to schools in accordance with § 5–326 of the Education
Article (Statewide) ....................................................................... 70,000,000
Provided that notwithstanding any other provision of law, this
authorization shall be allocated as follows:
(1) Senate–directed allocation ........................... 35,000,000
(2) House of Delegates–directed allocation ....... 35,000,000
(1) Anne Arundel County ................................... 3,000,000
(2) Baltimore City ............................................... 16,000,000
(3) Baltimore County .......................................... 5,000,000
(4) Frederick County ........................................... 5,000,000
(5) Howard County ............................................. 6,000,000
(6) Montgomery County ...................................... 15,000,000
(7) Prince George’s County ................................. 19,000,000
(8) All other jurisdictions ................................... 1,000,000
Further provided that these authorizations shall not be subject
to a local matching requirement.
(B) Public School Construction Program. Provide funds to
construct public school buildings and public school capital
improvements, including providing grants to local boards of
– 7 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
education for federal E–rate–eligible special construction such
as fiber and broadband infrastructure projects for
E–rate–eligible applicants in accordance with Title 5, Subtitle
3 of the Education Article (Statewide) ....................................... 300,000,000
(C) Senator James E. “Ed” DeGrange Nonpublic Aging Schools
Program. Provide funds to be distributed as grants to nonpublic
schools in Maryland for expenditures eligible under the Aging
Schools Program, including school security improvements.
Provided that grants may be provided only to nonpublic schools
eligible to receive Aid to Non–Public Schools R00A03.04 (for the
purchase of textbooks or computer hardware and software for
loans to students in eligible nonpublic schools) during the
2025–2026 school year or nonpublic schools that serve students
with disabilities through the Non–Public Placement Program
R00A02.07 Subprogram 0762, excluding preschools in fiscal
2027, with a maximum amount of $100,000 and a minimum
amount of $5,000 per eligible school.
Further provided that:
(a) Unless a school serves students through the
Non–Public Placement Program, an eligible school
may apply and qualify for a grant as specified below
based on the following criteria:
(1) At least 20% of the school’s
students are eligible for free
or reduced price meal
programs;
(2) Tuition charged to students
is less than the statewide
average per pupil
expenditure for public
schools as calculated by the
Maryland State Department
of Education; and
(3) The school has a facility with
an average age of 50 years or
more; and
(b) If a school meets:
(1) All three of the criteria
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
specified above, the school
may receive up to $100,000;
(2) Two of the three criteria
specified above, the school
may receive up to $75,000;
and
(3) One of the three criteria
specified above, the school
may receive up to $25,000.
Further provided that if more eligible schools apply and qualify
for grants than the total authorizations, the Maryland State
Department of Education shall prioritize awarding full grant
amounts to residential school applicants participating in the
Non–Public Placement Program and shall prorate the grants
for the remaining applicants based on the total remaining total
authorization amount. Further provided that the funds shall be
administered by the Maryland State Department of Education
and the Interagency Commission on School Construction.
Further provided that grants made to nonpublic schools shall
be expended within 3 years of the date that funding for the
grants became available. Any funding for grants that is
unexpended following 3 years of having become available shall
be transferred to the Unreserved Statewide Contingency
Account for public school construction. Further provided that
$1,000,000 $1,500,000 of this authorization may only be used to
provide a grant to the Woodbourne School (Statewide) ............. 3,500,000
5,000,000
(D) Supplemental Capital Grant Program for Local School
Systems. Provide funds to local school systems with enrollment
growth that over the last 5 years exceeds 150% of the statewide
average or with 250 or more relocatable classrooms. These
funds shall be administered in accordance with § 5–313 of the
Education Article and can be used for grants to local boards of
education for federal E–rate–eligible special construction such
as fiber and broadband infrastructure projects for
E–rate–eligible applicants. Notwithstanding any other
provision of law, for the first $60,000,000 of grants, funds
$4,500,000 of this authorization shall be allocated to the county
with the greatest percentage of enrollment growth above the
statewide average. Further provided that $57,500,000 shall be
allocated based on each eligible county board’s proportionate
share of the total full–time equivalent enrollment of the county
– 9 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
boards that are eligible to participate in the Program. Further
provided that, for the remaining grants, funds shall be
allocated based on each eligible county board’s proportionate
share of percentage of enrollment growth above the statewide
average percentage (Regional) .................................................... 80,000,000
DA02.01 DEPARTMENT OF DISABILITIES
(Statewide)
(A) Access Maryland. Provide funds to design and construct
architectural upgrades at State–owned facilities to improve
accessibility for persons with disabilities .................................... 1,124,000
DB01 HISTORIC ST. MARY’S CITY COMMISSION
(St. Mary’s County)
(A) Site Improvements. Provide funds to design, construct, and
equip infrastructure improvements in Historic St. Mary’s
City ............................................................................................... 925,000
(B) Visitor Center Conversion for Education and Artisan Centers.
Provide funds to continue design of renovations and expansion
of the visitor center at 18751 Hogaboom Lane and the adjacent
storage facility to create the Education Center and Artisan
Center Complex at Historic St. Mary’s City................................ 420,000
DE02.01 BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS
GENERAL STATE FACILITIES
(Statewide)
(A) Construction Contingency Fund. Provide funds for the
Construction Contingency Fund to be administered in
accordance with § 3–609 of the State Finance and Procurement
Article. Notwithstanding the fund balance restriction set forth
in § 3–609(c) of the State Finance and Procurement Article, an
appropriation to the Fund may cause the total balance in the
Fund to exceed 1.25% of the capital debt affordability limit as
determined under Title 8 of the State Finance and Procurement
Article in fiscal year 2027 ............................................................ 5,000,000
(B) Facilities Renewal Fund. Provide funds for the repair and
rehabilitation of State–owned capital facilities .......................... 59,666,000
JUDICIARY/MULTISERVICE CENTERS
(Anne Arundel County)
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
(E) New Supreme Court of Maryland Building. Provide funds to
continue construction and equipping of a new Supreme Court of
Maryland Building in Annapolis, provided that
notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue on
this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary to
complete this project .................................................................... 20,388,000
STATE GOVERNMENT CENTER – ANNAPOLIS
(Anne Arundel County)
(C) Louis L. Goldstein Treasury Building Renovation. Provide
funds to begin design of the Louis L. Goldstein Treasury
Building in Annapolis .................................................................. 2,060,000
(D) Wineland Building Renovation. Provide funds to begin design of
the Fred L. Wineland Building in Annapolis .............................. 281,000
(E) Revenue Administration Center – Individual Collections Unit
Suite Modernization. Provide funds to begin design of the
Revenue Administration Center – Individual Collections Unit
Suite Modernization in Annapolis ............................................... 175,000
350,000
MILITARY DEPARTMENT
DH01.04 MILITARY DEPARTMENT OPERATIONS AND
MAINTENANCE
(Washington County)
(A) New Hagerstown Vehicle Maintenance Shop. Provide funds to
begin design of a new Vehicle Maintenance Shop in
Hagerstown ................................................................................. 500,000
DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING
DW01.10 DIVISION OF HISTORICAL AND CULTURAL PROGRAMS
(Statewide)
(A) African American Heritage Preservation Grant Program.
Provide funds to the Maryland Historical Trust to assist in the
protection of properties with cultural and historic significance
to the African American community. The funds appropriated
for this purpose shall be administered in accordance with §
5A–330 of the State Finance and Procurement Article ............. 5,000,000
– 11 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(B) Historic Preservation Grant Fund. Provide funds to the
Maryland Historical Trust for historic preservation and
museum assistance. The funds appropriated for this purpose
shall be administered in accordance with §§ 5A–328 and
5A–353 through 5A–359 of the State Finance and Procurement
Article ........................................................................................... 1,000,000
1,035,000
Provided that $35,000 of this authorization may be used only to
provide grants as follows:
(1) Board of Directors of the Salem
United Methodist Church for
renovations, upgrades, and
infrastructure improvements at the
historic Salem United Methodist
Church in Brookeville (Montgomery
County) .............................................. 35,000
FB04 DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
(Statewide)
(A) Maryland FiRST Public Safety Radio System. Provide funds to
continue construction and installation of equipment for a
statewide unified public safety radio communications system .. 16,268,000
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
J00A01.05 WASHINGTON METROPOLITAN AREA TRANSIT –
CAPITAL
(Regional)
(A) Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority Upgrades.
Provide funds to construct improvements and capital
maintenance to bus and rail systems in the Washington, D.C.
area .............................................................................................. 167,000,000
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
KA05 CAPITAL GRANTS AND LOANS ADMINISTRATION
(Statewide)
(A) Community Parks and Playgrounds. Provide funds for grants
to local governments to design, construct, and equip
capital–eligible park and playground improvements ................ 5,000,000
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
(B) Natural Resources Development Fund. Provide funds to design,
construct, and equip capital development projects on
Department of Natural Resources’ property in accordance with
§ 5–903(g) of the Natural Resources Article. Funds may be
spent only on the projects listed under this program in the
Fiscal Year 2027 Capital Budget Volume or on prior or future
authorized projects ...................................................................... 804,000
0
500,000
(1) Janes Island State Park – New
Inclusive Playground (Somerset
County) .............................................. 500,000
(C) Program Open Space. Provide funds to make grants to local
jurisdictions for the purchase and development of recreational
facilities. Funds appropriated for local grants shall be
administered in accordance with §§ 5–905 and 5–906 of the
Natural Resources Article ........................................................... 49,775,000
0
(D) Rural Legacy Program. Provide funds for the purchase of
conservation easements and the acquisition of land. The funds
appropriated for this purpose shall be administered in
accordance with §§ 5–9A–01 through 5–9A–09 of the Natural
Resources Article ......................................................................... 13,400,000
0
KA14.01 CHESAPEAKE AND COASTAL SERVICE
(Statewide)
(A) Waterway Improvement Capital Projects. Provide funds to
finance projects that expand and improve recreational boating
throughout the State consistent with the State Boat Act. The
funds appropriated for this purpose shall be administered in
accordance with §§ 8–707 through 8–709 of the Natural
Resources Article. Funds may be spent only on the projects
listed under this program in the Fiscal Year 2027 Capital
Budget Volume or on prior or future authorized projects ......... 13,068,000
7,011,156
KA17.01 FISHING AND BOATING SERVICES
(Statewide)
(A) Oyster Restoration Program. Provide funds to design and
construct oyster habitat restoration projects ............................. 2,070,000
– 13 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
LA15 OFFICE OF RESOURCE CONSERVATION
(Statewide)
(A) Maryland Agricultural Cost–Share Program. Provide funds for
financial assistance for the implementation of best
management practices that reduce soil and nutrient runoff
from Maryland farms. The funds appropriated for this purpose
shall be administered in accordance with §§ 8–701 through
8–706 of the Agriculture Article ................................................. 8,000,000
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
MA01 OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY
(A) Community Health Facilities Grant Program. Provide grants
to acquire, design, construct, renovate, and equip community
mental health, addiction treatment, and developmental
disabilities facilities. The funds appropriated for this purpose
shall be administered in accordance with §§ 24–601 through
24–607 of the Health – General Article and in accordance with
Code of Maryland Regulations (COMAR) 05.05.09
(Statewide) .................................................................................... 10,000,000
(B) Demolish Decommissioned Buildings. Provide funds to
continue the design of the RICA – Baltimore Old Dormitory
Building demolition (Baltimore City) .......................................... 103,000
(C) Federally Qualified Health Centers Grant Program. Provide
grants to acquire, design, construct, renovate, and equip
buildings to be used as Federally Qualified Health Centers
(Statewide) .................................................................................... 3,500,000
ML10 CLIFTON T. PERKINS HOSPITAL CENTER
(Howard County)
(A) Renovation of Clifton T. Perkins Hospital North Wing. Provide
funds to continue construction and begin equipping of
renovations to the North Wing of Clifton T. Perkins Hospital
Center and an addition to the hospital, provided that
notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue on
this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary to
complete this project .................................................................... 12,363,000
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL
SERVICES
QR02.01 MARYLAND CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION –
HAGERSTOWN
(Washington County)
(A) MCI–H Perimeter Fence System Replacement. Provide funds
to begin design of the replacement perimeter fencing and
security systems at Maryland Correctional Institution –
Hagerstown .................................................................................. 1,155,000
QR02.03 ROXBURY CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION
(Washington County)
(A) RCI Perimeter Fence System Replacement. Provide funds to
continue construction of the replacement perimeter fencing and
security systems at Roxbury Correctional Institution, provided
that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue
on this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary
to complete this project ............................................................... 1,511,000
MARYLAND STATE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
RA11 MARYLAND STATE LIBRARY AGENCY
(Statewide)
(A) Public Library Capital Grant Program. Provide grants to
acquire land for, design, construct, and equip public library
facilities, provided that any reallocation of this authorization
or prior authorized funds for previously authorized or new
projects shall require notification to the General Assembly. The
funds appropriated for this purpose shall be administered in
accordance with § 23–509 of the Education Article ................... 12,775,000
UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND
RB21 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND, BALTIMORE CAMPUS
(Baltimore City)
(A) Central Electric Substation and Electrical Infrastructure
Upgrades. Provide funds to continue construction of an electric
substation and electrical infrastructure upgrades for the
University of Maryland, Baltimore Campus, provided that
notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue on
this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary to
– 15 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
complete this project .................................................................... 715,000
(B) New Dental Ambulatory Surgery Center. Provide funds to
complete construction and equipping of an ambulatory surgery
center at the Dental School .......................................................... 862,000
(C) New School of Social Work Building. Provide funds to complete
design, construction, and equipping of a new School of Social
Work ............................................................................................. 43,732,000
RB22 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND, COLLEGE PARK CAMPUS
(Prince George’s County)
(A) New Health and Human Sciences Complex. Provide funds to
continue construction of the Health and Human Sciences
Complex for the School of Public Health and Academy for
Innovation and Entrepreneurship, provided that
notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue on
this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary to
complete this project ................................................................... 29,315,000
(B) New Interdisciplinary Engineering Building – Zupnik Hall.
Provide funds to complete construction and equipping of the
interdisciplinary engineering building ....................................... 13,110,000
(C) Xfinity Center Roof Repair. Provide funds to design, construct,
and equip the Xfinity Center roof repair ..................................... 5,000,000
10,000,000
(D) Graduate Student Housing. Provide funds to acquire, design,
construct, and equip graduate student housing .......................... 3,000,000
5,000,000
RB23 BOWIE STATE UNIVERSITY
(Prince George’s County)
(A) New Thurgood Marshall Library and Academic Commons.
Provide funds to continue design of a new Library building and
Academic Commons ..................................................................... 4,802,000
(B) Boiler and Chiller Replacements. Provide funds to design,
construct, and equip the replacement of boilers, chillers, and
cooling units .................................................................................. 1,000,000
(C) Campus Safety and Security Upgrades. Provide funds to design,
construct, and equip campus safety and security upgrades ........ 500,000
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
(D) MARC Station Redevelopment. Provide funds to acquire,
design, construct, and equip infrastructure improvements for
the redevelopment of the area near the Bowie State MARC
Station ........................................................................................... 2,000,000
RB24 TOWSON UNIVERSITY
(Baltimore County)
(A) Central Plant Restoration. Provide funds for the design,
construction, repair, reconstruction, renovation, and equipping
of the restoration and upgrades to the Central Plant ................ 10,600,000
(B) Electrical Substation Expansion and Improvements. Provide
funds to begin design and construction of a new electrical
substation and renovation of an existing electrical substation .. 2,820,000
(C) Smith Hall Renovation and Reconstruction. Provide funds to
complete construction and equipping of the partial demolition,
renovation, and reconstruction of Smith Hall for the College of
Fine Arts and Communication ..................................................... 21,973,000
RB25 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND EASTERN SHORE
(Somerset County)
(A) New School of Veterinary Medicine and Health Professions.
Provide funds to design, construct, and equip the New School
of Veterinary Medicine and Health Professions ......................... 500,000
1,000,000
RB26 FROSTBURG STATE UNIVERSITY
(Allegany County)
(A) Frostburg State University Baseball Complex. Provide funds to
design, construct, and capital equip infrastructure
improvements to the Frostburg State University baseball
complex including a fully artificial turf baseball field ................ 100,000
RB27 COPPIN STATE UNIVERSITY
(Baltimore City)
(A) New Residence Hall. Provide funds to complete construction of
a new residence hall at Coppin State University ....................... 2,000,000
RB28 UNIVERSITY OF BALTIMORE
(Baltimore City)
– 17 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(A) 101 W. Mt. Royal Ave. Property Acquisition. Provide funds to
acquire property at 101 W. Mt. Royal Ave .................................. 500,000
RB29 SALISBURY UNIVERSITY
(Wicomico County)
(A) Blackwell Hall Renovation. Provide funds to complete
construction of the renovation of Blackwell Hall to create a
Student Services Center .............................................................. 1,124,000
RB30 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND GLOBAL CAMPUS
(Prince George’s County)
(A) Adelphi Building Renovation. Provide funds to design the
renovation of the Adelphi Building for the University of
Maryland Global Campus ............................................................ 500,000
1,000,000
RB31 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND BALTIMORE COUNTY
(Baltimore County)
(A) Sherman Hall Renovation. Provide funds to complete
construction of the renovation of Sherman Hall ......................... 9,087,000
RB36 UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND OFFICE
(Baltimore City)
(A) Rita Colwell Center Deferred Maintenance. Provide funds to
continue construction of deferred maintenance improvements,
including central plant upgrades, at the Rita Colwell Center in
Baltimore City, provided that notwithstanding Section 6 of this
Act, work may continue on this project prior to the
appropriation of all funds necessary to complete this project ..... 2,906,000
RC00 BALTIMORE CITY COMMUNITY COLLEGE
(Baltimore City)
(A) Learning Commons Renovation and Addition. Provide funds to
complete design and begin construction and equipping of the
renovation and expansion of the Bard Library to create a
Learning Commons building, provided that notwithstanding
Section 6 of this Act, work may commence on this project prior
to the appropriation of all funds necessary to complete this
project ........................................................................................... 9,790,000
– 18 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
(B) Deferred Maintenance. Provide funds to design, construct, and
equip various infrastructure, building systems, and site
improvements ................................................................................ 1,000,000
RD00 ST. MARY’S COLLEGE OF MARYLAND
(St. Mary’s County)
(A) Campus Infrastructure Improvements. Provide funds to design,
construct, and equip various campus infrastructure
improvement projects .................................................................. 2,271,000
(B) Montgomery Hall Renovation. Provide funds to continue design
of the renovation of Montgomery Hall ........................................ 959,000
RE01 MARYLAND SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF
(Frederick County)
(A) New Student Residences. Provide funds to continue
construction of a new high school boys’ residence, high school
girls’ residence, flexible residence, satellite health center,
student center, and central offices at the Maryland School for
the Deaf in Frederick, provided that notwithstanding Section 6
of this Act, work may continue on this project prior to the
appropriation of all funds necessary to complete this project ... 1,611,000
RI00 MARYLAND HIGHER EDUCATION COMMISSION
(A) Community College Construction Grant Program. Provide
funds to assist the subdivisions in the acquisition of property
and in the design, construction, renovation, and equipping of
local and regional community college buildings, site
improvements, and facilities. The funds appropriated for this
purpose shall be administered in accordance with § 11–105(j)
of the Education Article, provided that notwithstanding Section
6 of this Act, work may continue on each of these projects prior
to the appropriation of all funds necessary to complete the
project ........................................................................................... 52,360,000
52,860,000
55,685,000
56,685,000
(1) Allegany College of Maryland –
Workforce Development and
Training Center Renovation
(Allegany County)
– 19 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) Anne Arundel Community College –
Dragun Building Renovation (Anne
Arundel County)
(3) Carroll Community College –
Systemic Renovation (Carroll
County)
(4) Chesapeake College – New Queen
Anne’s Technical Building (Queen
Anne’s County)
(5) College of Southern Maryland –
Leonardtown – Building A
Renovation and Expansion (St.
Mary’s County)
(6) Community College of Baltimore
County – Catonsville – Automotive
Technology Center Renovation and
Expansion (Baltimore County)
(7) Community College of Baltimore
County – Essex – Primary
Switchgear and Distribution
Replacement (Baltimore County)
(8) Community College of Baltimore
County – Multiple Building Roof
Replacement (Baltimore County)
(9) Frederick Community College –
Catoctin Hall Renovation and
Addition (Frederick County)
(10) Hagerstown Community College –
Advanced Technology Center
Renovation (Washington County)
(11) Hagerstown Community College –
Second Entrance Widening
(Washington County)
(12) Howard Community College – New
Workforce Development and
Trades Center (Howard County)
– 20 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
(13) Montgomery College – Rockville
Library Renovation (Montgomery
County)
(14) Wor–Wic Community College –
Maintenance Building Expansion
(Wicomico County)
(15) Montgomery College – Rockville
Theatre Arts Building Renovation
(Montgomery County)
(B) Community College Facilities Renewal Grant Program. Provide
funds to assist the community colleges with improvements,
repairs, and deferred maintenance projects. The funds shall be
administered in accordance with §16–320 of the Education
Article (Statewide) ....................................................................... 2,618,000
RM00 MORGAN STATE UNIVERSITY
(Baltimore City)
(A) Campuswide Electric Infrastructure Upgrades. Provide funds
to complete design and continue construction of a new electrical
substation, substation upgrades, and related electrical
infrastructure components at Morgan State University,
provided that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may
continue on this project prior to the appropriation of all funds
necessary to complete this project .............................................. 40,486,000
(B) Carter–Grant–Wilson Building Renovation. Provide funds to
continue design of the renovation of the Carter–Grant–Wilson
building for the School of Graduate Studies and the Division of
International Affairs .................................................................... 100,000
(C) New Science Center, Phase II. Provide funds to continue
construction and begin equipping of the New Science Center,
provided that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may
continue on this project prior to the appropriation of all funds
necessary to complete this project .............................................. 106,991,000
RQ00 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND MEDICAL SYSTEM
(A) Comprehensive Cancer Center. Provide a grant to the
University of Maryland Medical System to design, construct,
and equip facilities to expand clinical programs of the Marlene
– 21 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
and Stewart Greenebaum Comprehensive Cancer Center
(Baltimore City) ........................................................................... 5,000,000
(B) R Adams Cowley Shock Trauma Center – Phase III. Provide a
grant to the University of Maryland Medical System to assist in
the design, construction, and equipping of Phase III of
renovations, upgrades, and expansion to the R Adams Cowley
Shock Trauma Center (Baltimore City) ...................................... 5,000,000
(C) University of Maryland Shore Regional Health – New Easton
Regional Medical Center. Provide a grant to the University of
Maryland Medical System to assist in the design, construction,
and equipping of a new campus and facilities for the University
of Maryland Shore Regional Health – Regional Medical Center
in Easton (Talbot County) ............................................................ 20,000,000
(D) Capital Region Medical Center – Clinic. Provide a grant to the
University of Maryland Medical System to design, construct,
and equip a primary and specialty care clinic at the University
of Maryland Capital Region Medical Center (Prince George’s
County) .......................................................................................... 3,000,000
DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT
SA24 DIVISION OF NEIGHBORHOOD REVITALIZATION
(A) Baltimore Regional Neighborhood Initiative. Provide funds for
grants and loans to nonprofit community development
corporations or coalitions to fund comprehensive revitalization
strategies for Sustainable Communities in Baltimore City,
Baltimore County, and Anne Arundel County (Regional) .......... 20,000,000
Provided that $5,000,000 $5,500,000 $5,950,000 of this
authorization may be used only to provide grants as follows:
(1) ReBUILD Greenmount Park.
Provide a grant to ReBUILD Metro,
Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital
equipping of improvements to
Greenmount Park and athletic
facilities (Baltimore City) ................. 1,000,000
– 22 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
(2) ReBUILD Greenmount Avenue –
Economic Development. Provide a
grant to ReBUILD Metro, Inc. for
the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping
of improvements along the
Greenmount Avenue corridor and
surrounding areas, including the
rehabilitation of vacant homes and
capital improvements to vacant and
occupied businesses (Baltimore
City) ................................................... 250,000
(3) 1204 Darley Ave. Blighted Property
Rehabilitation. Provide a grant to
Vacant No More, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping
of the 1204 Darley Ave. Blighted
Property Rehabilitation project
(Baltimore City) ................................ 120,000
(4) Baltimore Urban Leadership
Foundation Community Center.
Provide a grant to the Baltimore
Urban Leadership Foundation for
the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping
of the Baltimore Urban Leadership
Foundation Community Center
(Baltimore City) ................................ 250,000
(5) Collington Square Homeownership.
Provide a grant to Friends of
Collington Square Park, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping
of vacant rowhomes within the
– 23 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Collington Square neighborhood
(Baltimore City) ................................ 100,000
(6) Darley Park Blight Elimination
Initiative. Provide a grant to
Baltimore Redlining and Blight
Elimination CDC for the
acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping
of the Darley Park Blight
Elimination Initiative (Baltimore
City) ................................................... 250,000
(7) Drink at the Well Residential
Program. Provide a grant to Drink
at the Well, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of Drink at
the Well Residential Program
facilities (Baltimore City) ................. 200,000
(8) East Baltimore – Strong Foundation
Initiative. Provide a grant to A
Strong Foundation Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping
of the East Baltimore Strong
Foundation Initiative (Baltimore
City) ................................................... 250,000
(9) Mount Pleasant Park – Echodale
and Belvedere Site Improvements.
Provide a grant to the Baltimore
City Department of Recreation and
Parks for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Echodale and
Belvedere site improvements project
– 24 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
(Baltimore City) ................................ 50,000
(10) Greater Govans Community
Development Corporation. Provide a
grant to Greater Govans
Community Development
Corporation, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Greater
Govans Community Development
Corporation facility (Baltimore
City) ................................................... 500,000
(11) Langston Hughes Community,
Business, and Resource Center.
Provide a grant to Youth
Educational Services, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping
of the Langston Hughes
Community, Business, and
Resource Center (Baltimore City) .... 125,000
(12) National Great Blacks in Wax
Museum. Provide a grant to the
National Great Blacks in Wax
Museum for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the new
National Great Blacks in Wax
Museum expansion initiative
(Baltimore City) ................................ 500,000
(13) Rehoboth Place on Patapsco.
Provide a grant to Rehoboth
Community Development
Corporation for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement,
– 25 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
and capital equipping of the
Rehoboth Place on Patapsco
mixed–income housing development
(Baltimore City) ................................ 250,000
(14) We Rise Neighborhood
Revitalization. Provide a grant to
We Rise a Nonprofit Corporation for
the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping
of the We Rise Neighborhood
Revitalization project (Baltimore
City) ................................................... 50,000
(15) East Biddle Street. Provide a grant
to the New Horizons Community
Development Corporation for the
acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping
of East Biddle Street, including the
2400 block (Baltimore City) .............. 75,000
(16) Comprehensive Housing Assistance,
Inc. (CHAI) – Fallstaff Apartments.
Provide a grant to Comprehensive
Housing Assistance, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping
of the CHAI – Fallstaff Apartments
(Baltimore City) ................................ 400,000
(17) Improving Food Access and Health
at The Factory. Provide a grant to
the West Baltimore Renaissance
Foundation, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of a former
kitchen and manufacturing space
– 26 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
into a teaching and production
kitchen (Baltimore City) ................... 550,000
450,000
(18) 4M Swim and Recreation Club.
Provide a grant to the 4M Swim
Club, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the 4M
Swim and Recreation Club facilities
(Baltimore City) ................................ 80,000
(19) Park Heights Community Fridge
and Workforce Development Center.
Provide a grant to Empowerment
Temple, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Park
Heights Community Fridge and
Workforce Development Center
(Baltimore City) ................................ 500,000
(20) Delta Community Center. Provide a
grant to the Baltimore Alumnae
Chapter of Delta Sigma Theta
Sorority, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Delta
Community Center (Baltimore
City) ................................................... 100,000
(21) HELA 221 W. Franklin Street
Workforce Housing. Provide a grant
to AnnMarie Community Partners,
Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital
equipping of the HELA 221 W.
Franklin Street workforce housing
– 27 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
project (Baltimore City) .................... 450,000
(B) Business Facade Improvement Program. Provide funds for
grants to subdivisions and community development
organizations to assist businesses located in Sustainable
Communities with improving the outside appearance of their
facilities (Statewide) ..................................................................... 5,000,000
5,050,000
Provided that $50,000 of this authorization may be used only
to provide grants as follows:
(1) Montgomery County Countywide
Facade Improvement Program.
Provide a grant to Montgomery
County, Maryland for the
Countywide Facade Improvement
Program, provided that these funds
are intended to supplement rather
than supplant available funding for
the program (Montgomery
County) .............................................. 50,000
(C) Community Legacy Program. Provide funds to assist
neighborhoods with revitalization efforts. The funds shall be
administered in accordance with §§ 6–201 through 6–211 of the
Housing and Community Development Article and Code of
Maryland Regulations (COMAR) 05.17.01. Provided that any
financial assistance awarded under this program is not subject
to § 8–301 of the State Finance and Procurement Article
(Statewide) .................................................................................... 8,000,000
Provided that $1,000,000 $2,600,000 of this authorization may
be used only to provide grants as follows:
(1) Catonsville Armory. Provide a grant
to the County Executive and County
Council of Baltimore County for the
acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping
of the Catonsville Armory
(Baltimore County) ........................... 500,000
(2) Strathmore Hall Performing Arts
– 28 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
Center. Provide a grant to
Montgomery County, Maryland for
the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping
of the Strathmore Hall Performing
Arts Center (Montgomery
County) .............................................. 500,000
(3) Riverdale Park Hiker Biker Trail.
Provide a grant to the Town of
Riverdale Park for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the
Riverdale Park Hiker Biker Trail
(Prince George’s County) ................... 500,000
(4) Route 1 Public Art Wall. Provide a
grant to Hyattsville CDC for the
acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping
of the Route 1 public art wall (Prince
George’s County) ............................... 500,000
(5) Creative Suitland. Provide a grant
to the Revenue Authority of Prince
George’s County for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Creative
Suitland redevelopment project
(Prince George’s County) ................... 500,000
(6) Front Door Initiative. Provide a
grant to Hope Harbor, Inc. d.b.a.
Hope Harbor Community
Development Corporation for the
acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site
– 29 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
improvement, and capital equipping
of the Front Door Initiative to
rehabilitate vacant homes
(Baltimore City) ................................ 100,000
(D) National Capital Strategic Economic Development Fund.
Provide funds for grants and loans to government agencies and
nonprofit community development organizations in support of
commercial and residential development activities in areas of
the National Capital Region as set forth by § 6–710 of the
Housing and Community Development Article (Regional) ........ 20,000,000
20,050,000
Provided that $50,000 of this authorization may be used only
to provide grants as follows:
(1) Gaithersburg Municipal Complex.
Provide a grant to the City of
Gaithersburg for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the
Gaithersburg Municipal Complex
(Montgomery County) ....................... 50,000
(E) Seed Community Development Anchor Institution Fund.
Provide funds for grants to higher education and health care
institutions for community enhancement projects in
Sustainable Communities and blighted areas. The funds shall
be administered in accordance with § 4–509 of the Housing and
Community Development Article (Statewide) ............................ 10,000,000
Provided that $500,000 $2,150,000 of this authorization may be
used only to provide grants as follows:
(1) University of Maryland, Baltimore
for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping
of the Mondawmin Health Village
Dental Clinic project (Baltimore
City) ................................................... 500,000
(2) Prince George’s Community College
– 30 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping
of a food hall at the Cheverly Hill
Redevelopment (Prince George’s
County) .............................................. 1,500,000
(3) Front Door Initiative. Provide a
grant to Hope Harbor, Inc. d.b.a.
Hope Harbor Community
Development Corporation for the
acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping
of the Front Door Initiative to
rehabilitate vacant homes
(Baltimore City) ................................ 150,000
(F) Strategic Demolition Fund. Provide funds for grants and loans
to government agencies and community development
organizations for demolition, land assembly, architecture and
engineering, and site development in designated Sustainable
Communities. The funds shall be administered in accordance
with § 4–508 of the Housing and Community Development
Article. Provided that any financial assistance awarded under
this program is not subject to § 8–301 of the State Finance and
Procurement Article (Statewide) ................................................. 60,000,000
17,790,000
Provided that $1,170,000 $2,670,000 of this authorization may
be used only to provide grants as follows:
(1) Howard House Revitalization.
Provide a grant to HH Owner LLC
for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping
of the downtown Elkton
revitalization of the Historic
Howard Hotel and adjacent
fire–damaged structures (Cecil
County) .............................................. 670,000
– 31 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) 4th District Police Station. Provide a
grant to Montgomery County,
Maryland for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the 4th
District Police Station (Montgomery
County) .............................................. 500,000
(3) Cheverly Water Tower and
Communication Towers. Provide a
grant to the Redevelopment
Authority of Prince George’s County
for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping
of the removal of the Cheverly water
tower and the removal and
relocation of communication towers
(Prince George’s County) ................... 1,500,000
Further provided that the provisional award made for the
purpose of providing a grant for the Salisbury Area Chamber of
Commerce project shall be reduced by $170,000.
SA25 DIVISION OF DEVELOPMENT FINANCE
(Statewide)
(A) Appraisal Gap Program – UPLIFT. Provide gap financing to
developers and homeowners for the difference between the
value of mortgages for distressed properties and their value
after renovation. These funds shall be administered in
accordance with §§ 4–2801 through 4–2806 of the Housing and
Community Development Article ................................................ 10,000,000
(B) Homeownership Programs. Provide funds for below–market
interest rate mortgages with minimum down payments to
low– and moderate–income homebuyers. These funds shall be
administered in accordance with §§ 4–235 through 4–241,
4–501, 4–502, 4–801 through 4–810, and 4–814 through 4–816
of the Housing and Community Development Article. Provided
that any financial assistance awarded under this program is
not subject to § 8–301 of the State Finance and Procurement
Article............................................................................................ 20,000,000
– 32 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
(C) Partnership Rental Housing Program. Provide funds to be
credited to the Partnership Rental Housing Fund to be
administered in accordance with §§ 4–501, 4–503, and 4–1201
through 4–1209 of the Housing and Community Development
Article............................................................................................ 8,000,000
(D) Rental Housing Programs. Provide funds for rental housing
developments that serve low– and moderate–income
households. The funds shall be administered in accordance
with §§ 4–401 through 4–411, 4–501, and 4–504 of the Housing
and Community Development Article ......................................... 65,000,000
13,800,000
8,800,000
8,803,594
(E) Shelter and Transitional Housing Facilities Grant Program.
Provide grants to acquire, design, construct, renovate, and
equip emergency shelters, transitional housing, and other
facilities for homeless individuals and families. The funds shall
be administered in accordance with Code of Maryland
Regulations (COMAR) 05.05.09 ................................................... 3,000,000
(F) Housing Innovation Fund. Provide funds to be credited to the
Housing Innovation Fund to be administered in accordance
with §§ 4–512 and 4–3001 through 4–3005 of the Housing and
Community Development Article ................................................. 5,000,000
SA30 DIVISION OF BUSINESS DEVELOPMENT
(Statewide)
(A) Neighborhood Business Development Program. Provide funds
for grants and loans to fund community–based economic
development activities in revitalization areas designated by
local governments. The funds shall be administered in
accordance with §§ 6–301 through 6–311 of the Housing and
Community Development Article ............................................... 10,000,000
DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
TG00 DIVISION OF MARKETING, TOURISM, AND THE ARTS
(Statewide)
(A) Maryland Arts Capital Grant Program. Provide funds to
eligible organizations for the acquisition, expansion,
renovation, or major repair of facilities or other infrastructure.
– 33 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
This program shall be administered in accordance with § 4–514
of the Economic Development Article ......................................... 3,000,000
Provided that $100,000 of this authorization may be used only
to provide grants as follows:
(1) Clifton House for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of facilities
projects at the Clifton House
(Baltimore City) ................................ 100,000
DEPARTMENT OF THE ENVIRONMENT
UA01 OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY
(Statewide)
(A) Bay Restoration Fund Wastewater Program. Provide funds to
local governments to upgrade major and minor wastewater
treatment plants, connect septic systems to public sewer, abate
combined sewer overflow, rehabilitate existing sewers, upgrade
conveyance systems, and upgrade stormwater management in
Maryland. The funds shall be administered in accordance with
§ 9–1605.2 of the Environment Article ....................................... 50,000,000
(B) Comprehensive Flood Management Grant Program. Provide
funds to local governments for projects that reduce the risk of
loss of life and property from flooding. Grant funds may be used
to acquire flood–prone properties for demolition or relocation,
install flood warning systems, and construct flood control
projects, including engineering studies required to support the
design of these projects. Capital projects that assist with flood
management techniques may include but are not limited to:
flood control dams, levees and dikes, stormwater detention or
retention structures, and flood proofing ..................................... 4,382,000
(C) Maryland Drinking Water Revolving Loan Fund. Provide funds
to finance drinking water projects. The funds shall be
administered in accordance with § 9–1605.1 of the
Environment Article .................................................................... 14,896,000
(D) Maryland Water Quality Revolving Loan Fund. Provide funds
to finance water quality improvement projects. The funds shall
be administered in accordance with § 9–1605 of the
– 34 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
Environment Article .................................................................... 19,591,000
(E) Supplemental Assistance Program. Provide grants to assist
grant and loan recipients to meet the local share of construction
costs for wastewater facility improvements. The funds shall be
administered in accordance with §§ 9–345 through 9–350 of the
Environment Article .................................................................... 3,000,000
(F) Water Supply Financial Assistance Program. Provide funds for
assistance to State and local government entities to acquire,
design, construct, rehabilitate, equip, and improve water
supply facilities. The funds shall be administered in accordance
with §§ 9–420 through 9–426 of the Environment Article and
any regulation adopted in accordance with those sections ........ 2,419,000
UB00 MARYLAND ENVIRONMENTAL SERVICE
(Statewide)
(A) State Water and Sewer Infrastructure Improvement Fund.
Provide funds to design, construct, and equip water and
wastewater facility improvements for State institutions,
provided that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may
commence on a project prior to the appropriation of all funds
necessary to complete the project. Expenditures for a project
detailed in the Fiscal Year 2027 Capital Budget Volume under
this program may not exceed the amount listed therein by more
than 7.5% without notification to the General Assembly. Funds
may be spent only on the projects listed under this program in
the Fiscal Year 2027 Capital Budget Volume or on prior or
future authorized projects. Expenditure of any part of this
appropriation for a prior or future authorized project shall also
require notification to the General Assembly ............................ 11,115,000
3,162,000
VE01 DEPARTMENT OF JUVENILE SERVICES
(Prince George’s County)
(A) New Cheltenham Youth Treatment Center. Provide funds to
begin design of a new residential treatment center for male and
female youths at the Department of Juvenile Services’
Cheltenham campus .................................................................... 4,292,000
WA01 DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE
(A) Barrack A – Waterloo: New Barrack and Garage and Historic
Barrack Renovation. Provide funds to continue design of a new
– 35 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
barrack and garage, and the renovation of a historic barrack in
Waterloo (Howard County) ......................................................... 763,000
(B) Barrack J – Annapolis: Communications Room and New
Garage. Provide funds to complete construction of a new garage
and the renovation of Barrack J in Annapolis for a new
communications room (Anne Arundel County) .......................... 3,579,000
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
(A) Allegany County Historical Society – New History Discovery
Center. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of the
Allegany County Historical Society Museum for the planning,
design, construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the historic 1845
Canada Hose House and Blue Springs parcel (Allegany
County) ........................................................................................ 355,000
(B) American Legion Post 47 Renovation. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of The Joseph L. Davis Post No. 47 The
American Legion Incorporated for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the American Legion
Post 47 (Harford County) ............................................................ 150,000
(C) Ascension Saint Agnes – Family Birthing Center. Provide a
grant to the Board of Directors of Saint Agnes HealthCare for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Family Birthing Center (Baltimore
City) .............................................................................................. 500,000
750,000
1,000,000
(D) Ashley Addiction Treatment – Infrastructure Improvements.
Provide a grant to the Ashley, Inc. for the planning, design,
construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of infrastructure
improvements on the main campus in Havre de Grace,
Maryland (Harford County) ........................................................ 250,000
(E) Baltimore Museum of Art – Infrastructure Improvements.
Provide a grant to the governing board of The Baltimore
Museum of Art, Inc. for the planning, design, construction,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Baltimore Museum of Art, including
– 36 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
repairs to the building’s staircases, primary elevator, building
HVAC system, and related improvements (Baltimore City) ..... 750,000
950,000
1,450,000
(F) Baltimore Museum of Industry – New Key Bridge Exhibit.
Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of the Baltimore
Museum of Industry for the planning, design, construction,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Key Bridge Exhibition (Baltimore
City) .............................................................................................. 250,000
(G) Baltimore Symphony Orchestra. Provide a grant to the Board
of Directors of the Baltimore Symphony Orchestra Endowment
Trust for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Joseph Meyerhoff
Symphony Hall (Baltimore City) ................................................ 1,000,000
(H) Banneker–Douglass–Tubman Museum Renovation. Provide a
grant to the Maryland Commission on African American
History and Culture for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Banneker–Douglass–Tubman Museum (Anne Arundel
County) ........................................................................................ 1,000,000
(I) Bowie Mill Bike Trail. Provide a grant to the County Executive
and County Council of Montgomery County, Maryland for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Bowie Mill bike trail (Montgomery County) ... 1,750,000
2,150,000
(J) Catholic Charities – Intergenerational Center. Provide a grant
to the Board of Directors of the Associated Catholic Charities
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Catholic Charities Intergenerational
Center (Baltimore City) ............................................................... 1,000,000
1,500,000
2,000,000
(K) Central Baltimore Partnership – North Avenue Market
Redevelopment. Provide a grant to the Central Baltimore
Partnership for the planning, design, construction, repair,
– 37 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the redevelopment and historic preservation of the
North Avenue Market (Baltimore City) ...................................... 500,000
(L) Charles E. Smith Life Communities – Ring House Renovation.
Provide a grant to the Charles E. Smith Life Communities
Trustee Funds Inc. Ring House Corporation for the planning,
design, construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the renovation of the
Ring House in Montgomery County (Montgomery County) ....... 800,000
950,000
(M) City of Annapolis – Housing Authority Properties
Improvements. Provide a grant to the Mayor and City Council
of the City of Annapolis for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of capital
improvements to properties owned by the Housing Authority of
the City of Annapolis (Anne Arundel County) ........................... 500,000
(N) City of Cambridge – Multiple Bridge Improvements. Provide a
grant to the City of Cambridge for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of five
bridges in Cambridge (Dorchester County) ................................. 3,000,000
2,000,000
1,000,000
(O) City of Frostburg – Water Sustainability Improvements.
Provide a grant to the Mayor and City Council of Frostburg for
the planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
water well, tank, and pump station projects (Allegany
County) ........................................................................................ 400,000
(P) Crownsville Hospital Memorial Park – Meyer Building
Renovation. Provide a grant to the County Executive and
County Council of Anne Arundel County for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Meyer Building (Anne Arundel County) .................................... 4,000,000
(Q) Diakonia, Inc. – New Supportive Housing. Provide a grant to
the Board of Directors of Diakonia, Inc. for the planning,
design, construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the supportive living
– 38 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
campus project, including an expanded Veterans Service
Center, on Maryland’s Lower Eastern Shore (Worcester
County) ......................................................................................... 700,000
(R) Downtown Frederick Hotel and Conference Center. Provide a
grant to the City of Frederick for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
New Downtown Frederick Hotel and Conference Center
(Frederick County) ....................................................................... 5,500,000
(S) Fello, Inc. – New Easton Crossing Development. Provide a
grant to the Board of Directors of Fello, Inc., for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Easton Crossing mixed–use development project (Talbot
County) ......................................................................................... 2,000,000
(T) Friends of Patapsco Valley State Park – Whiting Property
Capital Improvements. Provide a grant to the Friends of
Patapsco Valley State Park for the planning, design,
construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Patapsco Valley
Gateway public access project (Howard County) ........................ 1,000,000
1,100,000
1,200,000
(U) Garrett College – Intercollegiate Athletics Facilities
Expansion. Provide a grant to the Board of Trustees of Garrett
College for the Community College d.b.a. Garrett College for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the intercollegiate athletics facilities expansion
(Garrett County) ........................................................................... 307,000
(V) Glen Echo Park Spanish Ballroom Renovation. Provide a grant
to the County Executive and County Council of Montgomery
County for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the historic Glen Echo
Park Spanish Ballroom (Montgomery County) .......................... 1,000,000
1,500,000
(W) Hagerstown Regional Airport – New Control Tower. Provide a
grant to the City of Hagerstown Board of County
Commissioners of Washington County, Maryland for the
– 39 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the air traffic control tower (Washington
County) ......................................................................................... 1,500,000
(X) Historic Annapolis Restoration. Provide a grant to the Board of
Trustees of Historic Annapolis, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Brice House and other State–owned historic properties leased
to Historic Annapolis, Inc. (Anne Arundel County) .................... 3,000,000
(Y) It Takes a Village to Help Our Children – New Village Youth
Center. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of It Takes a
Village to Help Our Children, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of a
Village Youth Center (Somerset County) .................................... 495,000
(Z) Johns Hopkins University – Data Science and Computing
Infrastructure. Provide a grant to the Board of Trustees of
Johns Hopkins University for the planning, design,
construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of a computer facility to
support the new Data Science Institute modular data center to
support data science and computing infrastructure (Baltimore
City) .............................................................................................. 5,000,000
10,000,000
(AA) Jug Handle Connector. Provide a grant to the County Executive
and County Council of Howard County for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Route 29 North–South Jug Handle Connector (Howard
County) ......................................................................................... 3,000,000
4,000,000
(AB) Kennedy Krieger – Innovative Care Center. Provide a grant to
the Board of Directors of the Kennedy Krieger Institute, Inc.
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of a new Innovative Care Center (Baltimore
City) .............................................................................................. 3,000,000
(AC) Kingdom Care Center. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors
of the Kingdom Global Community Development Corporation
– 40 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
(KGCDC) for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Kingdom Care
Center (Prince George’s County) ................................................ 1,000,000
500,000
1,000,000
(AD) Krimson Achievement Foundation. Provide a grant to the
Krimson Achievement Foundation for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
new Krimson Achievement Foundation Center (Prince George’s
County) ......................................................................................... 250,000
350,000
(AE) LifeBridge Health – Sinai Hospital Surgery Center Renovation.
Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of Sinai Hospital of
Baltimore, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the surgery center
at Sinai Hospital (Baltimore City) .............................................. 2,000,000
(AF) Luminis Health Doctors Community Medical Center – New
Obstetrical Care Tower. Provide a grant to the Luminis Health
Doctors Community Medical Center, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
infrastructure improvements to the Luminis Health Doctors
Community Medical Center, including a new obstetrical care
tower (Prince George’s County) ................................................... 10,000,000
10,500,000
(AG) Maryland Independent College and University Association –
Johns Hopkins University. Provide a grant to the Board of
Trustees of Johns Hopkins University for the design,
construction, and equipping of the renovation of the Peabody
Institute, subject to the requirement that the grantee provide
an equal and matching fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding
Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund may consist of funds
expended prior to the effective date of this Act (Baltimore
City) .............................................................................................. 1,600,000
1,800,000
2,000,000
(AH) Maryland Independent College and University Association –
St. John’s College. Provide a grant to the Board of Visitors and
– 41 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Governors of St. John’s College for the design, construction, and
equipping of a new Arts and Academic Hall, subject to the
requirement that the grantee provide an equal and matching
fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act,
the matching fund may consist of funds expended prior to the
effective date of this Act (Anne Arundel County) ...................... 3,200,000
3,400,000
3,600,000
(AI) Maryland Independent College and University Association –
Washington College. Provide a grant to the Board of Visitors
and Governors of Washington College for the design,
construction, and equipping of the new Warehime School of
Global Business, Economics, and Social Impact, subject to the
requirement that the grantee provide an equal and matching
fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act,
the matching fund may consist of funds expended prior to the
effective date of this Act (Kent County) ...................................... 3,200,000
3,400,000
3,600,000
(AJ) Maryland Zoo in Baltimore – Infrastructure and Habitat
Improvements. Provide a grant to the Board of Trustees of the
Maryland Zoological Society, Inc. to assist in funding the
design, construction, and equipping of building, infrastructure,
and habitat improvements for the exhibits and operations of
the Maryland Zoo in Baltimore (Baltimore City) ....................... 4,750,000
(AK) MedStar Southern Maryland Hospital. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of MedStar Southern Maryland Hospital
Center, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of infrastructure
improvements to MedStar Southern Maryland Hospital,
including construction of an Advanced Critical Care Tower
(Prince George’s County) .............................................................. 8,000,000
9,000,000
(AL) Meritus Health – Brook Lane Infrastructure Improvements.
Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of Meritus Health,
Inc., for the planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
infrastructure improvements at Brook Lane Health Services
facility (Washington County) ....................................................... 500,000
(AM) Mount Vernon Place Conservancy – North and South Squares
– 42 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
Revitalization. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of the
Mount Vernon Place Conservancy, Inc. for the planning,
design, construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the revitalization of the
North and South Squares at Mount Vernon Place (Baltimore
City) .............................................................................................. 500,000
750,000
1,250,000
1,650,000
(AN) Mt. Royal Elementary/Middle School – New Outdoor Play Area.
Provide a grant to Friends of Mt. Royal School for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Mt. Royal Elementary/Middle School Outdoor
Play Area (Baltimore City) .......................................................... 500,000
(AO) National Aquarium in Baltimore – Infrastructure
Improvements. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of the
National Aquarium in Baltimore, Inc. to assist in the design,
construction, renovation, and equipping of infrastructure
improvements at the National Aquarium in Baltimore
(Baltimore City) ............................................................................ 4,000,000
5,000,000
(AP) New Calcined Clay Facility. Provide a grant to the County
Executive and County Council of Cecil County New Low Iron
Quartz and Calcined Clay Facilities. Provide a grant to the
Maryland Economic Development Corporation for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of a calcined clay facility low iron quartz and calcined
clay facilities (Cecil County) ........................................................ 7,500,000
(AQ) New Harriet Elizabeth Brown Statue. Provide a grant to the
Board of County Commissioners of Calvert County for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of a commemorative Harriet Elizabeth Brown Statue
(Calvert County) ........................................................................... 250,000
(AR) New Somerset County Emergency Medical Services Facility.
Provide a grant to the Board of County Commissioners of
Somerset County for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of a new emergency
– 43 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
medical services facility (Somerset County) ................................ 500,000
(AS) North East Housing Initiative – New Community Land Trust
Homes. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of the North
East Housing Initiative for the, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of 10
Community Land Trust homes (Statewide) ................................ 500,000
(AT) Olney Satellite Police Station and Community Facility. Provide
a grant to the Olney Chamber of Commerce, Inc. Montgomery
County, Maryland for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Olney Satellite
Police Station and community facility (Montgomery County) ... 1,000,000
1,250,000
(AU) Parks and People – ReInvest Baltimore Green Space
Infrastructure Improvements. Provide a grant to the Parks and
People Foundation for the Parks and People, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
transformation of vacant properties into green spaces in
Baltimore City (Baltimore City) .................................................. 100,000
(AV) Pascal Crisis Services – HVAC System Replacement. Provide a
grant to the Board of Directors of Pascal Crisis Services, Inc.
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of a new HVAC system (Anne Arundel
County) ......................................................................................... 100,000
(AW) Pikesville Armory Foundation – Pikesville Armory Renovation.
Provide a grant to the governing board of the Pikesville Armory
Foundation, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Pikesville
Armory (Baltimore County) ......................................................... 1,500,000
(AX) Revolutionary VP – New Production Studio. Provide a grant to
Revolutionary VP, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of a virtual production
studio (Prince George’s County) .................................................. 3,000,000
4,000,000
0
– 44 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
(AY) Ripken Stadium Renovation and Expansion. Provide a grant to
Unrivaled Sports the City of Aberdeen for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of a
redevelopment and expansion of facilities at Ripken Stadium
in Aberdeen (Harford County) ..................................................... 5,000,000
(AZ) Roca Baltimore – Infrastructure Improvements. Provide a
grant to the Board of Directors of Roca Baltimore, Inc. for the
planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
infrastructure improvements, including repairs to the garage
floor of Roca Baltimore’s facility (Baltimore City) ...................... 100,000
200,000
(BA) Security Square Mall Renovation and Replacement. Provide a
grant to the County Executive and County Council of Baltimore
County for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of infrastructure
improvements to Security Square Mall (Baltimore County) ...... 2,500,000
(BB) St. Michaels Community Center, Inc. – New Community
Center. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of the St.
Michaels Community Center, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of a
new St. Michaels Community Center facility (Talbot County) .. 800,000
(BC) Suburban Hospital – Emergency Department Expansion.
Provide a grant to the Board of Trustees of The Johns Hopkins
Health System Suburban Hospital, Inc. for the planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
expansion and modernization of the Suburban Hospital
Emergency Department (Montgomery County) .......................... 1,000,000
1,250,000
1,500,000
(BD) The Benedictine School for Exceptional Children – New
Residential Facilities. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors
of The Benedictine School for Exceptional Children, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the school residential facilities (Caroline
– 45 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
County) ......................................................................................... 1,000,000
(BE) The Johns Hopkins Hospital – Pediatric Emergency Dept.
Psychiatric Unit Expansion. Provide a grant to the Board of
Trustees of The Johns Hopkins Hospital to assist in the design,
construction, expansion, renovation, and equipping of the
psychiatric unit within the Pediatric Emergency Department
Psychiatric Unit (Baltimore City) ................................................ 300,000
(BF) Thirty Five Ventures Suitland – Silver Hill Redevelopment.
Provide a grant to the Thirty Five Ventures, LLC PGC Vision
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of mixed–use community space in Suitland
(Prince George’s County) .............................................................. 8,500,000
10,000,000
(BG) University of Maryland Enterprise Corporation – Capital of
Quantum Initiative. Provide a grant to the University of
Maryland Enterprise Corporation for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Capital of Quantum Initiative (Prince George’s County) ........... 10,000,000
(BH) Westminster Fiber Project. Provide a grant to the Mayor and
City Council of the City of Westminster for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Westminster fiber project (Carroll County) ................................ 1,000,000
(BI) Westport Capital Development – Kloman Street Relocation.
Provide a grant to Westport Capital Development, LLC for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the relocation and realignment of Kloman Street
in Baltimore City (Baltimore City) .............................................. 1,000,000
2,000,000
(BJ) Maryland Society of the Sons of the American Revolution
Revolutionary War Memorial. Provide a grant to the Maryland
Society of the Sons of the American Revolution for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of a memorial (Anne Arundel County) ...................... 250,000
(BK) B&O Railroad Museum Restoration. Provide a grant to the
– 46 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
B&O Railroad Museum, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
infrastructure improvements to the B&O Railroad Museum
(Baltimore City) ........................................................................... 3,000,000
(BL) Baltimore Streetcar Museum. Provide a grant to the Baltimore
Streetcar Museum, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of former Maryland &
Pennsylvania Baltimore Roundhouse (Baltimore City) ............ 250,000
(BM) Westport Waterfront Park – Black Sox Memorial. Provide a
grant to the South Baltimore Gateway Partnership for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of infrastructure improvements at Westport
Waterfront Park, including a Black Sox memorial (Baltimore
City) ............................................................................................. 250,000
(BN) Sandy Spring Volunteer Fire Department. Provide a grant to
the Sandy Spring Volunteer Fire Department, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of infrastructure improvements to Sandy Spring
Volunteer Fire Department buildings and grounds including
State 40 outbuildings (Montgomery County) ............................. 550,000
750,000
(BO) SS John Brown Liberty Ship. Provide a grant to Project Liberty
Ship, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the SS John Brown
Liberty Ship project (Baltimore City) ......................................... 250,000
(BP) Port Discovery Capital Upgrades–Phase B. Provide a grant to
The Baltimore Children’s Museum, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of Port
Discovery Children’s Museum (Baltimore City) ........................ 150,000
1,150,000
1,250,000
(BQ) Olney Theatre Center. Provide a grant to the Olney Theatre
Center for the Arts, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
– 47 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
site improvement, and capital equipping of infrastructure
improvements to the Olney Theatre, including the creation of a
Makers’ Center and Education Center (Montgomery County) . 500,000
(BR) NorthBay Education Inc. Infrastructure Projects. Provide a
grant to the NorthBay Education, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
NorthBay Education, Inc. facilities (Cecil County) .................... 200,000
(BS) MEOR Maryland. Provide a grant to The Maryland Jewish
Experience, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of a new building
adjacent to an existing historical property for MEOR Maryland
(Prince George’s County) ............................................................. 500,000
(BT) MedStar Montgomery Medical Center Renovation of the
Community Learning Center Space. Provide a grant to the
Women’s Board of Montgomery General Hospital for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the second floor of the MedStar Montgomery
Medical Center Community Learning Center (Montgomery
County) ........................................................................................ 250,000
375,000
(BU) Maryland Science Center. Provide a grant to the Maryland
Academy of Sciences for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of infrastructure
improvements at the Maryland Science Center (Baltimore
City) ............................................................................................. 200,000
(BV) Kennedy Krieger Institute – LEAP Facility Renovation and
Expansion. Provide a grant to the Kennedy Krieger Institute,
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of facilities for the
lifeskills and education for students with autism and other
pervasive behavioral challenges program (Baltimore City) ...... 500,000
750,000
(BW) Kennedy Krieger – Eastern Shore Campus. Provide a grant to
Kennedy Krieger Institute, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
– 48 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of a
school program (Wicomico County) ............................................ 2,500,000
5,000,000
(BX) Helping Up Mission Recovery Campus. Provide a grant to the
House of Freedom, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of a men’s recovery
campus building (Baltimore City) .............................................. 150,000
(BY) Harris Farm. Provide a grant to the Town of Middletown for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of infrastructure improvements to the Harris
Farm property (Frederick County) ............................................. 600,000
900,000
(BZ) Gateway Maryland Therapeutic Playground. Provide a grant
to Gateway Maryland, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of a
therapeutic playground (Baltimore City) ................................... 250,000
(CA) Friends House Retirement Community. Provide a grant to
Friends House Retirement Community, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Friends House Retirement Community facility (Montgomery
County) ........................................................................................ 300,000
350,000
(CB) Friends House Pottery Studio. Provide a grant to the Friends
House Retirement Community, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Friends House Pottery Studio, including renovation for
community pottery space (Montgomery County) ....................... 50,000
(CC) Food 4 Maryland Commercial Kitchen. Provide a grant to Food
4 Maryland, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Food 4
Maryland commercial kitchen (Prince George’s County) .......... 240,000
(CD) Don Bosco Cristo Rey High School. Provide a grant to the Don
Bosco Cristo Rey High School for the acquisition, planning,
– 49 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of Don
Bosco Cristo Rey High School facility, including construction of
an athletics center (Montgomery County) .................................. 1,000,000
(CE) Wilmer’s Park. Provide a grant to the Maryland–National
Capital Park and Planning Commission for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Wilmer’s Park (Prince George’s County) .................................... 200,000
(CF) Chimes School Modernization and Expansion. Provide a grant
to Chimes International Limited for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
infrastructure improvements at the Chimes School, including
modernization and expansion of educational and therapeutic
facilities (Baltimore City) ............................................................ 750,000
(CG) Chesapeake Bay Outward Bound School. Provide a grant to the
Chesapeake Bay Outward Bound School, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Chesapeake Bay Outward Bound School
Facility Enhancement and Safety Upgrade project (Baltimore
City) ............................................................................................. 100,000
(CH) Chesapeake Bay Maritime Museum. Provide a grant to the
Chesapeake Bay Maritime Museum for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Chesapeake Bay Maritime Museum facilities, including HVAC
system replacement (Talbot County) .......................................... 250,000
(CI) Cross Street Market Improvements. Provide a grant to Caves
Valley Partners for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of Cross Street
Market (Baltimore City) .............................................................. 500,000
(CJ) Carpenters Baltimore Revitalization Initiative. Provide a grant
to the Eastern Atlantic States Regional Council of Carpenters
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Carpenters Baltimore Revitalization
Initiative project (Baltimore City) .............................................. 100,000
– 50 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
200,000
(CK) Byron Memorial Park Facility Modernization. Provide a grant
to the Town of Williamsport for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Byron Memorial Park Facility Modernization, including
infrastructure improvements to the pool complex, community
center and pavilion (Washington County) .................................. 300,000
800,000
(CL) Bright and Joyful Future Campaign. Provide a grant to the
Connelly School of the Holy Child for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Bright and Joyful Future Campaign project, including
infrastructure improvements to the main building, student
success center, arts enhancements, and turf fields
(Montgomery County) ................................................................. 400,000
(CM) Bluebird Education Network, Clay Hill Public Charter School.
Provide a grant to the Bluebird Education Network, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of infrastructure improvements to Bluebird
Education Network, Inc. facilities (Baltimore City) .................. 1,750,000
(CN) BioHub Maryland. Provide a grant to the Technology Council
of Maryland, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the BioHub
Maryland facility, including laboratory equipment
(Montgomery County) ................................................................. 250,000
(CO) League for People with Disabilities Structural & System
Modernization Project. Provide a grant to The League for
People with Disabilities, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
League for People with Disabilities facilities, including the
replacement and modernization of mechanical, electrical and
plumbing systems (Baltimore City) ............................................ 200,000
400,000
(CP) Enoch Pratt Free Library System. Provide a grant to the Enoch
Pratt Free Library System for the acquisition, planning,
– 51 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
infrastructure improvements to facilities in the Enoch Pratt
Free Library System (Baltimore City) ....................................... 600,000
2,100,000
1,935,000
(CQ) City of Annapolis Medic Unit Replacement. Provide a grant to
the City of Annapolis for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of emergency medical
unit systems replacement (Anne Arundel County) .................... 475,000
950,000
(CR) The Maryland–National Capital Park and Planning
Commission. Provide a grant to The Maryland–National
Capital Park and Planning Commission for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of The
Maryland–National Capital Park Police headquarters facility
(Prince George’s County) ............................................................. 300,000
1,300,000
(CS) Calverton School – Community Access and Roadway
Improvements. Provide a grant to the Calvert County Day
School for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of infrastructure
improvements on the Calverton School campus, including
repaving and pedestrian pathway improvements (Calvert
County) ........................................................................................ 200,000
(CT) The Calverton School Stormwater Infrastructure Improvement
Plan. Provide a grant to the Calvert County Day School for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of stormwater infrastructure improvements at the
Calverton School (Calvert County) ............................................. 250,000
(CU) Preservation Maryland Headquarters. Provide a grant to The
Society for the Preservation of Maryland Antiquities, Inc. for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Preservation Maryland Headquarters
property (Howard County) .......................................................... 550,000
– 52 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
(CV) Janes Island State Park. Provide a grant to the Maryland
Developmental Disabilities Council for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of an
inclusive playground at Janes Island State Park (Somerset
County) ........................................................................................ 500,000
0
(CW) WeAchieve Roof Replacement. Provide a grant to WeAchieve,
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the WeAchieve, Inc.
property, including roof replacement (Montgomery County) .... 250,000
450,000
(CX) Montgomery Parks Solar Initiative. Provide a grant to the
Maryland–National Capital Park and Planning Commission
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Montgomery Parks Solar Initiative
project (Montgomery County) ..................................................... 500,000
2,535,000
(CY) New Essex Library Branch. Provide a grant to the Foundation
for Baltimore County Public Library for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
New Essex Library Branch (Baltimore County) ........................ 300,000
(CZ) Boonsboro High School Athletics Facility. Provide a grant to
the Boonsboro Athletic Boosters, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Boonsboro High School baseball field and surrounding stadium
(Washington County) .................................................................. 250,000
(DA) EnviroWell NextGen Hydration Pilot. Provide a grant to the
Columbia Association, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
EnviroWell NextGen Hydration Pilot project, including
solar–powered drinking water fountains (Howard County) ...... 150,000
(DB) Charlotte Hall Veterans Home EMS Facility. Provide a grant
to the County Commissioners of St. Mary’s County for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
– 53 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Charlotte Hall Veterans Home EMS Facility
project (St. Mary’s County) ......................................................... 450,000
(DC) Adventist HealthCare Shady Grove Medical Center. Provide a
grant to Adventist Healthcare, Inc., D.B.A. Adventist
Healthcare Shady Grove Medical Center for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Adventist HealthCare Shady Grove Medical Center, including
a new care tower (Montgomery County) .................................... 500,000
1,000,000
(DD) Mount Airy Public Safety Infrastructure. Provide a grant to the
Town of Mount Airy for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of public safety
infrastructure, including an early warning system and
infrastructure improvements to the police station (Carroll
County) ........................................................................................ 500,000
(DE) Sandy Spring Friends School Infrastructure Improvements.
Provide a grant to the Sandy Spring Friends School, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Sandy Spring Friends School (Montgomery
County) ........................................................................................ 2,500,000
(DF) Francis Scott Key Elementary/Middle School # 076. Provide a
grant to Baltimore City for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of infrastructure
improvements at Francis Scott Key Elementary/Middle School
(Baltimore City) ........................................................................... 1,500,000
(DG) Oakdale Historic Chapel. Provide a grant to the Oakdale
Church Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of Oakdale Historic
Chapel including interior and exterior restoration and other
building improvements (Montgomery County) .......................... 65,000
(DH) Warrior Canine Connection. Provide a grant to Warrior Canine
Connection, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of infrastructure
– 54 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
improvements to Warrior Canine Connection facilities,
including a puppy enrichment center (Montgomery County) ... 250,000
500,000
(DI) Washington County MD Visitor Welcome Center. Provide a
grant to the Hagerstown/Washington County, Maryland
Convention and Visitors Bureau, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Washington County Maryland Visitor Welcome Center
(Washington County) .................................................................. 250,000
(DJ) Summit School New Academic Center. Provide a grant to the
Human Development Corporation t/a The Summit School for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Summit School New Academic Center,
including fire safety improvements (Anne Arundel County) .... 200,000
(DK) Howard County New Library Complex. Provide a grant to the
County Executive and County Council of Howard County for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the new central library complex at the
downtown Columbia lakefront location (Howard County) ........ 5,000,000
(DL) Glenwood Academy Infrastructure Improvements. Provide a
grant to the Glenwood Academy, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Glenwood Academy, including outdoor teacher and staff
learning and plan spaces (Carroll County) ................................ 250,000
(DM) Renaissance Park Renovations and Enhancements. Provide a
grant to the County Executive and County Council of Baltimore
County for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of Renaissance Park
(Baltimore County) ...................................................................... 400,000
(DN) Chesapeake Multicultural Resource Center. Provide a grant to
the Chesapeake Multicultural Resource Center, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Chesapeake Multicultural Resource Center
(Talbot County) ............................................................................ 123,000
– 55 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(DO) American Legion Cook–Pinkney Post 141. Provide a grant to
the American Legion Cook–Pinkney Post 141 for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of American Legion Cook–Pinkney Post 141 facilities
including infrastructure upgrades to the restroom, parking lot,
kitchen and flooring (Anne Arundel County) ............................. 150,000
(DP) Annapolis Police Department. Provide a grant to the Mayor
and City Council of the City of Annapolis for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
infrastructure improvements to Annapolis Police Department
facilities (Anne Arundel County) ................................................ 100,000
450,000
550,000
(DQ) Chase Brexton Glen Burnie Center. Provide a grant to Chase
Brexton Health Services, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Chase Brexton Glen Burnie Center expansion project,
including pharmacy and food pantry (Anne Arundel County) .. 50,000
(DR) Gloria Dei! Lutheran Church. Provide a grant to the Gloria Dei
Lutheran Church Incorporated for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Gloria Dei! Lutheran Church campus facilities, including
parking lot restoration and resurfacing (Anne Arundel
County) ........................................................................................ 90,000
(DS) Linthicum Ferndale Youth Athletic Association. Provide a
grant to the Linthicum Ferndale Youth Athletic Association,
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of Linthicum Ferndale
Youth Athletic Association facilities including field lighting
(Anne Arundel County) ............................................................... 200,000
(DT) Active Achievers Youth Center. Provide a grant to Active
Achievers Incorporated for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Active
Achievers Youth Center (Baltimore City) .................................. 250,000
– 56 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
(DU) Anonymous Immigrant Statue in Little Italy Piazza. Provide a
grant to the Italian American Organizations United, Inc. for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of an Anonymous Immigrant Statue in Little
Italy Piazza (Baltimore City) ...................................................... 50,000
(DV) Artificial Intelligence, Machine Manufacturing – Workforce
Development Academy. Provide a grant to the 1103 N.
Washington LLC for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Artificial
Intelligence, Machine Manufacturing – Workforce
Development Academy facilities (Baltimore City) ..................... 50,000
(DW) Villa Cresta Elementary School. Provide a grant to the Board
of Education of Baltimore County for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Villa Cresta Elementary School primary playground
(Baltimore County) ...................................................................... 50,000
(DX) B360 Campus. Provide a grant to the B360 Baltimore Inc. for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the B360 Campus facilities (Baltimore
City) ............................................................................................. 75,000
(DY) Babe Ruth Birthplace and Museum. Provide a grant to the
Babe Ruth Birthplace Foundation, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
infrastructure improvements at the Babe Ruth Birthplace and
Museum (Baltimore City) ........................................................... 170,000
(DZ) Belair–Edison School. Provide a grant to the Afya Baltimore,
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of Belair–Edison School
including installation and upgrades to the heating, ventilation,
and air conditioning system (Baltimore City) ............................ 150,000
(EA) Diamond Collective – Indoor Baseball Training Facility.
Provide a grant to the Baltimore Urban Baseball Association
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
– 57 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of 1205 S. Carey Street, the Diamond
Collective – Indoor Baseball Training Facility (Baltimore
City) ............................................................................................. 400,000
(EB) Fair Havens African Methodist Episcopal Church. Provide a
grant to Fair Havens African Methodist Episcopal Church for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Fair Havens African Methodist
Episcopal Church, including replacement of an outdated HVAC
system (Baltimore City) .............................................................. 37,500
(EC) Green School of Baltimore. Provide a grant to the Experimental
Environmental Education, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Green School of Baltimore including the acquisition of a new
building and conversion of that facility for educational use
(Baltimore City) ........................................................................... 150,000
(ED) Laurel Cemetery Memorial Project. Provide a grant to Parks &
People, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Laurel Cemetery
Memorial Project (Baltimore City) ............................................. 200,000
(EE) Madison Square Dome Renovation. Provide a grant to the
Mayor and City Council of Baltimore for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Madison Square Dome Renovation project including basketball
court and upgrades to lighting, scoring, and sound system
(Baltimore City) ........................................................................... 150,000
(EF) Calverton Swim Club. Provide a grant to the Calverton Swim
Club, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of infrastructure
improvements to the Calverton Swim Club (Montgomery
County) ........................................................................................ 500,000
(EG) Solo Gibbs Recreation Center. Provide a grant to the Baltimore
City Department of Recreation and Parks for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
– 58 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
Solo Gibbs Recreation Center (Baltimore City) ......................... 500,000
(EH) Springboard Community Services Youth Training Center.
Provide a grant to the Family & Children’s Services of Central
Maryland DBA Springboard Community Services for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Springboard Community Services Youth
Training Center including Commercial Kitchen (Baltimore
City) ............................................................................................. 100,000
(EI) Westport Elementary School. Provide a grant to KABOOM!
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Westport
Elementary School Playground Project (Baltimore City) .......... 170,000
(EJ) Catonsville Emergency Assistance Food Pantry. Provide a
grant to the Catonsville Emergency Assistance (CEA) for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of Catonsville Emergency Assistance Food Pantry
including the construction of a facility and infrastructure
improvements to existing facilities (Baltimore County) ............ 200,000
(EK) Pikesville High School Comfort Station. Provide a grant to the
Board of Education of Baltimore County for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Pikesville High School Comfort Station (Baltimore County) .... 300,000
(EL) Woodlawn Memorial Park. Provide a grant to Baltimore
County for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of Woodlawn Memorial
Park including infrastructure improvements to the
playground, parking lot, sidewalks and picnic areas (Baltimore
County) ........................................................................................ 200,000
(EM) Calverton School Playground. Provide a grant to the Calvert
County Day School for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of infrastructure
improvements at the Calverton School, including the
playground (Calvert County) ...................................................... 50,000
– 59 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(EN) Elkton Flood Mitigation Management. Provide a grant to the
Town of Elkton for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of infrastructure for
heavy rain and flood mitigation management and warnings
(Cecil County) .............................................................................. 100,000
(EO) Lions Camp Merrick. Provide a grant to the Lions Camp
Merrick Incorporated for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of Lions Camp
Merrick facilities (Charles County) ............................................ 40,000
(EP) Providence of Maryland. Provide a grant to Providence of
Maryland, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of Providence of
Maryland facilities, including security system and lighting
(Charles County) ......................................................................... 29,000
(EQ) Loyola School. Provide a grant to The Loyola School for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of Loyola School including maintenance of major
building systems (Baltimore City) .............................................. 100,000
(ER) Waldorf Elks Lodge No. 2421. Provide a grant to the
Benevolent & Protective Order of the Elks of the USA, Waldorf
2421 Corp., Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Waldorf Elks
Lodge No. 2421 (Charles County) ............................................... 45,000
(ES) Maryland Canna Cultural Center. Provide a grant to the
Maryland Canna Cultural Center, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Maryland Canna Cultural Center (Dorchester County) ............ 100,000
200,000
(ET) Spring Bank Senior Resource Center. Provide a grant to Spring
Bank Property LLC for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Spring Bank
Senior Resource Center (Frederick County) .............................. 200,000
– 60 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
(EU) Community Tennis Courts Renovations. Provide a grant to the
Forestville Park Homeowners Association, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of Community Tennis Courts Renovations (Prince
George’s County) ......................................................................... 100,000
(EV) Havre de Grace STAR – Sports Theatre Arts Recreation –
Centre. Provide a grant to the Mayor and City Council of Havre
de Grace for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Havre de Grace
STAR – Sports Theatre Arts Recreation – Centre (Harford
County) ........................................................................................ 200,000
(EW) 4th District Police Station. Provide a grant to Montgomery
County, Maryland for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the 4th District
Police Station (Montgomery County).......................................... 500,000
1,500,000
(EX) Carderock Springs Elementary School. Provide a grant to
Montgomery County, Maryland for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
infrastructure improvements at Carderock Springs
Elementary School, including a sound barrier (Montgomery
County) ........................................................................................ 100,000
200,000
700,000
(EY) The Diener School, Inc. Provide a grant to The Diener School,
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of The Diener School
facilities (Montgomery County) .................................................. 400,000
(EZ) Falls Road Local Park. Provide a grant to the
Maryland–National Capital Park and Planning Commission
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Falls Road Local Park, including
playground renovation with improved ADA accessibility,
support infrastructure, and site furnishings (Montgomery
County) ........................................................................................ 400,000
– 61 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
450,000
(FA) Cloverly Elementary School Playground. Provide a grant to
Montgomery County, Maryland for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Cloverly Elementary School facilities, including the
playground (Montgomery County) .............................................. 150,000
(FB) Ivymount. Provide a grant to The Ivymount School, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Ivymount facilities (Montgomery County) ...... 300,000
380,000
(FC) Montgomery County Local Public School Playgrounds. Provide
a grant to Montgomery County, Maryland for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
local public school playgrounds (Montgomery County) ............. 675,000
1,350,000
(FD) Montgomery County History Center. Provide a grant to The
Montgomery County Historical Society, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Montgomery County History Center (Montgomery County) ..... 250,000
350,000
(FE) Northwest Branch Recreational Park. Provide a grant to the
Maryland–National Capital Park and Planning Commission
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Northwest Branch Recreational Park,
including field lighting and infrastructure upgrades
(Montgomery County) ................................................................. 250,000
500,000
(FF) Northwest High School. Provide a grant to Montgomery
County, Maryland for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of Northwest High
School, including the softball field (Montgomery County) ........ 200,000
400,000
600,000
– 62 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
(FG) Olney Farmers and Artist Market. Provide a grant to the
Friends of the Olney Farmers Market for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Olney Farmers and Artist Market, including sheds
(Montgomery County) ................................................................. 5,000
(FH) Quality Childcare Development Center. Provide a grant to the
Cross Community, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Upcounty
Quality Childcare Development Center (Montgomery
County) ........................................................................................ 563,250
(FI) Recreation Center Bleacher Replacements. Provide a grant to
Montgomery County, Maryland for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
infrastructure improvements at community recreation centers,
including bleacher replacements (Montgomery County) ........... 500,000
(FJ) Recreation Center Kitchen Equipment Replacements. Provide
a grant to Montgomery County, Maryland for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
infrastructure improvements at community recreation centers,
including kitchen equipment replacements (Montgomery
County) ........................................................................................ 264,000
(FK) The Siena School. Provide a grant to The Siena School for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of The Siena School (Montgomery County) ............... 250,000
500,000
(FL) Springsong Museum. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors
of the Rachel Carson Place of Wonder, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Springsong Museum (Montgomery County) .............................. 1,000,000
(FM) Sugarland Ethno History Project – the Dorsey Site. Provide a
grant to the Sugarland Ethno–History Project, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Sugarland Ethno History Project, including
– 63 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
installing an accessible heritage trail with interpretive signage
on the Dorsey Farm in Sugarland, Maryland, and the purchase
and installation of security cameras and a fence to protect the
site (Montgomery County) .......................................................... 67,000
(FN) Takoma Park Metropolitan Branch Trail. Provide a grant to
the City of Takoma Park for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Takoma Park
Metropolitan Branch Trail upgrade (Montgomery County) ...... 300,000
(FO) Theater Pond Renovation at South Valley Park. Provide a
grant to the Montgomery Village Foundation, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Theater Pond Renovation at South Valley
Park (Montgomery County) ........................................................ 215,000
265,000
(FP) Montgomery College East County Education Center – Nursing.
Provide a grant to Montgomery College for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
infrastructure improvements for Montgomery College
(Montgomery County) ................................................................. 40,000
(FQ) Frederick Douglass High School – Main Gymnasium
Renovation. Provide a grant to Prince George’s County Public
Schools for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Frederick Douglass
High School Main Gymnasium Renovation (Prince George’s
County) ........................................................................................ 300,000
(FR) Harland Street Pool Property. Provide a grant to the City of
New Carrollton for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of Harland Street Pool
Property (Prince George’s County) ............................................. 200,000
(FS) Laurel Don’t Rest on your Laurels. Provide a grant to Laurel
Don’t Rest on your Laurels Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Laurel Don’t Rest on your Laurels facilities (Prince George’s
County) ........................................................................................ 200,000
– 64 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
(FT) Rollingcrest–Chillum Community and Aquatics Center.
Provide a grant to the Maryland–National Capital Park and
Planning Commission for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Rollingcrest–Chillum Community and Aquatics Center (Prince
George’s County) ......................................................................... 575,000
1,325,000
(FU) Town of Morningside – Department of Public Works Building.
Provide a grant to the Town of Morningside for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of a
new Town Department of Public Works Building (Prince
George’s County) ......................................................................... 150,000
(FV) Easton High School Darren Foxwell Stadium Scoreboard.
Provide a grant to Talbot County Public Schools for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Darren Foxwell Stadium Scoreboard at Easton
High School stadium scoreboard (Talbot County) ..................... 150,000
(FW) Annapolis Maritime Museum Parkscapes Initiative. Provide a
grant to Annapolis Maritime Museum, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
infrastructure improvements to the Annapolis Maritime
Museum facility and grounds (Anne Arundel County) .............. 250,000
(FX) MedChi Museum. Provide a grant to the Maryland State
Medical Society (d.b.a. MedChi) for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
infrastructure improvements to the MedChi Museum
(Baltimore City) ........................................................................... 75,000
(FY) Camp Potomac. Provide a grant to Camp Potomac for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of Camp Potomac, including the building of a new
camp office and scout retail store (Allegany County) ................ 25,000
(FZ) Chaney Cares Community Center. Provide a grant to Chaney
Care, Inc. d.b.a. Chaney Cares for the acquisition, planning,
– 65 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Chaney Cares Community Center (Anne Arundel County) ...... 500,000
(GA) Sheppard Pratt Anne Arundel County Residential
Rehabilitation Program. Provide a grant to Sheppard Pratt for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of Sheppard Pratt Anne Arundel County
Residential Rehabilitation Program facilities (Anne Arundel
County) ........................................................................................ 150,000
300,000
(GB) Cal Ripken Sr. Foundation. Provide a grant to the Cal Ripken
Sr. Foundation for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of science, technology,
engineering, and math centers installed by the Cal Ripken Sr.
Foundation (Statewide) ............................................................... 500,000
1,000,000
(GC) Patterson Park Ice Rink. Provide a grant to the Baltimore City
Department of Recreation and Parks Friends of Patterson Park
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of infrastructure
improvements at the Patterson Park ice rink (Baltimore
City) ............................................................................................. 500,000
(GD) Shawan Downs. Provide a grant to the Land Preservation
Trust, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of Shawan Downs,
including road paving to facilitate racing meets that serve the
public (Baltimore County) ........................................................... 250,000
(GE) Ancient Oaks. Provide a grant to the Baltimore Homa
Community for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of Ancient Oaks (Carroll
County) ........................................................................................ 200,000
(GF) Cambridge Creek Interceptor. Provide a grant to the City of
Cambridge for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Cambridge Creek
– 66 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
Interceptor project (Dorchester County) .................................... 250,000
(GG) Howard County Conservancy Playground. Provide a grant to
The Howard County Conservancy, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Howard County Conservancy Playground (Howard County) .... 350,000
(GH) Children’s National Hospital – Pediatric Comprehensive Pain
Management Program. Provide a grant to the Children’s
Hospital dba Children’s National Hospital for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of a
new Pediatric Comprehensive Pain Management Program
Center at the Children’s National Hospital (Montgomery
County) ........................................................................................ 250,000
500,000
(GI) Bethany House. Provide a grant to the Montgomery Housing
Partnership, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of infrastructure
improvements at a retirement house (Montgomery County) .... 200,000
(GJ) Damascus Streetscape Improvement Plan. Provide a grant to
Montgomery County, Maryland for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Damascus Streetscape Improvement Plan, including
infrastructure improvements to the downtown streetscape
(Montgomery County) ................................................................. 100,000
(GK) Truman T. Semans Center for Oyster Restoration and
Innovation. Provide a grant to the Chesapeake Bay Foundation
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of Truman T. Semans Center for Oyster
Restoration and Innovation facilities, including solar panels
and electric vehicle charging stations (Anne Arundel
County) ........................................................................................ 250,000
500,000
(GL) Howard House Revitalization. Provide a grant to the HH
Owner LLC for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the downtown Elkton
– 67 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
revitalization of the Historic Howard Hotel and adjacent
fire–damaged structures (Cecil County) .................................... 500,000
(GM) CCI Health Services Primary Access Point and PACE Center.
Provide a grant to CCI Health Services, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
CCI Health Services access point and PACE Center project
(Prince George’s County) ............................................................. 300,000
(GN) Watersedge Park. Provide a grant to the Watersedge
Community Association County Executive and County Council
of Baltimore County for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of Watersedge Park,
including bathroom renovations (Baltimore County) ................ 50,000
150,000
(GO) Haneefiya Adult Medical Day Care Center. Provide a grant to
Haneefiya America for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Haneefiya
Adult Medical Day Care Center (Montgomery County) ............ 200,000
270,000
(GP) Town of Laytonsville Trail. Provide a grant to the Town of
Laytonsville for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of Town of Laytonsville
Trail (Montgomery County) ........................................................ 150,000
(GQ) CASA Welcome Centers. Provide a grant to CASA de
Maryland, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of welcome center
facilities, including security upgrades (Statewide) .................... 1,500,000
3,000,000
(GR) Prince George’s Gateway Development Authority. Provide a
grant to the Prince George’s Gateway Development Authority
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of neighborhood revitalization projects in
target areas (Prince George’s County) ........................................ 500,000
(GS) KEYS Community Healing Center. Provide a grant to KEYS
– 68 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
Development LLC for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of a community
campus (Baltimore City) ............................................................. 250,000
(GT) Upcounty Hub Space Expansion. Provide a grant to The
Upcounty Hub Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of Upcounty Hub
Space Expansion (Montgomery County) .................................... 125,000
(GU) Stonestreet Corridor. Provide a grant to the City of Rockville
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of infrastructure improvements for the
Stonestreet Corridor Complete Streets project along North
Stonestreet Avenue and Park Road (Montgomery County) ...... 100,000
(GV) Kingsville Elementary School. Provide a grant to the Board of
Education of Baltimore County for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Kingsville Elementary School including replacement of the
primary playground (Baltimore County) .................................... 100,000
(GW) Riverworks. Provide a grant to the Riverworks Art Center for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of Riverworks Art Center facilities
(Montgomery County) ................................................................. 100,000
(GX) Route 198 Safety Improvements. Provide a grant to
Montgomery County, Maryland in coordination with the State
Highway Administration for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of safety
improvements on Route 198 from US Route 29 to Route 650
New Hampshire Avenue (Montgomery County) ........................ 200,000
(GY) Blackburn Road Safety Beacons. Provide a grant to
Montgomery County, Maryland for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
safety beacons on Blackburn Road in Burtonsville
(Montgomery County) ................................................................. 75,000
– 69 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(GZ) Olney Boys and Girls Club. Provide a grant to the Olney Boys
and Girls Community Sports Association, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of Olney Boys and Girls Club facilities, including
lighting and fields (Montgomery County) .................................. 300,000
(HA) Neighborhood Community Track and Field. Provide a grant to
the Melvin J. Berman Hebrew Academy for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Neighborhood Community Track and Field at the Berman
Hebrew Academy (Montgomery County) ................................... 100,000
(HB) Indian Cultural Association Office Initiative. Provide a grant
to the Indian Cultural Association of Howard for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Indian Cultural Association Office Initiative
including infrastructure improvements for the Indian Cultural
Association facilities (Howard County) ...................................... 300,000
(HC) Clarksburg Yard. Provide a grant to the Fairfax Community
Church of God for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Clarksburg
Yard project (Montgomery County) ............................................ 175,000
225,000
(HD) Arlington Echo Marsh Walk. Provide a grant to the Anne
Arundel County Public Schools for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Arlington Echo Marsh Walk (Anne Arundel County) ................ 450,000
(HE) Eastern Shore Regional Medical Center – Water and Sewer
Infrastructure. Provide a grant to Talbot County, Maryland for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Eastern Shore Regional Medical
Center project, including water and sewer infrastructure
improvements (Talbot County) ................................................... 500,000
(HF) Temple Emanuel in Kensington. Provide a grant to the Temple
Emanuel for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
– 70 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
improvement, and capital equipping of Temple Emanuel in
Kensington including security related infrastructure
(Montgomery County) ................................................................. 200,000
(HG) Young Artists of America. Provide a grant to Young Artists of
America, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of a new headquarters
and community arts hub (Montgomery County) ........................ 1,500,000
(HH) Food & Friends. Provide a grant to Food and Friends, Inc. for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of infrastructure improvements for the Food
& Friends facility (Out–of–State) ............................................... 350,000
(HI) Regenerative Medicine and Advanced Manufacturing. Provide
a grant to the Maryland Technology Development Corporation
to provide grants for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of regenerative
medicine and advanced manufacturing projects (Statewide) .... 2,000,000
(HJ) Silver Spring/Bethesda Ride On Depot. Provide a grant to
Montgomery County, Maryland for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Silver Spring/Bethesda Ride On Depot (Montgomery
County) ........................................................................................ 25,000
250,000
(HK) Sensitive Compartmented Information Facilities. Provide a
grant to the Maryland Economic Development Corporation for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of sensitive compartmented information
facilities (St. Mary’s County) ...................................................... 1,000,000
(HL) Bowleys Quarters Volunteer Fire Department. Provide a grant
to the Community Volunteer Fire Department of Bowleys
Quarters and Vicinity, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Bowleys Quarters Fire Station and Community Center
(Baltimore County) ...................................................................... 200,000
– 71 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(HM) Chesapeake High School Field House. Provide a grant to the
Anne Arundel County Public Schools for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Chesapeake High School Field House (Anne Arundel
County) ........................................................................................ 50,000
(HN) Maryland Aerospace Heritage Center. Provide a grant to the
Glenn L. Martin Maryland Aviation Museum, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Maryland Aerospace Heritage Center
(Baltimore County) ...................................................................... 50,000
450,000
750,000
(HO) Overlea High School Stadium Scoreboard. Provide a grant to
the Board of Education of Baltimore County for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of a
new scoreboard and other facility improvements for Overlea
High School’s stadium (Baltimore County) ................................ 125,000
(HP) High Ridge Head Start. Provide a grant to Howard County for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the High Ridge Head Start facilities,
including ADA restroom renovations (Howard County) ............ 100,000
500,000
(HQ) Richardson Maritime Museum. Provide a grant to the
Richardson Maritime Museum Incorporated for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Richardson Maritime Museum (Dorchester
County) ........................................................................................ 80,000
(HR) Camp Attaway. Provide a grant to Camp Attaway, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of Camp Attaway (Howard County) .......................... 25,000
(HS) The Sanctuary Collective. Provide a grant to The Sanctuary
Collective, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of The Sanctuary
– 72 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
Collective building acquisition and capital improvements
project (Baltimore City) ............................................................... 215,000
365,000
(HT) Maugansville Goodwill Volunteer Fire Company. Provide a
grant to the Maugansville Goodwill Volunteer Fire Company,
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Maugansville
Goodwill Volunteer Fire Company, including banquet facility
improvements (Washington County) .......................................... 35,000
(HU) Wisp Ski Patrol Headquarters. Provide a grant to Wisp Resort
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Wisp Ski Patrol Headquarters for
upgrading the building and facilities to allow for proper patient
care (Garrett County) .................................................................. 25,000
(HV) Flintstone Volunteer Fire Company. Provide a grant to the
Flintstone Volunteer Fire Company for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Flintstone Volunteer Fire Company including safety upgrades
(Allegany County) ........................................................................ 50,000
(HW) Historic Christ Church. Provide a grant to Friends of Historic
Christ Church for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Historic Christ
Church, including exterior painting of Church Building and
interior renovation of the Hall (Queen Anne’s County) ............. 25,000
(HX) Christ Church Parish Kent Island. Provide a grant to the
Christ Church Parish Kent Island for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Christ Church Parish Kent Island (Queen Anne’s County) ...... 75,000
175,000
(HY) Caroline Business Resource Center. Provide a grant to the
Caroline County Chamber of Commerce, Incorporated for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Caroline Business Resource Center (Caroline
County) ........................................................................................ 50,000
– 73 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(HZ) New La Plata Library. Provide a grant to the Mayor and Town
Council of the Town of La Plata for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
New La Plata Library. Notwithstanding any other provision of
law, this grant may be used only for the New La Plata Library
and may not be used for any other project in Charles County
(Charles County) ......................................................................... 800,000
(IA) Town of Midland Town Hall. Provide a grant to the Town of
Midland for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of Town of Midland Town
Hall (Allegany County) ............................................................... 50,000
(IB) Charles County Circuit Courthouse. Provide a grant to the
County Commissioners of Charles County for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Charles County Circuit Courthouse (Charles County) .............. 500,000
(IC) Long Branch Community Recreation Center. Provide a grant
to Montgomery County, Maryland for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Long Branch Community Recreation Center (Montgomery
County) ........................................................................................ 150,000
(ID) Town of Hancock Town Hall. Provide a grant to the Town of
Hancock for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Town of Hancock
Town Hall renovations (Washington County) ............................ 300,000
(IE) Town of Elkton Water Filtration Plant. Provide a grant to the
Town of Elkton for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Town of
Elkton’s Water Filtration Plant (Cecil County) ......................... 500,000
(IF) North Avenue Market Redevelopment. Provide a grant to the
Central Baltimore Partnership, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
North Avenue Market (Baltimore City) ..................................... 2,000,000
– 74 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
(IG) Boys and Girls Club of Southern Maryland Southern Maryland
Tri–County Community Action Committee. Provide a grant to
the Southern Maryland Tri–County Community Action
Committee, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Carver Center
Boys and Girls Club (St. Mary’s County) Southern Maryland
Tri–County Community Action Committee facilities (Charles
County) ......................................................................................... 100,000
(IH) God’s Best Family Early Childhood Education. Provide a grant
to God’s Best Family, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the God’s Best
Family Early Childhood Education facilities (Baltimore
City) ............................................................................................. 600,000
(II) SpringForward Farms – Laurel. Provide a grant to
SpringForward Ventures, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
SpringForward Farms – Laurel property (Howard County) ..... 100,000
148,000
(IJ) NonProfit Collaborative of Howard County. Provide a grant to
the NonProfit Collaborative of Howard County Howard County
Housing Commission for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the NonProfit
Collaborative of Howard County (Howard County) ................... 225,000
450,000
(IK) Lakewood Elementary School Playground. Provide a grant to
KABOOM! for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of Lakewood Elementary
School Schoolyard Playground (Baltimore City) ........................ 50,000
(IL) New Market Town Hall. Provide a grant to the Town of New
Market for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the New Town Hall
Acquisition & Renovation project (Frederick County) ............... 292,000
(IM) Great Frederick Fair. Provide a grant to the Great Frederick
– 75 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Fair, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of The Great Frederick
Fair, including the construction of a permanent stage roof
(Frederick County) ...................................................................... 350,000
(IN) Housing Production Fund. Provide a grant to the Housing
Opportunities Commission of Montgomery County for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of affordable housing projects through the Housing
Production Fund (Montgomery County) .................................... 290,000
(IO) Cider Mill Recreational Assets. Provide a grant to the Housing
Opportunities Commission of Montgomery County for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Cider Mill Recreational Assets, including
soccer fields (Montgomery County) ............................................ 100,000
(IP) Muslim Community Center Community Kitchen. Provide a
grant to The Muslim Community Center, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Muslim Community Center, including a
community kitchen (Montgomery County) ................................ 100,000
(IQ) Sheppard Pratt Rockville School. Provide a grant to the
Sheppard Pratt Rockville School for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Sheppard Pratt Rockville School (Montgomery County) ........... 150,000
220,000
420,000
(IR) Baltimore Washington Medical Center – Emergency
Department Patient Inflow Initiative. Provide a grant to the
University of Maryland Baltimore Washington Medical Center,
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Baltimore
Washington Medical Center emergency department to improve
patient inflow (Anne Arundel County) ....................................... 200,000
280,000
(IS) Behavioral Health Services – Prince George’s County. Provide a
– 76 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
grant to the Maryland Community Health Resources
Commission for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of facilities to provide comprehensive
behavioral health services for adolescents and young adults in
Prince George’s County (Prince George’s County)........................ 20,000,000
(IT) Long Branch Main Street Neighborhood Retail Expansion.
Provide a grant to the Montgomery Housing Partnership, Inc.
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of Long Branch Main Street Neighborhood
Retail Expansion project including acquisition of property and
infrastructure improvements to plumbing, electrical and
outdoor space (Montgomery County) ............................................ 150,000
(IU) Martin Lane Shared Use Path. Provide a grant to Montgomery
County, Maryland for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of Martin Lane Shared
Use Path (Montgomery County) ................................................... 750,000
(IV) North Bethesda Metro Station. Provide a grant to Montgomery
County, Maryland for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the North Bethesda
Metro Station, including the northern entrance (Montgomery
County) .......................................................................................... 500,000
(IW) Strathmore Hall Performing Arts Center. Provide a grant to
Montgomery County, Maryland for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Strathmore Hall Performing Arts Center, including roof
replacement (Montgomery County) .............................................. 1,350,000
1,850,000
(IX) Adventure Theatre MTC Theatre and Lobby. Provide a grant to
the Adventure Theatre Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Adventure Theatre MTC Theatre and Lobby (Montgomery
County) .......................................................................................... 50,000
(IY) New Montevue Senior Living Facility. Provide a grant to
Frederick County, Maryland for the acquisition, planning,
– 77 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
New Montevue Senior Living Facility (Frederick County) .......... 3,000,000
(IZ) Volunteer Marine Station 57. Provide a grant to Prince George’s
County Volunteer Marine Fire and Rescue Department, Inc. for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of Volunteer Marine Station 57 (Prince
George’s County) ........................................................................... 50,000
(JA) Prince George’s County Boys & Girls Clubs: Laurel Clubhouse.
Provide a grant to the Prince George’s County Boys & Girls Club
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of Prince George’s County Boys & Girls
Clubs facilities including the Laurel Clubhouse (Prince George’s
County) .......................................................................................... 1,000,000
(JB) Prince George’s County Boys & Girls Clubs: New Carrollton
Clubhouse at Beckett Field. Provide a grant to the Prince
George’s County Boys & Girls Club Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Prince George’s County Boys & Girls Clubs facilities including
the New Carrollton Clubhouse at Beckett Field (Prince George’s
County) .......................................................................................... 1,000,000
(JC) Police Athletic League Boxing Facility and After School Space
at District VI Station. Provide a grant to the Prince George’s
County Police Athletic League for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Police Athletic League Boxing Facility and After School Space
at District VI Station (Prince George’s County) ........................... 100,000
(JD) Police Athletic League Boxing Facility and After School Space
at District III Station. Provide a grant to the Prince George’s
County Police Athletic League, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Police Athletic League Boxing Facility and After School Space
at District III Station (Prince George’s County) .......................... 100,000
(JE) Ferndale Community Club. Provide a grant to the Ferndale
Community Club, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
– 78 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of Ferndale Community
Club (Anne Arundel County) ........................................................ 125,000
(JF) University Park Elementary School. Provide a grant to Prince
George’s County Public Schools for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
University Park Elementary School, including a playground
renovation (Prince George’s County) ............................................ 150,000
(JG) Annapolis Bomb Squad Fully–Confined Explosive Storage
Vessel. Provide a grant to the City of Annapolis for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of Annapolis Bomb Squad Fully–Confined Explosive
Storage Vessel (Anne Arundel County) ........................................ 100,000
(JH) Maryland Lynching Memorial Project. Provide a grant to the
Maryland Lynching Memorial Project Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Maryland Lynching Memorial Project facilities (Baltimore
County) .......................................................................................... 300,000
(JI) Fallstaff Elementary/Middle School. Provide a grant to
Baltimore City Public Schools for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Fallstaff Elementary/Middle School, including the elevator
project (Baltimore City) ................................................................ 650,000
(JJ) Renovations to Senior Dog Sanctuary of Maryland. Provide a
grant to the Senior Dog Sanctuary of Maryland, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Senior Dog Sanctuary of Maryland facilities
(Anne Arundel County) ................................................................. 50,000
(JK) Delta Community Center. Provide a grant to the Baltimore
Alumnae Chapter of Delta Sigma Theta Sorority, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of Delta Community Center (Baltimore City) ............. 200,000
400,000
– 79 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(JL) Center for Social Impact – Irvington. Provide a grant to the
Cooperative Community Development, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Center for Social Impact – Irvington project (Baltimore City) .... 250,000
0
(JM) Youth Business and Workforce Development Center Cafe.
Provide a grant to the Young Successful Leaders Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of Youth Business and Workforce Development
Center Cafe (Baltimore City) ........................................................ 250,000
(JN) Violetville Elementary–Middle School. Provide a grant to
KABOOM! for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of Violetville Elementary–Middle School
including a new playground (Baltimore City) ............................. 100,000
(JO) Zeta Sigma Foundation Community Center 2.0. Provide a grant
to the Zeta Sigma Foundation, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Zeta Sigma Foundation Community Center 2.0 project
(Baltimore City) ............................................................................ 100,000
(JP) Edgewood Elementary School Playground. Provide a grant to
the Greater Mount Holly Community Development Corporation
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of Edgewood Elementary School including
playground replacement (Baltimore City) ................................... 100,000
(JQ) Queensbury Park and Playground Renovation. Provide a grant
to the Queensbury Park Community Association for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Queensbury Park and Playground Renovation
(Baltimore City) ............................................................................ 75,000
(JR) B–Spirit–A2Y–15. Provide a grant to the B–Spirit–A2Y–15 Inc.
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the B–Spirit–A2Y–15 youth program
facilities (Baltimore City) ............................................................. 30,000
– 80 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
40,000
(JS) Leith Walk Elementary Tot Lot Playground. Provide a grant to
KABOOM! for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of Leith Walk Elementary Tot Lot
Playground (Baltimore City) ........................................................ 200,000
0
(JT) Elks Camp Barrett. Provide a grant to the Maryland Delaware
and District of Columbia Elks Association for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of Elks
Camp Barrett to include renovation of the electrical system grid
(Anne Arundel County) ................................................................. 100,000
(JU) Goshen Farm and Educational Center – Farm House
Restoration. Provide a grant to the Goshen Farm Preservation
Society, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Historic Goshen Farm and
Educational Center – Farm House Restoration project (Anne
Arundel County) ........................................................................... 80,000
(JV) Severna Park Library Renovation. Provide a grant to the Public
Library Association of Annapolis & Anne Arundel County
Incorporated for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of Severna Park Library renovation
project (Anne Arundel County) ..................................................... 200,000
(JW) Purple Line Neighborhood Connectivity. Provide a grant to the
Town of Riverdale Park for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of Purple Line
Neighborhood Connectivity (Prince George’s County) ................. 325,000
(JX) Oxon Hill Recreation Club. Provide a grant to the Oxon Hill
Recreation Club, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the continuing
renovations of the outdoor Olympic swimming pool complex
(Prince George’s County) .............................................................. 500,000
(JY) B’More Clubhouse. Provide a grant to the B’More Clubhouse,
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
– 81 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of B’More Clubhouse, including historic
cornice and roof repair (Baltimore City) ...................................... 145,000
(JZ) Edmonston Sidewalk Improvement. Provide a grant to the
Town of Edmonston for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of sidewalks on one side of
the street in the residential neighborhoods (Prince George’s
County) .......................................................................................... 400,000
(KA) The Lord’s Church Outreach Center. Provide a grant to the
Lord’s Church Outreach Center for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of The
Lord’s Church Outreach Center (Baltimore City) ....................... 355,000
505,000
(KB) Viola Family Support Center. Provide a grant to the Howell
Celebrating Lives Viola Family Support Center, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Viola Family Support Center, including
roofing repairs, parking lot, and signage (Baltimore City) ......... 190,000
(KC) Bishop McNamara High School. Provide a grant to the Bishop
McNamara High School for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of Bishop McNamara
High School Classroom Renovation Project (Prince George’s
County) .......................................................................................... 250,000
(KD) Ivy Village Incubator for Nonprofit Excellence – Ivy VINE.
Provide a grant to the Ivy Community Charities of Prince
George’s County, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Ivy Village
Incubator for Nonprofit Excellence – Ivy VINE facilities (Prince
George’s County) ........................................................................... 250,000
(KE) Montgomery County Pride Center Headquarters Development
and Community Resource Hub. Provide a grant to the
Montgomery County Pride Center, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Montgomery County Pride Center Headquarters Development
– 82 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
and Community Resource Hub (Montgomery County) ................ 470,000
(KF) Children’s Inn at the National Institutes of Health – Medical
Isolation Wing. Provide a grant to the Children’s Inn at the
National Institutes of Health, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of an
elevator (conveying system) in a new residential wing of The
Children’s Inn at the National Institutes of Health (Montgomery
County) .......................................................................................... 50,000
(KG) Community Services for Autistic Adults and Children
Community School of Maryland. Provide a grant to the
Community Services for Autistic Adults and Children, Inc. for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Community Services for Autistic Adults
and Children Community School of Maryland expansion
(Montgomery County) ................................................................... 400,000
450,000
(KH) Direct Support Professionals – DSP Training Academy at
Jubilee Association of Maryland. Provide a grant to the Jubilee
Association of Maryland, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of DSP
Training Academy facilities (Montgomery County) .................... 50,000
165,000
(KI) Emma’s Torch – The Kitchen We Build Together. Provide a
grant to Emma’s Torch for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Emma’s Torch
project – The Kitchen We Build Together (Montgomery
County) .......................................................................................... 350,000
(KJ) Historic C&O Canal. Provide a grant to the C&O Canal Trust,
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of three failing historic culverts in the
C&O Canal National Historical Park, in District 16
(Montgomery County) ................................................................... 150,000
(KK) Historic Howes Farm Barn. Provide a grant to the Nepal
Education and Cultural Center for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
– 83 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Historic Howes Farm Barn (Montgomery County) ...................... 50,000
0
(KL) Jean Banks Park. Provide a grant to the Brownstones at Chevy
Chase Lake HOA for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Jean Banks Park
facilities (Montgomery County) .................................................... 40,000
(KM) Johnson’s Local Park. Provide a grant to the
Maryland–National Capital Park and Planning Commission
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of Johnson’s Local Park (Montgomery
County) .......................................................................................... 900,000
(KN) Martin Luther King Jr. Recreational Park. Provide a grant to
the Maryland–National Capital Park and Planning
Commission for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of Martin Luther King Jr. Recreational
Park (Montgomery County) .......................................................... 100,000
300,000
(KO) Wheaton Forest Local Park. Provide a grant to the
Maryland–National Capital Park and Planning Commission
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Wheaton Forest Local Park
(Montgomery County) ................................................................... 460,000
625,000
(KP) Anne Arundel County Fair. Provide a grant to the Anne Arundel
County Fair, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Anne Arundel
County Fair, including stormwater and sediment control ponds
(Anne Arundel County) ................................................................. 600,000
(KQ) Peerless Rens Club. Provide a grant to the Peerless Rens Club,
Inc. of Eastport for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of Peerless Rens Club –
Safety and Accessibility Improvements project (Anne Arundel
County) .......................................................................................... 150,000
– 84 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
(KR) The Light House – Safe Harbour Energy Expansion. Provide a
grant to the Light House, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of The
Light House – Safe Harbour Energy Expansion project (Anne
Arundel County) ........................................................................... 150,000
(KS) 47th Ave Stormwater Mitigation. Provide a grant to the Town
of Riverdale Park for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the 47th Ave
Stormwater Mitigation Project (Prince George’s County) ........... 300,000
(KT) Fidos for Freedom. Provide a grant to the Fidos for Freedom,
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Fidos for Freedom property,
including parking lot repaving and upgrades (Prince George’s
County) .......................................................................................... 600,000
(KU) Laurel Advocacy and Referral Services. Provide a grant to the
Laurel Advocacy and Referral Services, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Laurel Advocacy and Referral Services Renovation Project
(Prince George’s County) .............................................................. 325,000
(KV) Heritage Society of Essex and Middle River Museum. Provide a
grant to the Heritage Society of Essex and Middle River, Inc. for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Heritage Society of Essex and Middle
River Museum (Baltimore County) .............................................. 39,000
89,000
(KW) Day Village Townhomes. Provide a grant to the Kent MCAP
Holdings, L.P. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of Day Village Townhomes
facilities (Baltimore County) ........................................................ 250,000
(KX) Garrett–Jacobs Mansion. Provide a grant to the Garrett–Jacobs
Mansion Endowment Fund, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
– 85 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Garrett–Jacobs Mansion Roof & Skylights Replacement and
Floors Repairs Project (Baltimore City) ....................................... 250,000
(KY) Buddy Attick Park Path and Performance Venue. Provide a
grant to the City of Greenbelt, MD for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Buddy Attick Park Path and Performance Venue (Prince
George’s County) ........................................................................... 300,000
(KZ) City of Hyattsville Commercial District Revitalization and
Placemaking. Provide a grant to the City of Hyattsville for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of City of Hyattsville Commercial District
Revitalization and Placemaking Initiative (Prince George’s
County) .......................................................................................... 300,000
(LA) Park Avenue Median Park Capital Improvement Project.
Provide a grant to the Bolton Hill Community Association for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Park Avenue Median Park Capital
Improvement Project (Baltimore City) ......................................... 190,000
(LB) Greenway Avenue Stadium. Provide a grant to the Greenway
Avenue Stadium Capital Improvement Fund for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Greenway Avenue Stadium, including ADA
compatibility improvements (Allegany County) .......................... 200,000
(LC) Moveable Feast. Provide a grant to the Moveable Feast, Inc. for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Moveable Feast Relocation and
Expansion project (Baltimore City) .............................................. 200,000
(LD) Security Woodlawn Business Association Headquarters.
Provide a grant to the Security Woodlawn Business Association,
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Security Woodlawn Business
Association Headquarters (Baltimore County) ............................ 100,000
180,000
– 86 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
(LE) Oakland Youth Baseball and Softball Fields Restoration.
Provide a grant to the Oakland Youth Baseball, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Oakland Youth Baseball and Softball Fields
Restoration (Garrett County) ....................................................... 100,000
(LF) Gentle Giants Center for Connection. Provide a grant to the
Gentle Giants Draft Horse Rescue Society, Ltd for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of Gentle Giants Center for Connection (Howard
County) .......................................................................................... 250,000
(LG) Korean Community Service Center of Greater Washington –
Silver Spring Office. Provide a grant to the Korean Community
Service Center of Greater Washington, Incorporated for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of Korean Community Service Center of Greater
Washington, including infrastructure improvements to the
Silver Spring Office (Montgomery County) ................................. 25,000
(LH) Asian–American and Pacific–Islander Community Center.
Provide a grant to the Asian–American and
Pacific–Islander Community Center for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Asian–American and Pacific–Islander Community Center
(Baltimore County) ....................................................................... 50,000
(LI) Twinbrook and Dogwood Park Pedestrian Bridge. Provide a
grant to the Mayor and Council of the City of Rockville for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Twinbrook and Dogwood Park Pedestrian
Bridge Project (Montgomery County) ........................................... 100,000
(LJ) Western Montgomery County Pool Bubble. Provide a grant to
the Town of Poolesville for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of Western Montgomery
County Pool Bubble (Montgomery County) .................................. 50,000
(LK) Capitol Heights Stormwater Management. Provide a grant to
the Mayor and Council of The Town of Capitol Heights for the
– 87 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of Town of Capitol Heights Stormwater Management
(Prince George’s County) .............................................................. 500,000
(LL) Maryland Therapeutic Riding Center. Provide a grant to the
Maryland Therapeutic Riding, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Maryland Therapeutic Riding facilities, including septic system
installation (Anne Arundel County) ............................................ 100,000
350,000
(LM) National Center on Institutions and Alternatives – Home
Accessibility. Provide a grant to the National Center on
Institutions and Alternatives, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
National Center on Institutions and Alternatives facilities
(Prince George’s County) .............................................................. 120,000
(LN) Easterseals Camp Fairlee Dining Hall. Provide a grant to the
Easterseals Delaware & Maryland’s Eastern Shore, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Easterseals Camp Fairlee Dining Hall
expansion project (Kent County) .................................................. 450,000
(LO) Radcliffe Creek School. Provide a grant to the Radcliffe Creek
School, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of Radcliffe Creek School (Kent
County) .......................................................................................... 140,000
40,000
(LP) Hard Bargain Farm Environmental Campus. Provide a grant
to the Alice Ferguson Foundation for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Hard Bargain Farm Environmental Campus (Prince George’s
County) .......................................................................................... 300,000
350,000
(LQ) Maplewood Alta–Vista Local Park. Provide a grant to the
Maryland–National Capital Park and Planning Commission
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
– 88 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of Maplewood Alta–Vista Local Park
(Montgomery County) ................................................................... 250,000
(LR) Dinosaur Park. Provide a grant to the Maryland–National
Capital Park and Planning Commission for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Dinosaur Park (Prince George’s County) ..................................... 2,000,000
(LS) Gunpowder Golf Course. Provide a grant to the
Maryland–National Capital Park and Planning Commission
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Gunpowder Golf Course (Prince
George’s County) ........................................................................... 2,000,000
(LT) Suitland Cultural Arts Implementation Project. Provide a grant
to the Maryland–National Capital Park and Planning
Commission for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Suitland Cultural Arts
Implementation Project (Prince George’s County) ....................... 1,000,000
(LU) Lanham Boys and Girls Club Sports Park Renovation. Provide
a grant to the Lanham Boys and Girls Club, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of Lanham Boys and Girls Club Sports park,
including new field lights (Prince George’s County) ................... 350,000
(LV) Ellicott City Safe and Sound Flood Mitigation Program.
Provide a grant to Howard County, Maryland for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of flood mitigation projects in Ellicott City (Howard
County) .......................................................................................... 1,500,000
2,000,000
(LW) Braden Field. Provide a grant to the City of Greenbelt for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of Braden Field, including renovations (Prince
George’s County) ........................................................................... 1,000,000
(LX) Sinclair Lane Elementary School. Provide a grant to the
– 89 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Baltimore City Public Schools for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Sinclair Lane Elementary School including locker renovation
(Baltimore City) ............................................................................ 60,000
105,000
(LY) Veterans of Foreign Wars Post No. 9619. Provide a grant to the
Veterans of Foreign War, Scott–Johnson–Collins Post No. 9619,
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Veterans of Foreign Wars Post No.
9619 property (Prince George’s County) ....................................... 57,500
(LZ) Hicks Hope House Renovations. Provide a grant to the Hicks
Hope House, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of Hicks Hope House,
including renovations (Anne Arundel County) ............................ 50,000
(MA) Prospect Hill Cemetery. Provide a grant to the Friends of
Prospect Hill Cemetery of Towson, Inc for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Prospect Hill Cemetery (Baltimore County)................................. 250,000
300,000
(MB) Kenneth S. Ulman Innovation Hub. Provide a grant to Howard
County, Maryland for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of infrastructure
improvements to the Kenneth S. Ulman Innovation Hub
(Howard County) .......................................................................... 100,000
(MC) Love Wins Movement. Provide a grant to the Love Wins
Movement, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Love Wins
Movement project (Anne Arundel County) ................................... 50,000
(MD) Kensington Town Hall. Provide a grant to the Town of
Kensington for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Kensington Town Hall
(Montgomery County) ................................................................... 100,000
– 90 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
(ME) Gaithersburg Municipal Complex. Provide a grant to the City of
Gaithersburg for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Gaithersburg
Municipal Complex (Montgomery County) .................................. 250,000
(MF) Womans Club of Laurel. Provide a grant to Womans Club of
Laurel Incorporated for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of infrastructure
improvements for the Womans Club of Laurel project, including
a furnace (Prince George’s County) .............................................. 25,000
(MG) Baltimore Center Stage. Provide a grant to the Center Stage
Associates Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of Baltimore Center Stage
(Baltimore City) ............................................................................ 150,000
225,000
(MH) Ashland Community Development Corporation. Provide a
grant to the Ashland Community Development Corporation for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Ashland Community Development
Corporation project (Baltimore City) ........................................... 50,000
(MI) Greenbelt Museum Visitor & Education Center Project. Provide
a grant to the City of Greenbelt for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Greenbelt Museum Visitor & Education Center Project (Prince
George’s County) ........................................................................... 300,000
(MJ) Greenbelt Community Center Elevator Replacement Project.
Provide a grant to the City of Greenbelt for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Greenbelt Community Center Elevator Replacement Project
(Prince George’s County) .............................................................. 200,000
(MK) Art House. Provide a grant to the Mayor and City Council of
Baltimore City for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Art House project to
construct housing for artists (Baltimore City) ............................. 350,000
– 91 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ML) Greater Baltimore Medical Center. Provide a grant to the Board
of Directors of Greater Baltimore Medical Center Healthcare,
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the renovation of the wound center at
the Greater Baltimore Medical Center facility (Baltimore
County) .......................................................................................... 2,000,000
(MM) Well Relocation Project. Provide a grant to the Town of
Chesapeake Beach for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Well Relocation
project (Calvert County) ............................................................... 600,000
(MN) New Facility for Next One Up. Provide a grant to the New
Facility for Next One Up Foundation, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of a
new facility for Next One Up (Baltimore City) ............................ 500,000
(MO) Warfield Community Development Corporation. Provide a
grant to Warfield Community Development Corporation for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of infrastructure improvements of the Warfield
Community Development Corporation project (Howard Carroll
County) .......................................................................................... 500,000
(MP) Pallotti High School Black Box Theater. Provide a grant to the
St. Vincent Pallotti High School, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Pallotti High School, including the Black Box Theater (Prince
George’s County) ........................................................................... 300,000
(MQ) Edmondson–Westside High School. Provide a grant to the
Baltimore City Public Schools for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
infrastructure improvements at Edmondson–Westside High
School (Baltimore City) ................................................................ 1,000,000
(MR) Dayspring Learning and Innovation Center. Provide a grant to
the Dayspring, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
– 92 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
improvement, and capital equipping of Dayspring Learning
and Innovation Center project (Baltimore City) .......................... 250,000
(MS) Liberty Elementary School. Provide a grant to Baltimore City
Public Schools for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of infrastructure
improvements at Liberty Elementary School (Baltimore City) ... 50,000
(MT) Shiloh Christian Community Church. Provide a grant to the
Shiloh Christian Community Church of Baltimore City for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of Shiloh Christian Community Church, including a
parking lot (Baltimore City) ......................................................... 45,000
(MU) Baltimore Polytechnic High School Foundation for Scoreboard
and Athletic Field Improvements. Provide a grant to the
Baltimore Polytechnic Institute Foundation, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of Baltimore Polytechnic High School, including for
scoreboard and athletic field infrastructure improvements
(Baltimore City) ............................................................................ 240,000
(MV) Centreville Wastewater Treatment Plant. Provide a grant to the
Town Council of Centreville for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
wastewater treatment plant upgrade project to meet enhanced
nutrient reduction requirements (Queen Anne’s County) ............ 600,000
(MW) Ashburton Community Coffee House and Meeting Space.
Provide a grant to the Ashburton Area Development
Corporation for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Ashburton Community Coffee
House and Meeting Space (Baltimore City) ................................. 100,000
(MX) Calvert Station. Provide a grant to North Calvert JV LLC for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of Calvert Station located on the 2100 block
of North Calvert Street (Baltimore City) ...................................... 150,000
(MY) Child Care Renovations – Playgrounds. Provide a grant to
– 93 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Montgomery County, Maryland for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
infrastructure improvements at child care facilities, including
playgrounds (Montgomery County).............................................. 500,000
(MZ) Living Classrooms Foundation – Historic Ships Infrastructure.
Provide a grant to the Living Classrooms Foundation, Inc. for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of infrastructure improvements for the Living
Classrooms Foundation – Historic Ships (Baltimore City) ......... 1,000,000
(NA) Adventist Health – New Fort Washington Facility. Provide a
grant to Adventist HealthCare Fort Washington Medical
Center, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of a new facility for Adventist Health in
Fort Washington (Prince George’s County) .................................. 1,000,000
(NB) Improving Food Access and Health at the Factory. Provide a
grant to the West Baltimore Renaissance Foundation, Inc. for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of a former kitchen and manufacturing space
into a teaching and production kitchen (Baltimore City) ........... 500,000
(NC) Maryland City Neighbors – Tot Lot. Provide a grant to
Maryland City Neighbors Corp. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
removal of a building and conversion of the space into a tot lot
(Anne Arundel County) ................................................................. 200,000
(ND) Sheppard Pratt Children’s Psychiatric Hospital. Provide a
grant to Sheppard Pratt Health System, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of a
children’s psychiatric hospital (Statewide) .................................. 1,500,000
(NE) Arts Every Day. Provide a grant to Arts Every Day and
Baltimore City Public Schools for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of art
spaces, including black boxes (Baltimore City) ........................... 2,500,000
– 94 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
(NF) 4M Swim and Recreation Club. Provide a grant to the 4M Swim
Club, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the 4M Swim and Recreation Club
facilities (Baltimore City) ............................................................. 20,000
(NG) MedStar Union Memorial Hospital. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of MedStar Union Memorial Hospital for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of heart and vascular facilities at MedStar Union
Memorial Hospital (Baltimore City) ............................................ 100,000
(NH) DeMatha Catholic High School Walton House. Provide a grant
to the DeMatha Catholic High School, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Walton House at DeMatha Catholic High School (Prince
George’s County) ........................................................................... 50,000
(NI) Community Beautification Capital Initiative – District
Corridor and Neighborhood Enhancement Project. Provide a
grant to the Prince George’s County Department of Public Works
and Transportation for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the unincorporated
communities of Hyattsville, including infrastructure
improvements to the streetscape and other beautification and
public enhancements (Prince George’s County) ........................... 500,000
(NJ) Inncuvate Innovation Studio. Provide a grant to the Inncuvate
Community Development Partners, Inc for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Inncuvate Innovation Studio, including infrastructure
improvements (Prince George’s County) ...................................... 50,000
(NK) Plumbers and Steamfitters Local Union 486 Training Center.
Provide a grant to the Plumbers and Steamfitters Local Union
No. 486 Joint Journeymen and Apprentice Training Fund for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the UA Local 486 Training School
(Baltimore County) ....................................................................... 100,000
(NL) University Town Center Public Art. Provide a grant to the
– 95 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Hyattsville Community Development Corporation for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of public art at University Town Center (Prince
George’s County) ........................................................................... 1,000,000
(NM) Hyattsville Mural Wall. Provide a grant to the Hyattsville
Community Development Corporation for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Hyattsville Mural Wall project (Prince George’s County) ........... 250,000
(NN) The Gunston School. Provide a grant to The Gunston School,
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of The Gunston School property,
including roof replacement on the Paul M. Long Academic
Building (Queen Anne’s County) .................................................. 150,000
(NO) Maji Community Center. Provide a grant to the Maji
Advancement Initiative Economic Development Corporation for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Maji Community Center facilities
(Baltimore City) ............................................................................ 100,000
(NP) National Great Blacks in Wax Museum. Provide a grant to the
National Great Blacks in Wax Museum for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
new National Great Blacks in Wax Museum expansion
initiative (Baltimore City) ............................................................ 100,000
(NQ) Broadway East Community Development Corp. Provide a grant
to the Broadway East Community Development Corp. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Broadway East Community Development
Corp. Madeira Street greenspace project, including
streetscaping, mural painting, and other infrastructure
improvements (Baltimore City) .................................................... 125,000
(NR) Hancock Fire Company. Provide a grant to the Hancock Fire
Company, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Hancock Fire
– 96 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
Company property, including replacement of the existing
discontinued fire alarm and security system (Washington
County) .......................................................................................... 32,000
(NS) Hillsdale Heights Neighborhood Association Land Preservation
Trust. Provide a grant to the Hillsdale Heights Neighborhood
Association for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of Hillsdale Heights Neighborhood
Association Land Preservation Trust, including for the
acquisition and preservation of property (Baltimore City) ......... 90,000
(NT) 2005–2007 Denison Street. Provide a grant to the City of
Baltimore for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of vacant lots at 2005–2007 Denison
Street, including community and stormwater improvements
(Baltimore City) ............................................................................ 100,000
(NU) Wabash Town Center Transit–Oriented–Development. Provide
a grant to the Wabash Development Partners, LLC for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Wabash Town Center project, including
transit–oriented infrastructure improvements (Baltimore
City) ............................................................................................... 300,000
(NV) Sandy Spring Museum. Provide a grant to the Sandy Spring
Museum, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Sandy Spring
Museum (Montgomery County) .................................................... 200,000
(NW) Olney Manor Recreational Park. Provide a grant to the
Maryland–National Capital Park and Planning Commission
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of Olney Manor Recreational Park, including
a new picnic shelter with ADA access, parking lot
improvements, support infrastructure, and site furnishings
(Montgomery County) ................................................................... 150,000
(NX) University of Maryland Baltimore Washington Medical Center
Senator Pamela G. Beidle Departure Lounge. Provide a grant
to the University of Maryland Baltimore Washington Medical
Center, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
– 97 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the University of Maryland Baltimore
Washington Medical Center, including infrastructure
improvements to the Senator Pamela G. Beidle Departure
Lounge (Anne Arundel County).................................................... 100,000
(NY) Archbishop Spalding High School, Inc. Senator Pamela G.
Beidle Classroom. Provide a grant to the Archbishop Spalding
High School, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of Archbishop Spalding
High School, including infrastructure improvements to the
Senator Pamela G. Beidle Classroom (Anne Arundel County) ... 100,000
(NZ) YWCA of Annapolis & Anne Arundel County Pamela G. Beidle
Community Center. Provide a grant to the YMCA of Annapolis
& Anne Arundel for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of YWCA of Annapolis &
Anne Arundel County Pamela G. Beidle Community Center,
including infrastructure improvements to the community center
(Anne Arundel County) ................................................................. 170,000
(OA) 234 Main Street. Provide a grant to the Reisterstown
Improvement Association, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of 234
Main Street (Baltimore County) ................................................... 200,000
(OB) Woodlawn High School Scoreboard. Provide a grant to the
Woodlawn High School for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Woodlawn High
School scoreboard (Baltimore County) ........................................ 200,000
(OC) American Legion Meeting Hall. Provide a grant to the Dewey
Loman Post No. 109 The American Legion, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the American Legion Meeting Hall, including floor
renewal (Baltimore County) ......................................................... 20,000
(OD) White Rose Foundation Service Center. Provide a grant to the
White Rose Foundation, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
– 98 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
White Rose Foundation Service Center (Prince George’s
County) ......................................................................................... 100,000
(OE) Allegany County Support Home. Provide a grant to Spectrum
Support, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of Allegany County
Support Home facilities (Allegany County) ................................. 300,000
(OF) American Legion Post No. 227. Provide a grant to the American
Legion, Department of Maryland, Brandywine Post No. 227,
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the American Legion Post No. 227,
including the facility parking lot (Prince George’s County) ........ 50,000
(OG) Community Support Systems – Addressing Food Insecurity in
Southern Prince George’s County. Provide a grant to the
Community Support Systems, Inc./Afrisource Foundation for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of Community Support Systems facilities
(Prince George’s County) .............................................................. 25,000
(OH) Intrepid Hope University. Provide a grant to the Help Them
Heal Foundation for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Intrepid Hope
University facilities (Prince George’s County) ............................. 50,000
(OI) Lancaster II Renovation. Provide a grant to Second Family, Inc.
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the group home Lancaster II renovation
(Prince George’s County) .............................................................. 50,000
(OJ) Luminis Health Bloodmobile. Provide a grant to Luminis
Health, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of a new bloodmobile (Prince George’s
County) .......................................................................................... 100,000
(OK) Patriots Technology Gymnasium. Provide a grant to Patriots,
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Patriots Technology gymnasium
– 99 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(Prince George’s County) .............................................................. 25,000
(OL) STATDC Global Solutions. Provide a grant to the STATDC
Global Solutions for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the STATDC Global
Solutions Food Bank expansion (Prince George’s County).......... 50,000
(OM) The Heights Center. Provide a grant to the Heights Community
Development Corporation for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of space in The Heights
Center (Prince George’s County) ................................................... 50,000
(ON) Town of Fairmont Heights. Provide a grant to the Town of
Fairmont Heights for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Town of Fairmont
Heights Town Hall improvement (Prince George’s County) ........ 50,000
(OO) Emory Grove United Methodist Church. Provide a grant to the
Emory Grove United Methodist Church for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Emory Grove United Methodist Church facilities, including
infrastructure improvements to the food distribution center
(Montgomery County) ................................................................... 250,000
(OP) Noor Center. Provide a grant to the MAS, Maryland, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of Noor Center facilities (Montgomery County) .......... 200,000
(OQ) Identity Inc., Gaithersburg Community Center. Provide a grant
to Identity Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Identity Inc.
facilities, including infrastructure improvements to the
Gaithersburg Community Center (Montgomery County) ............ 50,000
(OR) Guilford Road Parking Project. Provide a grant to the City of
College Park for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Guilford Road parking project,
including infrastructure improvements to a blighted parking lot
and the installation of metered parking infrastructure (Prince
– 100 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
George’s County) ........................................................................... 625,000
(OS) Stonestraw Property Acquisition. Provide a grant to the Mayor
and City Council of the City of College Park for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Stonestraw Property, including acquisition of the site to support
future development (Prince George’s County) .............................. 500,000
(OT) Boys and Girls Clubs of Metropolitan Baltimore. Provide a
grant to the Boys & Girls Clubs of Metropolitan Baltimore,
Incorporated for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Boys and Girls Clubs of
Metropolitan Baltimore (Baltimore City) .................................... 500,000
(OU) Glen Burnie Improvement Association. Provide a grant to the
Glen Burnie Improvement Association, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
playground equipment (Anne Arundel County) .......................... 50,000
(OV) Harundale Civic Association, Inc. Provide a grant to the
Harundale Civic Association, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
infrastructure improvements, including the replacement of a
retaining wall (Anne Arundel County) ........................................ 50,000
(OW) Trail Installation at Bacontown Park. Provide a grant to the
Anne Arundel County Public Library for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Bacontown Park, including a trail installation (Anne Arundel
County) .......................................................................................... 10,000
(OX) Seneca Harbor Local Open Space Playground. Provide a grant
to Baltimore County, Maryland for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Seneca Harbor Local Open Space playground replacement
project (Baltimore County) ........................................................... 50,000
(OY) Adventist Healthcare Fort Washington Medical Center –
Anesthesia Machine. Provide a grant to Adventist HealthCare
Fort Washington Medical Center, Inc. for the acquisition,
– 101 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Adventist Healthcare Fort Washington Medical Center,
including an anesthesia machine (Prince George’s County) ....... 125,000
(OZ) Adventist Healthcare Fort Washington Medical Center –
Endoscopy Equipment. Provide a grant to Adventist
HealthCare Fort Washington Medical Center, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of Adventist Healthcare Fort Washington Medical
Center, including endoscopy equipment (Prince George’s
County) .......................................................................................... 125,000
(PA) YMCA Gilchrist Campus. Provide a grant to the YMCA for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the YMCA Gilchrist Campus (Allegany County) .... 40,000
(PB) Turner Station Flood Resilience Roadmap – Phase 1. Provide a
grant to Baltimore County, Maryland for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Turner Station Flood Resilience Roadmap – Phase 1 project
(Baltimore County) ....................................................................... 500,000
(PC) Sheppard Pratt Catonsville Hub. Provide a grant to Sheppard
Pratt for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Sheppard Pratt Catonsville Hub
(Baltimore County) ....................................................................... 100,000
(PD) Montgomery County Parks – Field Upgrades. Provide a grant
to the Maryland–National Capital Park and Planning
Commission for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of field updates and infrastructure
improvements to Montgomery County parks (Montgomery
County) .......................................................................................... 100,000
(PE) Woodberry Station Workforce Housing. Provide a grant to
AnnMarie Community Partners, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Woodberry Station workforce housing project (Baltimore
City) ............................................................................................... 750,000
– 102 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
(PF) Ridgely Middle School Electronic Sign. Provide a grant to the
Board of Education of Baltimore County for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of an
electronic sign and other facility improvements at Ridgely
Middle School (Baltimore County) .............................................. 100,000
(PG) Middletown Wastewater Treatment Plant. Provide a grant to
the Town of Middletown for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Middletown
Wastewater Treatment Plant (Frederick County) ........................ 600,000
(PH) Innovative Center for Autonomous Systems. Provide a grant to
the Southern Maryland Navy Alliance for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Innovative Center for Autonomous Systems facilities, including
testing infrastructure and other infrastructure improvements
for the Applied Research Laboratory for Intelligence and
Security South initiative (St. Mary’s County) ............................. 330,000
(PI) Knott Lodge. Provide a grant to the Greenwell Foundation, Inc.
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of Knott Lodge (St. Mary’s County) ................ 50,000
(PJ) Westside Open Works. Provide a grant to the Baltimore Arts
Realty Corporation for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of Westside Open Works
facilities (Baltimore City) ............................................................. 500,000
(PK) Kappa Alpha Psi Fraternity. Provide a grant to the Baltimore
Alumni Chapter Kappa Alpha Psi Fraternity, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of Kappa Alpha Psi Youth and Community Center,
including a community garden (Baltimore City) ........................ 150,000
(PL) Schucks Road Regional Complex. Provide a grant to Harford
County, Maryland for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Schucks Road
Regional Complex, including infrastructure improvements to
– 103 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
restroom facilities and to support the Miracle League special
needs baseball field and sensory trail (Harford County) ............ 250,000
(PM) Manna Food Center. Provide a grant to the Manna Food Center,
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Manna Food Center facilities
(Regional) ...................................................................................... 150,000
(PN) Waverly Middle School Redevelopment. Provide a grant to the
Schreiber Brothers Development for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Waverly Middle School redevelopment project (Baltimore
City) ............................................................................................... 1,000,000
(PO) Baltimore City Public School Construction. Provide a grant to
Baltimore City Public Schools to fund the design, construction,
and capital equipping of public school buildings and public
school capital improvements. Notwithstanding any other
provision of law, these funds are not subject to any local
matching requirements (Baltimore City) ..................................... 520,000
(PP) In–Patient Behavioral Health and Psychiatric Facility. Provide
a grant to Sheppard Pratt Health System, Inc. for the
acquisition of a site for an in–patient behavioral health and
psychiatric facility in Prince George’s County. It is the intent of
the General Assembly that these funds be subject to recapture if
the health system is unable to obtain approval for an in–patient
behavioral health facility on the site by June 1, 2029 (Prince
George’s County) ........................................................................... 15,000,000
(PQ) Boys and Girls Club of Southern Maryland – Waldorf Club
Park. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of The Boys and
Girls Clubs of Southern Maryland, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Boys and Girls Club of Southern Maryland – Waldorf Club
Park (Charles County) .................................................................. 250,000
ZA01 MARYLAND HOSPITAL ASSOCIATION
(A) Atlantic General Hospital Corporation. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of Atlantic General Hospital Corporation to
assist in the construction, expansion, renovation, and
equipping of Intensive Care Unit patient rooms and the central
– 104 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
nursing station, subject to the requirement that the grantee
provide an equal and matching fund for this purpose.
Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund
may consist of funds expended prior to the effective date of this
Act (Worcester County) ................................................................ 130,000
185,000
(B) CalvertHealth Primary Care. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of CalvertHealth Medical Center, Inc. to assist in the
construction, expansion, renovation, and equipping of primary
care facilities in North Beach and Prince Frederick, subject to
the requirement that the grantee provide an equal and
matching fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding Section 1(5)
of this Act, the matching fund may consist of funds expended
prior to the effective date of this Act (Calvert County) .............. 2,422,000
3,460,000
(C) Civista Medical Center, Inc. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of Civista Medical Center, Inc. dba University of
Maryland Charles Regional Medical Center to assist in the
construction, expansion, renovation, and equipping of a new
Interventional Radiology Laboratory and storage space for
Surgical Services, subject to the requirement that the grantee
provide an equal and matching fund for this purpose.
Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund
may consist of funds expended prior to the effective date of this
Act (Charles County) .................................................................... 525,000
750,000
(D) Frederick Health Hospital. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of Frederick Health Hospital, Inc. to assist in the
design, construction, renovation, and equipping of the Birth
Place, subject to the requirement that the grantee provide an
equal and matching fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding
Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund may consist of funds
expended prior to the effective date of this Act (Frederick
County) ........................................................................................ 1,680,000
2,680,000
3,400,000
(E) Kennedy Krieger Children’s Hospital. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of Kennedy Krieger Children’s Hospital, Inc.
dba Kennedy Krieger Institute to assist in the construction,
renovation, and equipping of a new Outpatient Healthcare
Hub, subject to the requirement that the grantee provide an
equal and matching fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding
– 105 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund may consist of funds
expended prior to the effective date of this Act (Prince George’s
County) ......................................................................................... 1,400,000
2,000,000
(F) Luminis Health Doctors Community Medical Center, Inc.
Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of Luminis Health
Doctors Community Medical Center, Inc. to assist in the
construction and renovation of the Cardiac Catheterization
Lab, Interventional Radiology suite, and associated clinical
support spaces, subject to the requirement that the grantee
provide an equal and matching fund for this purpose.
Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund
may consist of funds expended prior to the effective date of this
Act (Prince George’s County) ....................................................... 626,000
895,000
(G) MedStar Harbor Hospital. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of Harbor Hospital, Inc. dba MedStar Harbor
Hospital to assist in the construction, renovation, and
equipping of the Emergency Department, subject to the
requirement that the grantee provide an equal and matching
fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act,
the matching fund may consist of funds expended prior to the
effective date of this Act (Baltimore City) ................................... 1,680,000
2,400,000
(H) Mercy Medical Center. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of Mercy Medical Center, Inc. to assist in the
construction, renovation, and equipping of the Emergency
Department, subject to the requirement that the grantee
provide an equal and matching fund for this purpose.
Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund
may consist of funds expended prior to the effective date of this
Act (Baltimore City) ..................................................................... 1,680,000
2,400,000
(I) Montgomery General Hospital, Inc. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of MedStar Montgomery Medical Center to
assist in the design, construction, renovation, and equipping of
the Emergency Department, subject to the requirement that
the grantee provide an equal and matching fund for this
purpose. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the
matching fund may consist of funds expended prior to the
effective date of this Act (Montgomery County) ......................... 420,000
900,000
– 106 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
(J) Saint Agnes Healthcare, Inc. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of Saint Agnes Healthcare, Inc. to assist in the
construction, renovation, and equipping of the Ascension Saint
Agnes Emergency Department, subject to the requirement that
the grantee provide an equal and matching fund for this
purpose. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the
matching fund may consist of funds expended prior to the
effective date of this Act (Baltimore City) ................................... 420,000
600,000
(K) Sheppard Pratt Health System, Inc. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of Sheppard Pratt Health System, Inc. to
assist in the construction, renovation, and equipping of the
Towson Campus, subject to the requirement that the grantee
provide an equal and matching fund for this purpose.
Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund
may consist of funds expended prior to the effective date of this
Act (Baltimore County) ............................................................... 665,000
915,000
1,200,000
(L) The Johns Hopkins Hospital. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of the Johns Hopkins Hospital to assist in the design,
construction, renovation, and equipping of a pediatric sedation
unit in the Johns Hopkins Children’s Center, subject to the
requirement that the grantee provide an equal and matching
fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act,
the matching fund may consist of funds expended prior to the
effective date of this Act (Baltimore City) ................................... 150,000
215,000
(M) TidalHealth Peninsula Regional. Provide a grant to the Board
of Directors of TidalHealth Peninsula Regional, Inc. to assist in
the construction, renovation, and equipping of its inpatient
units, subject to the requirement that the grantee provide an
equal and matching fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding
Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund may consist of funds
expended prior to the effective date of this Act (Wicomico
County) ......................................................................................... 1,680,000
2,400,000
(N) University of Maryland Baltimore Washington Medical Center,
Inc. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of University of
Maryland Baltimore Washington Medical Center, Inc. to assist
in the construction, expansion, relocation, renovation, and
– 107 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
equipping of the senior and primary care facilities, subject to
the requirement that the grantee provide an equal and
matching fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding Section 1(5)
of this Act, the matching fund may consist of funds expended
prior to the effective date of this Act (Anne Arundel County) ... 522,000
745,000
ZA02 LOCAL SENATE INITIATIVES
(Statewide)
(A) Legislative Initiatives. Provide funds for projects of political
subdivisions and nonprofit organizations .................................. 37,500,000
(A) Camp Potomac. Provide a grant to the Laurel Highlands
Council, Inc. Boy Scouts of America Camp Potomac for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of Camp Potomac including building of New Camp
Office and Scout Retail Store (Allegany County) ....................... 60,000
(B) Westernport Redevelopment Project. Provide a grant to the
Town of Westernport for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of new business
development and renovation of buildings in town of
Westernport (Allegany County) .................................................. 150,000
(C) American Legion Cook–Pinkney Post No. 141. Provide a grant
to the American Legion Cook–Pinkney Post No. 141 for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the American Legion Cook–Pinkney Post No. 141
facilities (Anne Arundel County) ................................................ 100,000
(D) Anne Arundel County Community Action Agency AACCAA
Capital Renovations. Provide a grant to the Anne Arundel
County Community Action Agency, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
AACCAA Capital Renovations (Anne Arundel County) ............ 100,000
(E) Anne Arundel County Food Bank New Facility. Provide a grant
to the Anne Arundel County Food Bank, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Anne Arundel County Food Bank New Facility
– 108 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
(Anne Arundel County) ............................................................... 200,000
(F) Chase Brexton Glen Burnie Center. Provide a grant to the
Chase Brexton Health Services, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Chase Brexton Glen Burnie Center Expansion Project,
including Pharmacy and Food Pantry (Anne Arundel
County) ........................................................................................ 300,000
(G) Chesapeake High School Field House. Provide a grant to the
Board of Education of Anne Arundel County for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Chesapeake High School Field House (Anne Arundel
County) ........................................................................................ 150,000
(H) Corwell’s Store. Provide a grant to the Friends of Old Corwell’s
Store, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the historic National
Register candidate Corwell’s Store restoration project (Anne
Arundel County) .......................................................................... 150,000
(I) Deale Elks Lodge No. 2528. Provide a grant to the Deale Elks
Lodge No. 2528 of the Benevolent and Protective Order of Elks
of the United States of America for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Deale Elks Lodge No. 2528 including bathroom upgrades to
meet current ADA requirements (Anne Arundel County)......... 37,250
(J) Galesville Heritage Museum. Provide a grant to the Galesville
Heritage Society, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Galesville
Heritage Museum, including roof replacement (Anne Arundel
County) ........................................................................................ 20,000
(K) Linthicum Ferndale Youth Athletic Association. Provide a
grant to the Linthicum Ferndale Youth Athletic Assn., Inc. for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Linthicum Ferndale Youth Athletic
Association facilities, including Field Lighting (Anne Arundel
County) ........................................................................................ 50,000
– 109 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(L) Maryland Therapeutic Riding. Provide a grant to the Maryland
Therapeutic Riding, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Maryland
Therapeutic Riding facilities, including septic system
installation (Anne Arundel County) ........................................... 115,000
(M) Third Street Colored School – Seafarers Yacht Club. Provide a
grant to the Seafarers Yacht Club, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Third Street “Colored” School/Seafarers Yacht Club
Renovation Project (Anne Arundel County) ............................... 151,000
(N) Ashburton Community Coffee House and Meeting Space.
Provide a grant to the Ashburton Area Development
Corporation for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Ashburton
Community Coffee House and Meeting Space (Baltimore
City) ............................................................................................. 75,000
(O) Belair and White Traffic Calming. Provide a grant to the
Hamilton Community Association for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
pedestrian and traffic safety and enhancements to the
intersection of Belair Road and White Avenue in Baltimore
(Baltimore City) ........................................................................... 25,000
(P) Bikur Cholim House – Wellness, Recovery and Respite. Provide
a grant to the Baltimore Bikur Cholim, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Bikur Cholim House – Wellness, Recovery and Respite
renovation project (Baltimore City) ............................................ 125,000
(Q) Calvary Baptist Church Ministry House Renovation. Provide a
grant to the Calvary Baptist Church of Baltimore Maryland /
Garrison Restorative Action Community Empowerment Corp
(GRACE) for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Calvary Baptist
Church Ministry House Renovation (Baltimore City) ............... 75,000
– 110 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
(R) City Neighbors Shared Campus Auditorium. Provide a grant to
the City Neighbors High School, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
City Neighbors Shared Campus Auditorium (Baltimore City) . 120,000
(S) Federal Hill Park. Provide a grant to the Federal Hill
Neighborhood Association, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Federal Hill Park Safety Improvements project (Baltimore
City) ............................................................................................. 75,000
(T) Laurel Cemetery Memorial Project. Provide a grant to the
Parks & People, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Laurel
Cemetery Memorial Project (Baltimore City) ............................ 200,000
(U) Mount Vernon Place Church. Provide a grant to the UNITE
Mount Vernon, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Mount Vernon
Preservation Fund – Mount Vernon Place Church (Baltimore
City) ............................................................................................. 135,000
(V) Project O’Donnell Square Park. Provide a grant to the Canton
Community Association for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of Project O’Donnell
Square Park (Baltimore City) ..................................................... 100,000
(W) Restored Hope Redevelopment Project. Provide a grant to the
Pleasant Hope Community Development Corporation for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Restored Hope Redevelopment Project
(Baltimore City) ........................................................................... 200,000
(X) Waverly Teacher’s Eco–Village. Provide a grant to the
Schreiber Brothers Development LLC for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Waverly Teacher’s Eco–Village project (Baltimore City) .......... 100,000
(Y) William S. Baer Schoolyard Playground. Provide a grant to the
– 111 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
KABOOM! for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the William S. Baer
Schoolyard Playground (Baltimore City) ................................... 250,000
(Z) 234 Main Street. Provide a grant to the Reisterstown
Improvement Association, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of 234
Main Street (Baltimore County) ................................................. 200,000
(AA) Banneker Historical Park and Trolley Line No. 9 Trail
Renovations. Provide a grant to Baltimore County, Maryland
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Banneker Historical Park and Trolley
Line No. 9 Trail Renovations (Baltimore County) ..................... 75,000
(AB) Carroll Manor Elementary School. Provide a grant to the Board
of Education of Baltimore County for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of an
electronic school sign and other facility improvements at
Carroll Manor Elementary School (Baltimore County) ............. 50,000
(AC) Catonsville Emergency Assistance (CEA) Food Pantry. Provide
a grant to the Catonsville Emergency Assistance, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Catonsville Emergency Assistance (CEA) Food
Pantry Capital Construction Project (Baltimore County) ......... 200,000
(AD) Charlesmont Elementary School. Provide a grant to the Board
of Education of Baltimore County for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of a
new ADA accessible early childhood playground and other
facility improvements at Charlesmont Elementary School
(Baltimore County) ...................................................................... 25,000
(AE) Christ Villa Food Pantry. Provide a grant to the Redeemed
Christian Church of God Christ Villa for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Christ Villa Food Pantry, including Walk–in Freezer and
Coolers for Pantry capacity upgrade (Baltimore County) ......... 33,000
– 112 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
(AF) Cromwell Valley Elementary Playground. Provide a grant to
the Board of Education of Baltimore County for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
playgrounds and other facility improvements, including ADA
accessibility at Cromwell Valley Elementary School (Baltimore
County) ........................................................................................ 130,000
(AG) Hereford Volunteer Fire Company. Provide a grant to the
Hereford Volunteer Fire Company, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Hereford Volunteer Fire Company’s building renovation
project (Baltimore County).......................................................... 100,000
(AH) Loch Raven High School Electronic Sign. Provide a grant to the
Board of Education of Baltimore County for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of an
electronic school sign and other facility improvements at Loch
Raven High School (Baltimore County) ..................................... 165,000
(AI) McCormick Elementary School. Provide a grant to the Board of
Education of Baltimore County for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
fencing, ADA accessibility and other facility improvements at
McCormick Elementary School (Baltimore County) .................. 50,000
(AJ) National Center on Institutions and Alternatives –
Year–Round Accessibility and Safety Enhancements. Provide
a grant to the National Center on Institutions and
Alternatives, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the National Center
on Institutions and Alternatives, Inc. property (Baltimore
County) ........................................................................................ 53,000
(AK) National Center on Institutions and Alternatives – Youth in
Transition School. Provide a grant to the National Center on
Institutions and Alternatives, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
National Center on Institutions and Alternatives – Youth in
Transition School Therapeutic Campus Upgrades (Baltimore
– 113 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
County) ........................................................................................ 75,000
(AL) New Essex Library Branch. Provide a grant to the Foundation
for Baltimore County Public Library for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
New Essex Library Branch (Baltimore County) ........................ 200,000
(AM) Pikesville High School Comfort Station. Provide a grant to the
Board of Education of Baltimore County for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Pikesville High School Comfort Station (Baltimore County) .... 100,000
(AN) Relay Children’s Center Facility. Provide a grant to the Relay
Children’s Center, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Relay
Children’s Center Facility Repair and Preservation Project
(Baltimore County) ...................................................................... 50,000
(AO) Sandalwood Elementary School. Provide a grant to the
Baltimore County Board of Education for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Sandalwood Elementary School, including playground
facilities (Baltimore County) ....................................................... 100,000
(AP) Senior Center Security and Technology Enhancements.
Provide a grant to the County Executive and County Council of
Baltimore County for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping, including electrical
infrastructure at four Senior Centers: Overlea–Fullerton
Senior Center, Victory Villa Senior Center, Parkville Senior
Center, and Seven Oaks Senior Center (Baltimore County) ..... 100,000
(AQ) St. Mark’s on the Hill Church. Provide a grant to the St. Mark’s
on the Hill, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of St. Mark’s on the
Hill Church, including Wall Parapet and Roof Repair
(Baltimore County) ...................................................................... 150,000
(AR) Westway Theater and Community Center. Provide a grant to
the RISE Baltimore, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
– 114 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Westway
Theater and Community Center Revitalization (Baltimore
County City) ................................................................................. 100,000
(AS) Woodlawn Memorial Park. Provide a grant to Baltimore
County, Maryland for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of Woodlawn
Memorial Park in the Woodlawn community of western
Baltimore County (Baltimore County) ....................................... 100,000
(AT) Calverton School Playground. Provide a grant to the Calvert
County Day School, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Calverton
School Playground (Calvert County) .......................................... 100,000
(AU) Anna Murray Douglass Museum and Visitor’s Center. Provide
a grant to the Bailey–Groce Family Foundation, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Anna Murray Douglass Museum and Visitor’s
Center (Caroline County) ............................................................ 100,000
(AV) Martin’s House and Barn. Provide a grant to the Saint Martin’s
Ministries, Inc. (DBA Martin’s House & Barn) for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Martin’s House & Barn Shelter for Families
Experiencing Homelessness and Food Pantry, including roof
replacement on all buildings (Caroline County) ........................ 100,000
(AW) Hampstead Volunteer Fire Company. Provide a grant to the
Hampstead Volunteer Fire Engine & Hose Co. No. 1 for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Hampstead Volunteer Fire Company
including the refurbishment of a 22–year–old first–line engine
tanker, extending its operational life for an additional 20 years
(Carroll County)........................................................................... 150,000
(AX) Manchester Volunteer Fire Department. Provide a grant to the
Manchester Fire Engine and Hook and Ladder Company No. 1
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
– 115 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
capital equipping of the Manchester Volunteer Fire
Department renovations (Carroll County) ................................. 250,000
(AY) Westminster Elementary School. Provide a grant to the Carroll
County Public Schools Board of Education for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Westminster Elementary School, including a digital school sign
(Carroll County)........................................................................... 35,000
(AZ) Voices of Hope. Provide a grant to the Voices of Hope, Inc. for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Voices of Hope Residential Recovery
Support Facility Improvement Project (Cecil County) .............. 25,000
(BA) Water Witch Fire Company. Provide a grant to the Water
Witch Fire Company, Incorporated for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Water Witch Fire Company property, including a sprinkler
system and bay door opening modifications (Cecil County) ...... 100,000
(BB) WAC Hughes Elks Lodge No. 1053. Provide a grant to the WAC
Hughes Elks Lodge No. 1053, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
WAC Hughes Elks Lodge No. 1053 (Charles County) ............... 45,000
(BC) Richardson Maritime Museum. Provide a grant to the
Richardson Maritime Museum Incorporated for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Richardson Maritime Museum (Dorchester
County) ........................................................................................ 100,000
(BD) Catoctin Wildlife Preserve and Zoo. Provide a grant to the
Global Wildlife Trust, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Catoctin
Wildlife Preserve (Frederick County) ......................................... 125,000
(BE) Frederick Youth Center. Provide a grant to the Ausherman
Family Foundation for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Frederick
– 116 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
Youth Center project completion (Frederick County) ................ 165,000
(BF) Great Frederick Fair. Provide a grant to the Great Frederick
Fair, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of The Great Frederick
Fair, including the construction of a permanent stage roof
(Frederick County) ...................................................................... 150,000
(BG) Heritage Frederick – Facility Creation. Provide a grant to the
Historical Society of Frederick County, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Heritage Frederick – a new artifact and archival preservation
facility (Frederick County) .......................................................... 75,000
(BH) Mountain City Elks Lodge No. 382. Provide a grant to the
Mountain City Lodge No. 382 I.B.P.O.E. of W., Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of Mountain City Elks Lodge No. 382, including the
parking lot project, shed, lighting, and electric gate closer
(Frederick County) ...................................................................... 65,000
(BI) American Legion Proctor Kildow Post No. 71. Provide a grant
to the Proctor Kildow Post No. 71 American Legion, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the American Legion Proctor Kildow Post No. 71,
including roof replacement (Garrett County) ............................. 50,000
(BJ) Oakland Volunteer Fire Department Building. Provide a grant
to the Oakland Volunteer Fire Department Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Oakland Volunteer Fire Department Building
(Garrett County) .......................................................................... 50,000
(BK) Aberdeen Railroad Heritage Center. Provide a grant to the
Friends of the Aberdeen B&O Train Station, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Aberdeen Railroad Heritage Center (Harford
County) ........................................................................................ 50,000
(BL) Bethesda Transformation Center House Renovation. Provide a
– 117 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
grant to the Bethesda Transformation Center Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Bethesda Transformation Center House
Renovation project (Harford County) ......................................... 73,000
(BM) Havre de Grace STAR – Sports Theatre Arts Recreation –
Centre. Provide a grant to the Mayor and City Council of Havre
de Grace for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Havre de Grace
STAR – Sports Theatre Arts Recreation – Centre (Harford
County) ........................................................................................ 200,000
(BN) Humane Society of Harford County – Training Facility. Provide
a grant to the Humane Society of Harford County, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Humane Society of Harford County Training
Facility (Harford County)............................................................ 200,000
(BO) Maryland Center for the Visual and Performing Arts. Provide
a grant to the Maryland Center for the Visual and Performing
Arts, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Visual and
Performing Arts (Harford County) ............................................. 100,000
(BP) Stone View Farm – FarmFinity Greenhouse. Provide a grant to
the Stone View Farm, LLC for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Stone View Farm – FarmFinity Greenhouse (Harford
County) ........................................................................................ 96,000
(BQ) Agriculture Cultural Center at West Friendship Park. Provide
a grant to the Howard County Government for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of an
Agriculture Cultural Center at West Friendship Park (Howard
County) ........................................................................................ 125,000
(BR) Brumbaugh House and Museum. Provide a grant to the
Elkridge Heritage Society, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
– 118 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
Brumbaugh House and Museum (Howard County) .................. 100,000
(BS) Font Hill Wetland Park. Provide a grant to Howard County,
Maryland for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Font Hill Wetland
Park, including paving and pedestrian bridge replacement
(Howard County) ......................................................................... 100,000
(BT) Gentle Giants Center for Connection. Provide a grant to the
Gentle Giants Draft Horse Rescue Society, Ltd for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Gentle Giants Center for Connection (Howard
County) ........................................................................................ 200,000
(BU) Howard County Chinese School Expansion for Cultural and
Educational Enrichment. Provide a grant to the Howard
County Chinese School, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Howard County Chinese School (Howard County) .................... 100,000
(BV) Residences at Vantage Point. Provide a grant to the Columbia
Vantage House Corp. d/b/a Residences at Vantage Point for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of Residences at Vantage Point (Howard County).... 100,000
(BW) SpringForward Farms – Laurel. Provide a grant to the
SpringForward Ventures, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
SpringForward Farms – Laurel property (Howard County) ..... 100,000
(BX) Veterans of Foreign Wars Post No. 7472. Provide a grant to the
Yingling–Ridgely Post No. 7472, Veterans of Foreign Wars of
the United States, Incorporated for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Veterans of Foreign Wars Post No. 7472 property (Howard
County) ........................................................................................ 190,000
(BY) Radcliffe Creek School. Provide a grant to the Radcliffe Creek
School, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
– 119 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
improvement, and capital equipping of the Radcliffe Creek
School (Kent County) .................................................................. 100,000
(BZ) Adventure Theatre MTC Theatre and Lobby. Provide a grant
to the Adventure Theatre Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Adventure Theatre MTC Theatre and Lobby (Montgomery
County) ........................................................................................ 100,000
(CA) Clifton Park and Springbrook Farm. Provide a grant to the
Clifton Park Baptist Church for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Clifton Park and Springbrook Farm with a hydroponic farm for
Springbrook High School (Montgomery County) ....................... 50,000
(CB) Falls Road Local Park. Provide a grant to the
Maryland–National Capital Park and Planning Commission
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Falls Road Local Park including
playground renovation with improved ADA accessibility,
support infrastructure, and site furnishings (Montgomery
County) ........................................................................................ 250,000
(CC) Haneefiya Adult Medical Day Care Center. Provide a grant to
Haneefiya America for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Haneefiya
Adult Medical Day Care Center (Montgomery County) ............ 175,000
(CD) Korean Community Service Center of Greater Washington –
Silver Spring Office. Provide a grant to the Korean Community
Service Center of Greater Washington, Incorporated for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Silver Spring Office renovation.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Grantee may
be reimbursed for expenses incurred on or after June 1, 2017
(Montgomery County) ................................................................. 50,000
(CE) Leisure World Next Ride Stops Initiative. Provide a grant to
the Leisure World of Maryland Corporation for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
– 120 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
Leisure World Next Ride Stops Initiative (Montgomery
County) ........................................................................................ 20,000
(CF) Lincoln High School. Provide a grant to the Lincoln High
School Community Development Corporation for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of Lincoln High School (Montgomery County) .......... 150,000
(CG) Morningstar Tabernacle No. 88 Moses Cemetery and Hall.
Provide a grant to the Friends of Moses Hall, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Morningstar Tabernacle No. 88 Moses
Cemetery and Hall, including access driveway (Montgomery
County) ........................................................................................ 240,000
(CH) Neighborhood Community Track and Field. Provide a grant to
the Melvin J. Berman Hebrew Academy for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Neighborhood Community Track and Field facilities located at
Berman Hebrew Academy (Montgomery County) ..................... 200,000
(CI) Quality Childcare Development Center. Provide a grant to the
Cross Community, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Upcounty
Quality Childcare Development Center (Montgomery
County) ........................................................................................ 36,750
(CJ) Sandy Spring Museum. Provide a grant to the Sandy Spring
Museum, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Sandy Spring
Museum (Montgomery County) .................................................. 150,000
(CK) Serenity Community Gardens and Urban Farm. Provide a
grant to the Glenmont Forest Neighbors Civic Association, Inc.
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the GFNCA Serenity Community Gardens
and Urban Farm (Montgomery County) .................................... 43,000
(CL) Sheppard Pratt Rockville School. Provide a grant to the
Sheppard Pratt Rockville School for the acquisition, planning,
– 121 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Sheppard Pratt Rockville School (Montgomery County) ........... 150,000
(CM) So What Else – Expansion of Food Access Anchor. Provide a
grant to the So What Else, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
So What Else Food Access Anchor facilities (Montgomery
County) ........................................................................................ 150,000
(CN) Takoma Park Metropolitan Branch Trail. Provide a grant to
the City of Takoma Park for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Takoma Park
Metropolitan Branch Trail upgrade (Montgomery County) ...... 200,000
(CO) Theater Pond Renovation at South Valley Park. Provide a
grant to the Montgomery Village Foundation, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of Theater Pond Renovation at South Valley Park
(Montgomery County) ................................................................. 50,000
(CP) Twinbrook and Dogwood Parks Pedestrian Bridge Project.
Provide a grant to the Mayor and Council of the City of
Rockville for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Twinbrook and
Dogwood Parks Pedestrian Bridge Project (Montgomery
County) ........................................................................................ 150,000
(CQ) Waredaca Pony Club Center. Provide a grant to the Waredaca
Eventing Education Foundation for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Waredaca Pony Club Center facilities, including climate
mitigation infrastructure upgrades (Montgomery County) ....... 45,000
(CR) Washington Grove Playground. Provide a grant to the Town of
Washington Grove for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Washington
Grove Playground (Montgomery County) .................................. 250,000
(CS) Western Montgomery County Pool Bubble. Provide a grant to
– 122 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
the Town of Poolesville for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Western
Montgomery County Pool Bubble (Montgomery County) .......... 100,000
(CT) Winter Growth. Provide a grant to the Winter Growth, Inc. for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of Winter Growth’s Montgomery County
Center, including window replacement (Montgomery
County) ........................................................................................ 120,000
(CU) American Legion Post No. 227. Provide a grant to the American
Legion, Department of Maryland, Brandywine Post No. 227,
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the American Legion
Post No. 227, including the facility parking lot (Prince George’s
County) ........................................................................................ 25,000
(CV) Camp Springs Elks Lodge. Provide a grant to the Camp
Springs Lodge No. 2332, Benevolent and Protective Order of
Elks of the United States of America, Incorporated for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Camp Springs Elks Lodge No. 2332 to include
renovation of exterior plumbing systems (Prince George’s
County) ........................................................................................ 50,000
(CW) Capitol Heights Stormwater Management. Provide a grant to
the Mayor and Council of The Town of Capitol Heights for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Town of Capitol Heights Stormwater
Management (Prince George’s County) ...................................... 100,000
(CX) City of District Heights Revitalizations. Provide a grant to the
City of District Heights for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the City of District
Heights Revitalizations project (Prince George’s County) ........ 100,000
(CY) Diamond Foundation of Prince George’s County. Provide a
grant to the Diamond Foundation of Prince George’s County,
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
– 123 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
improvement, and capital equipping of the Diamond
Foundation property (Prince George’s County) ......................... 100,000
(CZ) Frederick Douglass High School – Main Gymnasium
Renovation. Provide a grant to the Prince George’s County
Public Schools for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Frederick
Douglass High School Main Gymnasium Renovation (Prince
George’s County) ......................................................................... 200,000
(DA) Harambee Community Development Corporation – The House.
Provide a grant to the Harambee Community Development
Corporation for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Carolina
Missionary Baptist Church and Harambee Community
Development Corporation residential housing initiative “The
House” (Prince George’s County) ................................................ 90,000
(DB) Harland Street Pool Property. Provide a grant to the City of
New Carrollton for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Harland Street
Pool Property (Prince George’s County) ..................................... 250,000
(DB–1) Homeshare Plus. Provide a grant to the Educare Resource
Center, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of Educare’s Homeshare Plus housing
program (Prince George’s County) .............................................. 150,000
(DC) Hyattsville Economic Mobility and Workforce Development
Center. Provide a grant to the City of Hyattsville for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Hyattsville Economic Mobility and Workforce
Development Center (Prince George’s County) .......................... 100,000
(DD) Laurel Don’t Rest on your Laurels. Provide a grant to the
Laurel Don’t Rest on your Laurels Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Laurel Don’t Rest on your Laurels facilities (Prince George’s
County) ........................................................................................ 300,000
– 124 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
(DE) Maryland Umbrella Group – MUG – Umbrella Care Center.
Provide a grant to the Maryland Umbrella Group (MUG) for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the MUG – Umbrella Care Center (Prince
George’s County) ......................................................................... 200,000
(DF) Oxon Hill Recreation Club. Provide a grant to the Oxon Hill
Recreation Club, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the continuing
renovations of the outdoor Olympic swimming pool complex
(Prince George’s County) ............................................................. 150,000
0
(DF–1) Men of Beechtree. Provide a grant to the Men of Beechtree, LLC
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Men of Beechtree capacity expansion
and equipment modernization initiative (Prince George’s
County) ......................................................................................... 10,000
(DG) Rollingcrest–Chillum Community and Aquatics Center.
Provide a grant to the Maryland–National Capital Park and
Planning Commission for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Rollingcrest–Chillum Community and Aquatics Center (Prince
George’s County) ......................................................................... 175,000
(DH) Sasscer Field Improvements. Provide a grant to the Marlboro
Boys’ and Girls’ Club, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of Sasscer Field
(Prince George’s County) ............................................................. 125,000
115,000
(DI) Town of Fairmont Heights. Provide a grant to the Town of
Fairmont Heights for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Town of
Fairmont Heights Town Hall Improvement (Prince George’s
County) ........................................................................................ 50,000
(DJ) Town of Morningside – Department of Public Works Building.
Provide a grant to the Town of Morningside for the acquisition,
– 125 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of a
new Town Department of Public Works Building (Prince
George’s County) ......................................................................... 200,000
(DK) Wilmer’s Park. Provide a grant to the Maryland–National
Capital Park and Planning Commission for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Wilmer’s Park (Prince George’s County) .................................... 250,000
(DL) Historic Christ Church. Provide a grant to the Friends of
Historic Christ Church for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Historic Christ
Church, including exterior painting of Church Building and
interior renovation of the Hall (Queen Anne’s County) ............. 75,000
(DM) United States Colored Troops Memorial. Provide a grant to the
Chesapeake Charities, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of a
bronze sculpture of a United States Colored Troops Soldier
(Queen Anne’s County) ............................................................... 50,000
(DN) Boys and Girls Clubs of Southern Maryland – Carver Center
Boys and Girls Club. Provide a grant to the Boys & Girls Clubs
of Southern Maryland, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Carver Center Boys and Girls Club (St. Mary’s County) .......... 150,000
(DO) Mechanicsville Volunteer Fire Department. Provide a grant to
the Mechanicsville Volunteer Fire Department, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Mechanicsville Volunteer Fire Department
Solar Project and other improvements (St. Mary’s County) ...... 50,000
(DP) Seventh District Volunteer Fire Department. Provide a grant
to the Seventh District Volunteer Fire Department,
Incorporated for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Seventh
District Volunteer Fire Department including a new rescue
vessel (St. Mary’s County)........................................................... 100,000
– 126 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
(DQ) HOPE Center. Provide a grant to the Foundation of H.O.P.E.,
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the HOPE Center
(Talbot County) ............................................................................ 82,000
(DR) Long Meadow Volunteer Fire Company. Provide a grant to the
Long Meadow Volunteer Fire Company, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Long Meadow Volunteer Fire Company
facilities, including the construction of a second building
(Washington County) .................................................................. 125,000
(DS) Maugansville Goodwill Volunteer Fire Company. Provide a
grant to the Maugansville Goodwill Volunteer Fire Company,
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Maugansville
Goodwill Volunteer Fire Company including Banquet Facility
Improvements (Washington County) ......................................... 35,000
(DT) Smithsburg High School. Provide a grant to the Band Boosters
of The Smithsburg Area Schools, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Smithsburg High School, including Auditorium renovations
(Washington County) .................................................................. 100,000
(DU) Smithsburg High School Field House. Provide a grant to the
Smithsburg Athletic Booster Club, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Smithsburg High School Field House (Washington County) .... 100,000
(DV) Epoch Dream Center. Provide a grant to the Eleven21, Inc. dba
Epoch Dream Center for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Epoch Dream
Center facility (Wicomico County) .............................................. 150,000
(DW) Fruitland Recreational Park. Provide a grant to the City of
Fruitland for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Fruitland
– 127 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Recreational Park, including new fences (Wicomico County) ... 75,000
(DX) Salisbury Fire Department Fire Training Building. Provide a
grant to the City of Salisbury, Maryland for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Salisbury Fire Department Fire Training Building (Wicomico
County) ........................................................................................ 75,000
(DY) Recycling Facility Expansion. Provide a grant to the County
Commissioners of Worcester County, Maryland for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Recycling Facility Expansion (Worcester
County) ........................................................................................ 50,000
ZA03 LOCAL HOUSE OF DELEGATES INITIATIVES
(Statewide)
(A) Legislative Initiatives. Provide funds for projects of political
subdivisions and nonprofit organizations .................................. 37,500,000
(A) Allegany College of Maryland. Provide a grant to the Allegany
College of Maryland for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of Allegany College of
Maryland, including ADA compliant access and seating at
Bazarnic Field (Allegany County) ............................................... 61,000
(B) Bishop Walsh School. Provide a grant to the Bishop Walsh
School, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Bishop Walsh School facilities,
including resurfacing and renovation to the athletic field
(Allegany County) ........................................................................ 64,000
(C) Ellerslie Volunteer Fire Company. Provide a grant to The
Ellerslie Volunteer Fire Company, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
new Ellerslie Town Park (Allegany County) ............................... 60,000
(D) Anne Arundel County Food Bank New Facility. Provide a grant
to the Anne Arundel County Food Bank, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
– 128 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
Anne Arundel County Food Bank new facility (Anne Arundel
County) ......................................................................................... 200,000
(E) Anne Arundel County Public Libraries. Provide a grant to The
Public Library Association of Annapolis & Anne Arundel
County Incorporated for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Anne Arundel
County Public Library facilities, including privacy pods and
signage improvements (Anne Arundel County) .......................... 225,000
(F) Arundel Middle School Marquee. Provide a grant to Anne
Arundel County Public Schools for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Arundel Middle School marquee (Anne Arundel County).......... 25,000
(G) Bluewater Playground. Provide a grant to the Seven Oaks
Community Association, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Bluewater Playground (Anne Arundel County) .......................... 78,000
(H) Chesapeake High School Field House. Provide a grant to the
Board of Education of Anne Arundel County for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Chesapeake High School Field House (Anne Arundel County) .. 200,000
(I) Deale Elks Lodge No. 2528. Provide a grant to the Deale Elks
Lodge No. 2528 of the Benevolent and Protective Order of Elks
of the United States of America for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Deale Elks Lodge No. 2528, including bathroom upgrades to
meet current ADA requirements (Anne Arundel County) ........... 35,000
(J) Galesville Heritage Museum. Provide a grant to the Galesville
Heritage Society, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Galesville Heritage
Museum, including roof replacement (Anne Arundel County) ... 20,000
(K) New Village Academy – Community Cafe and Public Gathering
Space. Provide a grant to the New Village Academy Public
Charter School, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
– 129 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Community Cafe
and Public Gathering Space (Anne Arundel County) ................ 100,000
(L) Old Masonic Hall. Provide a grant to the Odenton Heritage
Society, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Old Masonic Hall (Anne Arundel
County) ......................................................................................... 120,000
(M) Peerless Rens Club. Provide a grant to the Peerless Rens Club
Inc. of Eastport for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Peerless Rens Club
– Safety and Accessibility Improvements project (Anne Arundel
County) ......................................................................................... 150,000
(N) The Light House – Safe Harbour Energy Expansion. Provide a
grant to The Light House, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of The
Light House – Safe Harbour Energy Expansion project (Anne
Arundel County) .......................................................................... 100,000
(O) 3403 Fairview Avenue Improvements. Provide a grant to the
Lake Ashburton, LLC for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of 3403 Fairview Avenue
for transitional housing for homeless individuals (Baltimore
City) .............................................................................................. 200,000
(P) Anonymous Immigrant Statue in Little Italy Piazza. Provide a
grant to the Italian American Organizations United, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of an Anonymous Immigrant Statue in Little Italy
Piazza (Baltimore City) ............................................................... 50,000
(Q) Ashburton Community Coffee House and Meeting Space.
Provide a grant to The Ashburton Area Development
Corporation for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Ashburton Community Coffee
House and Meeting Space (Baltimore City) ................................ 25,000
(R) Ashland Community Development Corporation – Baltimore.
– 130 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
Provide a grant to the Ashland Community Development
Corporation for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Ashland Community Development
Corporation Baltimore renovation project (Baltimore City) ...... 50,000
(S) Bradford Community Playground and Mural. Provide a grant
to Challenge 2 Change, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of a
community playground and commemorative mural on
Bradford Street in Baltimore City (Baltimore City) ................... 50,000
(T) Calvary Baptist Church Ministry House Renovation. Provide a
grant to the Calvary Baptist Church of Baltimore, Maryland
Garrison Restorative Action Community Empowerment Corp
(GRACE) for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Calvary Baptist Church Ministry
House Renovation (Baltimore City)............................................. 175,000
(U) Collington Square Homeownership. Provide a grant to the
Friends of Collington Square Park, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
vacant rowhomes within the Collington Square neighborhood
(Baltimore City) ........................................................................... 95,000
(V) East Baltimore Youth Community Center. Provide a grant to
Just Blessed & Gifted, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the East Baltimore
Youth Community Center (Baltimore City) ................................ 50,000
(W) Fair Havens African Methodist Episcopal Church. Provide a
grant to the Fair Havens African Methodist Episcopal Church
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Fair Havens African Methodist
Episcopal Church, including replacement of an outdated HVAC
system (Baltimore City) ............................................................... 30,000
(X) Forge of the BIT Center. Provide a grant to the BIT Community
Center, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the historic Parish Hall to create The
– 131 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Forge (Baltimore City) ................................................................. 250,000
(Y) God’s Best Family Early Childhood Education. Provide a grant
to God’s Best Family, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of a dedicated community
center in South Baltimore (Baltimore City) ................................ 125,000
(Z) Lakewood Elementary Schoolyard Playground. Provide a grant
to KABOOM! for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Lakewood
Elementary Schoolyard Playground (Baltimore City) ............... 200,000
(AA) Langston Hughes Community, Business, and Resource Center.
Provide a grant to Youth Educational Services, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Langston Hughes Community, Business and
Resource Center (Baltimore City) ................................................ 125,000
(AB) Maji Community Center. Provide a grant to the Maji
Advancement Initiative Economic Development Corporation for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Maji Community Center facilities
(Baltimore City) ........................................................................... 150,000
(AC) Project O’Donnell Square Park. Provide a grant to the Canton
Community Association for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of Project O’Donnell
Square Park (Baltimore City) ..................................................... 100,000
(AD) Rolando–Thom House for Bolton Hill Nursery. Provide a grant
to the Bolton Hill Nursery, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Rolando–Thom House (Baltimore City) ...................................... 50,000
(AE) Rosa’s House. Provide a grant to L.A.M.B., Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of Rosa’s House (Baltimore City) ............................... 50,000
(AF) Village Learning Place. Provide a grant to The Village Learning
– 132 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
Place, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Village Learning Place (Baltimore
City) .............................................................................................. 50,000
(AG) Waverly Teacher’s Eco–Village. Provide a grant to Schreiber
Brothers Development LLC for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Waverly Teacher’s Eco–Village project (Baltimore City) ............ 150,000
(AH) Wells Community Development Corporation. Provide a grant to
the Wells Community Development Corporation for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of 3902–14 W. Overlea Avenue (Baltimore City) ....... 50,000
(AI) American Legion Meeting Hall. Provide a grant to the Dewey
Loman Post No. 109 The American Legion, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the American Legion Meeting Hall, including floor
renewal (Baltimore County) ........................................................ 40,000
(AJ) Asian–American and Pacific–Islander Community Center.
Provide a grant to the Asian American Alliance for Action, Inc.
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Asian–American and Pacific–Islander
Community Center (Baltimore County) ...................................... 50,000
(AK) Banneker Historical Park and Trolley Line No. 9 Trail
Renovations. Provide a grant to Baltimore County, Maryland
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Banneker Historical Park and Trolley
Line No. 9 trail renovations (Baltimore County) ........................ 300,000
(AL) Catonsville Emergency Assistance Food Pantry. Provide a grant
to Catonsville Emergency Assistance, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Catonsville Emergency Assistance Food Pantry Capital
Construction Project (Baltimore County) .................................... 100,000
(AM) Glyndon Station Park Playground. Provide a grant to
– 133 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Baltimore County, Maryland for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Glyndon Station Park playground (Baltimore County) ............. 100,000
(AN) National Center on Institutions and Alternatives – Year–Round
Accessibility and Safety Enhancements. Provide a grant to the
National Center on Institutions and Alternatives, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the National Center on Institutions and
Alternatives, Inc. property (Baltimore County) .......................... 53,000
(AO) National Center on Institutions and Alternatives – Youth in
Transition School. Provide a grant to the National Center on
Institutions and Alternatives, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
National Center on Institutions and Alternatives – Youth in
Transition School therapeutic campus upgrades (Baltimore
County) ......................................................................................... 125,000
(AP) Padonia International Elementary School. Provide a grant to
the Board of Education of Baltimore County for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of a
new interactive sensory board and other facility improvements
at Padonia International Elementary School (Baltimore
County) ......................................................................................... 6,500
(AQ) Pikesville Middle School Electronic Sign. Provide a grant to the
Board of Education of Baltimore County for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of a
new electronic sign and other facility improvements at
Pikesville Middle School (Baltimore County) ............................. 130,000
(AR) Prospect Hill Cemetery of Towson. Provide a grant to the
Friends of Prospect Hill Cemetery of Towson, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Prospect Hill Cemetery of Towson (Baltimore
County) ......................................................................................... 150,000
(AS) Relay Children’s Center Facility. Provide a grant to Relay
Children’s Center, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
– 134 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Relay Children’s
Center Facility Repair and Preservation Project (Baltimore
County) ......................................................................................... 150,000
(AT) Ridgely Middle School Electronic Sign. Provide a grant to the
Board of Education of Baltimore County for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of an
electronic sign and other facility improvements at Ridgely
Middle School (Baltimore County) .............................................. 75,000
(AU) Torah Institute of Baltimore. Provide a grant to the Torah
Institute of Baltimore, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of Torah Institute of
Baltimore Campus expansion project (Baltimore County) ......... 300,000
(AV) Villa Cresta Elementary School Primary Playground. Provide a
grant to the Board of Education of Baltimore County for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of playgrounds and other facility improvements,
including ADA accessibility at Villa Cresta Elementary School
(Baltimore County) ...................................................................... 175,000
(AW) Yeshivas Toras Simcha. Provide a grant to Yeshivas Toras
Simcha, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Yeshivas Toras Simcha facilities
(Baltimore County) ...................................................................... 200,000
(AX) North Beach Black Box Theatre. Provide a grant to the Town of
North Beach for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the North Beach Black Box Theatre
(Calvert County) .......................................................................... 25,000
(AY) Aaron’s Place – Food Hub and Innovation Campus. Provide a
grant to Aarons Place, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Aaron’s Place – Food
Hub and Innovation Campus (Caroline County) ....................... 50,000
(AZ) Greensboro Volunteer Fire Company. Provide a grant to the
Greensboro Volunteer Fire Company, Incorporated for the
– 135 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Greensboro Volunteer Fire Company, including
replacement of outdated extrication equipment (Caroline
County) ......................................................................................... 50,000
(BA) Town of Greensboro Police Department. Provide a grant to the
Town of Greensboro for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Town of Greensboro
Police Department renovations (Caroline County) ..................... 50,000
(BB) Flat Iron Building. Provide a grant to the Town of Mount Airy
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the historic Flat Iron Building (Carroll
County) ......................................................................................... 50,000
(BC) Hampstead Volunteer Fire Company. Provide a grant to the
Hampstead Volunteer Fire Engine & Hose Co. No. 1 for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Hampstead Volunteer Fire Company,
including the refurbishment of a 22–year–old first–line engine
tanker, extending its operational life for an additional 20 years
(Carroll County) ........................................................................... 150,000
(BD) Camp Conowingo. Provide a grant to the Girl Scouts of Central
Maryland for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of Camp Conowingo (Cecil County) ....... 100,000
(BE) Fair Hill Nature Center Playscape. Provide a grant to the Fair
Hill Environmental Foundation, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Fair Hill Nature Center Playscape (Cecil County) ..................... 250,000
(BF) Veterans House of Hope. Provide a grant to Chesapeake Health
Education Program, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Veterans House of
Hope (Cecil County) ..................................................................... 100,000
(BG) Lions Camp Merrick. Provide a grant to Lions Camp Merrick
Incorporated for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
– 136 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of Lions Camp Merrick facilities (Charles
County) ......................................................................................... 125,000
(BH) M25 Impact Center. Provide a grant to the M25 Impact
Community Development Corporation for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
M25 Impact Center workforce development and
entrepreneurship hub (Charles County)...................................... 25,000
(BI) Providence of Maryland. Provide a grant to Providence of
Maryland, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Providence of
Maryland facilities, including security system and lighting
(Charles County) .......................................................................... 100,000
(BJ) WAC Hughes Elks Lodge No. 1053. Provide a grant to WAC
Hughes Elks Lodge No. 1053, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
WAC Hughes Elks Lodge No. 1053 (Charles County) ................ 45,000
(BK) Waldorf Elks Lodge No. 2421. Provide a grant to the Benevolent
& Protective Order of the Elks of the USA, Waldorf 2421 Corp.,
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Waldorf Elks Lodge No. 2421
(Charles County) .......................................................................... 50,000
(BL) Maryland Canna Cultural Center. Provide a grant to the
Maryland Canna Cultural Center, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Maryland Canna Cultural Center (Dorchester County) ............. 150,000
(BM) Richardson Maritime Museum. Provide a grant to the
Richardson Maritime Museum Incorporated for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Richardson Maritime Museum (Dorchester County) .................. 200,000
(BN) Artspiration Frederick Foundation Community Arts Center.
Provide a grant to the Artspiration Frederick Foundation, Inc.
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
– 137 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of a community arts center (Frederick
County) ......................................................................................... 50,000
(BO) Heartly House. Provide a grant to the Heartly House, Inc. for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Heartly House facilities expansion
(Frederick County) ....................................................................... 150,000
(BP) Heritage Frederick – Facility Creation. Provide a grant to the
Historical Society of Frederick County, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Heritage Frederick – a new artifact and archival preservation
facility (Frederick County) .......................................................... 100,000
(BQ) John R. Webb Veterans of Foreign Wars Post No. 3285. Provide
a grant to the John R. Webb Post No. 3285 Veterans of Foreign
Wars of the United States for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the John R. Webb
Veterans of Foreign Wars Post No. 3285 (Frederick County) ..... 125,000
(BR) Kaplan Building Infrastructure Upgrade. Provide a grant to the
Mayor and Council Brunswick for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Kaplan Building infrastructure upgrade (Frederick County) .... 100,000
(BS) New Market Town Hall. Provide a grant to the Town of New
Market for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the New Market Town Hall acquisition
and renovation project (Frederick County) ................................. 100,000
(BT) American Legion Proctor Kildow Post No. 71. Provide a grant
to the Proctor Kildow Post No. 71 American Legion, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the American Legion Proctor Kildow Post No. 71,
including roof replacement (Garrett County).............................. 75,000
(BU) Harford County Crisis Recovery Resource Center. Provide a
grant to Voices of Hope, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
– 138 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Harford County Crisis Recovery Resource Center infrastructure
enhancement project (Harford County) ....................................... 200,000
(BV) Havre de Grace Living War Memorial and Museum. Provide a
grant to The Joseph L. Davis Post No. 47, The American Legion,
Incorporated for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Havre de Grace Living War
Memorial and Museum (Harford County) .................................. 250,000
(BW) Havre de Grace STAR – Sports Theatre Arts Recreation –
Centre. Provide a grant to the Mayor and City Council of Havre
de Grace for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Havre de Grace STAR – Sports
Theatre Arts Recreation – Centre (Harford County) ................... 100,000
(BX) Agriculture Cultural Center at West Friendship Park. Provide
a grant to the Howard County Government for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Agriculture Cultural Center at West Friendship Park (Howard
County) ......................................................................................... 125,000
(BY) Elkridge Community Center. Provide a grant to the Howard
County Government for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Elkridge
Community and 50+ Center (Howard County) ........................... 100,000
(BZ) Font Hill Wetland Park. Provide a grant to Howard County,
Maryland for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Font Hill Wetland Park, including
paving and pedestrian bridge replacement (Howard County) ... 200,000
(CA) High Ridge Head Start. Provide a grant to the Howard County
Government for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the High Ridge Head Start facilities,
including ADA restroom renovations (Howard County) ............ 150,000
(CB) Howard County Striders Monument. Provide a grant to
Howard County Striders, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
– 139 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Howard County Striders 50th Anniversary Celebration
Monument (Howard County) ...................................................... 20,000
(CC) Indian Cultural Association Office Initiative. Provide a grant to
the Indian Cultural Association of Howard County, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Indian Cultural Association Office Initiative
(Howard County) ......................................................................... 100,000
(CD) Patuxent Woods – Child Care Center. Provide a grant to the
Howard County Government for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Patuxent Woods – Child Care Center (Howard County) ............ 200,000
(CE) Residences at Vantage Point. Provide a grant to the Columbia
Vantage House Corp. d/b/a Residences at Vantage Point for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of Residences at Vantage Point (Howard County) ..... 120,000
(CF) SpringForward Farms – Laurel. Provide a grant to
SpringForward Ventures, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
SpringForward Farms – Laurel property (Howard County) ..... 100,000
(CG) Winter Growth Ruth Keeton Center. Provide a grant to Winter
Growth, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Winter Growth Ruth Keeton Center
renewal project (Howard County) ............................................... 85,000
(CH) Easterseals Camp Fairlee Dining Hall. Provide a grant to
Easterseals Delaware & Maryland’s Eastern Shore, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Easterseals Camp Fairlee Dining Hall
Expansion project (Kent County)................................................. 50,000
(CI) Radcliffe Creek School. Provide a grant to the Radcliffe Creek
School, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Radcliffe Creek School (Kent
– 140 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
County) ......................................................................................... 50,000
(CJ) Adventure Theatre MTC Theatre and Lobby. Provide a grant to
the Adventure Theatre Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Adventure Theatre MTC Theatre and Lobby (Montgomery
County) ......................................................................................... 100,000
(CK) Children’s Inn at NIH – Medical Isolation Wing. Provide a
grant to the Children’s Inn at NIH, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of an
elevator (conveying system) in a new residential wing of the
Children’s Inn at NIH (Montgomery County) ............................. 50,000
(CL) Cider Mill Recreational Assets. Provide a grant to the Housing
Opportunities Commission of Montgomery County for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Cider Mill Recreational Assets, including
soccer fields (Montgomery County).............................................. 65,000
(CM) Clarksburg Yard. Provide a grant to the Fairfax Community
Church of God for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Clarksburg Yard
project (Montgomery County) ...................................................... 75,000
(CN) Community FarmShare – Local Food Aggregation and
Distribution Expansion. Provide a grant to the Community
FarmShare LLC for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Community
FarmShare – Local Food Aggregation and Distribution
Expansion (Montgomery County) ................................................ 75,000
(CO) Direct Support Professionals – DSP Training Academy at
Jubilee Association of Maryland. Provide a grant to The Jubilee
Association of Maryland, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
DSP Training Academy facilities (Montgomery County) ........... 125,000
(CP) Emma’s Torch – The Kitchen We Build Together. Provide a
grant to Emma’s Torch Ltd. for the acquisition, planning,
– 141 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Emma’s Torch project – The Kitchen We Build Together
(Montgomery County) .................................................................. 200,000
(CQ) Falls Road Local Park. Provide a grant to the
Maryland–National Capital Park and Planning Commission
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Falls Road Local Park, including
playground renovation with improved ADA accessibility,
support infrastructure, and site furnishings (Montgomery
County) ......................................................................................... 50,000
(CR) Haneefiya Adult Medical Day Care Center. Provide a grant to
Haneefiya America for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Haneefiya Adult
Medical Day Care Center (Montgomery County) ........................ 100,000
(CS) Historic C&O Canal. Provide a grant to the C&O Canal Trust,
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of three failing historic culverts in the
C&O Canal National Historical Park in District 16
(Montgomery County) .................................................................. 100,000
(CT) Historic Howes Farm Barn. Provide a grant to the Nepal
Education and Cultural Center for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Historic Howes Farm Barn to transform it into a community
center (Montgomery County) ....................................................... 100,000
(CU) Johnson’s Local Park. Provide a grant to the
Maryland–National Capital Park and Planning Commission
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of Johnson’s Local Park (Montgomery
County) ......................................................................................... 100,000
(CV) Korean Community Service Center of Greater Washington –
Silver Spring Office. Provide a grant to the Korean Community
Service Center of Greater Washington, Incorporated for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
– 142 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
equipping of the Silver Spring Office renovation.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Grantee may
be reimbursed for expenses incurred on or after June 1, 2017
(Montgomery County) .................................................................. 25,000
(CW) Lincoln High School. Provide a grant to the Lincoln High
School Community Development Corporation for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of Lincoln High School (Montgomery County) .......... 50,000
(CX) Martin Luther King Jr. Recreational Park. Provide a grant to
the Maryland–National Capital Park and Planning
Commission for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of Martin Luther King Jr. Recreational
Park (Montgomery County) ......................................................... 200,000
(CY) Montgomery County Pride Center Headquarters Development
and Community Resource Hub. Provide a grant to the
Montgomery County Pride Center, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Montgomery County Pride Center Headquarters Development
and Community Resource Hub (Montgomery County) ............... 30,000
(CZ) Olney Manor Recreational Park. Provide a grant to the
Maryland–National Capital Park and Planning Commission
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of Olney Manor Recreational Park, including
a new picnic shelter with ADA access, parking lot
improvements, support infrastructure, and site furnishings
(Montgomery County) .................................................................. 100,000
(DA) Riverworks Art Center. Provide a grant to the Riverworks Art
Center, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Riverworks Art Center property
(Montgomery County) .................................................................. 100,000
(DB) Rockland House. Provide a grant to the Rockville Housing
Enterprises, LLC for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Rockland House in
the City of Rockville (Montgomery County) ................................ 75,000
– 143 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(DC) Sandy Spring Museum. Provide a grant to the Sandy Spring
Museum, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Sandy Spring
Museum (Montgomery County) ................................................... 50,000
(DD) Sheppard Pratt Rockville School. Provide a grant to Sheppard
Pratt for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Sheppard Pratt Rockville School
(Montgomery County) .................................................................. 80,000
(DE) Solar Resiliency Project and Multi–Lingual Daycare–Aftercare.
Provide a grant to The People’s Foundation, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Solar Resiliency Project and Multi–Lingual
Daycare–Aftercare project (Montgomery County) ....................... 100,000
(DF) Theater Pond Renovation at South Valley Park. Provide a grant
to the Montgomery Village Foundation, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Theater Pond Renovation at South Valley Park (Montgomery
County) ......................................................................................... 35,000
(DG) Twinbrook and Dogwood Park Pedestrian Bridge. Provide a
grant to The Mayor and Council of the City of Rockville for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Twinbrook and Dogwood Park Pedestrian
Bridge project (Montgomery County) .......................................... 75,000
(DH) Western Montgomery County Pool Bubble. Provide a grant to
the Town of Poolesville for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Western
Montgomery County Pool Bubble (Montgomery County) ........... 50,000
(DI) Wheaton Forest Local Park. Provide a grant to the
Maryland–National Capital Park and Planning Commission
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Wheaton Forest Local Park
(Montgomery County) .................................................................. 125,000
– 144 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
(DJ) 47th Ave Stormwater Mitigation. Provide a grant to the Town
of Riverdale Park for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the 47th Ave
Stormwater Mitigation Project (Prince George’s County) .......... 150,000
(DK) Calcium Score Testing Education & Awareness Program.
Provide a grant to the Open My Heart Foundation, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Calcium Score Testing Education & Awareness
Program (Prince George’s County) .............................................. 30,000
(DL) Camp Springs Elks Lodge. Provide a grant to the Camp Springs
Lodge No. 2332, Benevolent and Protective Order of Elks of the
United States of America, Incorporated for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Camp Springs Elks Lodge No. 2332 to include renovation of
exterior plumbing systems (Prince George’s County) .................. 25,000
(DM) Caring Connections Intergenerational Day Center. Provide a
grant to the Restoration Community Empowerment Center for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Caring Connections Intergenerational
Day Center (Prince George’s County) .......................................... 150,000
(DN) Community Basketball Courts Renovations. Provide a grant to
the Forestville Park Homeowners Association, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of community basketball courts renovations (Prince
George’s County) .......................................................................... 50,000
(DO) Community Support Systems – Addressing Food Insecurity in
Southern Prince George’s County. Provide a grant to the
Community Support Systems, Inc./Afrisource Foundation for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of Community Support Systems facilities
(Prince George’s County) ............................................................. 25,000
(DP) Gateway Arts Center Improvement Project. Provide a grant to
the Gateway Community Development Corporation for the
– 145 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Gateway Arts Center improvement project
(Prince George’s County) ............................................................. 150,000
(DQ) Intrepid Hope University. Provide a grant to the Help Them
Heal Foundation for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Intrepid Hope
University facilities (Prince George’s County) ............................ 50,000
(DR) Lake Arbor Foundation. Provide a grant to the Lake Arbor
Foundation, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Lake Arbor
Foundation facilities (Prince George’s County) .......................... 100,000
(DS) Lancaster II Renovation. Provide a grant to Second Family, Inc.
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the group home Lancaster II renovation
(Prince George’s County) ............................................................. 50,000
(DT) Luminis Health Bloodmobile. Provide a grant to Luminis
Health, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of a new blood mobile (Prince George’s
County) ......................................................................................... 200,000
(DU) Manna Food Center. Provide a grant to the Manna Food Center,
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Manna Food Center (Prince
George’s County) .......................................................................... 50,000
(DV) Maryland Umbrella Group – MUG – Umbrella Care Center.
Provide a grant to The Maryland Umbrella Group (MUG) for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the MUG – Umbrella Care Center (Prince
George’s County) .......................................................................... 50,000
(DW) Mission of Love Workforce Development OJT Program. Provide
a grant to the Mission of Love Charities, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
– 146 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
Mission of Love Workforce Development OJT Program facilities
and mobile kitchen (Prince George’s County) ............................. 100,000
(DX) Public Safety Resilience & Community Emergency Support
Initiative. Provide a grant to the Fraternal Order of Police No.
112 Prince George’s County Sheriff’s Lodge, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Public Safety Resilience & Community
Emergency Support Initiative (Prince George’s County) ............ 150,000
(DY) Rollingcrest–Chillum Community and Aquatics Center.
Provide a grant to the Maryland–National Capital Park and
Planning Commission for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the
Rollingcrest–Chillum Community and Aquatics Center (Prince
George’s County) .......................................................................... 250,000
(DZ) Southern Area Aquatics and Recreation Complex. Provide a
grant to the Maryland–National Capital Park and Planning
Commission for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Southern Area Aquatics and
Recreation Complex, including outdoor facilities: fields, trails,
imagination playground and picnic area (Prince George’s
County) ......................................................................................... 50,000
(EA) STATDC Global Solutions. Provide a grant to STATDC Global
Solutions for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the STATDC Global Solutions Food
Bank expansion (Prince George’s County) .................................. 50,000
(EB) The Heights Center. Provide a grant to The Heights Community
Development Corporation for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of space in The Heights
Center (Prince George’s County) .................................................. 100,000
(EC) Town of Fairmont Heights. Provide a grant to the Town of
Fairmont Heights for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Town of Fairmont
Heights Town Hall improvement (Prince George’s County) ....... 70,000
– 147 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ED) Town of University Park New Town Hall. Provide a grant to the
Town of University Park for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Town of University
Park New Town Hall Construction Project (Prince George’s
County) ......................................................................................... 200,000
(EE) Veterans of Foreign Wars Post No. 9619. Provide a grant to the
Veterans of Foreign Wars, Scott–Johnson–Collins Post No.
9619, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Veterans of Foreign Wars Post No.
9619 property (Prince George’s County) ...................................... 142,500
(EF) White Rose Foundation Service Center. Provide a grant to the
White Rose Foundation, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
White Rose Foundation Service Center (Prince George’s
County) ......................................................................................... 100,000
(EG) United States Colored Troops Memorial. Provide a grant to the
Chesapeake Charities, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of a
bronze sculpture of a United States Colored Troops Soldier
(Queen Anne’s County) ................................................................ 50,000
(EH) Ridge Volunteer Fire Department. Provide a grant to the Ridge
Volunteer Fire Department, Incorporated for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Ridge Volunteer Fire Department Building renovation (St.
Mary’s County) ............................................................................. 60,000
(EI) Cordova Volunteer Firemen’s Association. Provide a grant to the
Cordova Volunteer Firemen’s Association for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Cordova Volunteer Firemen’s Association property, including
the purchase and installation of a permanent whole building
generator (Talbot County) ........................................................... 200,000
(EJ) Doleman Black Heritage Museum. Provide a grant to the
Doleman Black Heritage Museum, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
– 148 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Doleman Black Heritage Museum (Washington County) ........... 150,000
(EK) Vehicles for Change – Horizon Goodwill Industries Partnership.
Provide a grant to Hagerstown Goodwill Industries, Inc. DBA
Horizon Goodwill Industries, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
infrastructure improvements for the purpose of establishing a
Vehicles for Change Full Circle Automotive Training Center
(Washington County) ................................................................... 200,000
(EL) Fruitland Recreational Park. Provide a grant to the City of
Fruitland for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the Fruitland Recreational Park,
including new fences (Wicomico County) .................................... 75,000
(EM) Mason Dixon Athletic Complex – Phase II. Provide a grant to
Wicomico County for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of Phase II of the Mason
Dixon Athletic Complex project (Wicomico County) ................... 150,000
(EN) Wicomico County Humane Society. Provide a grant to the
Humane Society of Wicomico County, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Wicomico County Humane Society (Wicomico County) .............. 50,000
(EO) Recycling Facility Expansion. Provide a grant to the County
Commissioners of Worcester County, Maryland for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Recycling Facility expansion (Worcester
County) ......................................................................................... 50,000
ZB02 LOCAL JAILS AND DETENTION CENTERS
(A) Queen Anne’s County Detention Center. Provide a grant to
the County Commissioners of Queen Anne’s County to begin
design of a new detention center, subject to the requirement
that the grantee provide an equal and matching fund for this
purpose (Queen Anne’s County) ............................................... 200,000
700,000
– 149 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(4) An annual tax is imposed on all assessable property in the State in rate and
amount sufficient to pay the principal of and interest on the bonds, as and when due and
until paid in full. The principal shall be discharged within 15 years after the date of issue
of the bonds.
(5) (a) Prior to the payment of any matching grant funds under the provisions
of Section 1(3) Items ZA00 through ZB02 of this Act, grantees shall provide and expend
matching funds as specified. No part of a grantee’s matching fund may be provided, either
directly or indirectly, from funds of the State, whether appropriated or unappropriated.
Except as otherwise provided, no part of the fund may consist of real property, in kind
contributions, or funds expended prior to the effective date of this Act. In case of any dispute
as to what money or assets may qualify as matching funds, the Board of Public Works shall
determine the matter, and the Board’s decision is final. Grantees have until June 1, 2028,
to present evidence satisfactory to the Board of Public Works that the matching fund will
be provided. If satisfactory evidence is presented, the Board shall certify this fact to the
State Treasurer and the proceeds of the loan shall be expended for the purposes provided in
this Act. If this evidence is not presented by June 1, 2028, the proceeds of the loan shall be
applied to the purposes authorized in § 8–129 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(b) It is further provided that when an equal and matching fund is specified
in Section 1(3) Items ZA00 through ZB02 of this Act, grantees shall provide a matching fund
equal to the lesser of (i) the authorized amount of the State grant or (ii) the amount of the
matching fund certified by the Board of Public Works. If satisfactory evidence is presented,
the Board shall certify this fact and the amount of the matching fund to the State Treasurer
and the proceeds of the loan equal to the amount of the matching fund shall be expended for
the purposes provided in this Act. If this evidence is not presented by June 1, 2028, the
proceeds of the loan shall be applied to the purposes authorized in § 8–129 of the State
Finance and Procurement Article. The proceeds of any amount of the loan in excess of the
matching fund certified by the Board of Public Works shall also be applied to the purposes
authorized in § 8–129 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(6) (a) Prior to approval by the Board of Public Works of an expenditure of bond
proceeds authorized under Section 1(3) Items ZA00 through ZB02 of this Act, the grantee
shall grant and convey to the Maryland Historical Trust a historic preservation easement
on the property where the capital project assisted by the bond proceeds is located if the
Director of the Trust determines that the capital project impacts real property that is
individually listed in, or eligible for individual listing in, the Maryland Register of Historic
Properties, unless the Director of the Trust also determines that the real property:
(i) Is a type that is already adequately represented among the
Trust’s existing easement properties;
(ii) Is already subject to adequate protections of historic preservation
law or instrument; or
(iii) Has conditions peculiar to it that make requiring an easement
– 150 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
impractical.
(b) If the grantee holds a lease on the property, the Trust may accept an
easement on the leasehold interest.
(c) The easement must be in form, substance, and duration acceptable to
the Director of the Trust.
(d) (i) A recipient may administratively appeal to the Maryland
Historical Trust Board of Trustees a determination made by the Director of the Trust under
subparagraph (a) of this paragraph.
(ii) The decision made by the Maryland Historical Trust Board of
Trustees on an appeal is final and is not subject to further administrative appeal or judicial
review.
(7) The Except as provided in § 8–128(c) of the State Finance and Procurement
Article, the proceeds of the loan must be expended or encumbered by the Board of Public
Works for the purposes provided in this Act no later than June 1, 2033. If any funds
authorized by this Act remain unexpended or unencumbered after June 1, 2033, the amount
of the unexpended or unencumbered authorization shall be canceled and be of no further
force and effect.
(8) Multiple grants provided to the same organization in this Section are in
addition to one another. Unless otherwise provided, any matching fund requirements apply
to each individual grant.
(9) (a) Subject to subparagraph (b) of this paragraph, the Board of Public
Works may approve an appropriation in Section 1(3) Items ZA00 through ZB02 of this Act
or in any other previously enacted Maryland Consolidated Capital Bond Loan Act,
notwithstanding differences in:
(i) The name of the grantee or the description of the project, provided
that the proposed use of funds is consistent with the public purpose of the original
appropriation; or
(ii) The location of the project.
(b) When the difference in the name of the grantee is nonsubstantive and
the identity of the grantee can be determined, and when the difference in the description of
the project is nonsubstantive and is consistent with the public purpose of the original
appropriation, the Department of General Services shall record the correct grantee
identification and project description in the grant agreement entered into by the grantee
with the State of Maryland and recorded with the Board of Public Works. In all other
instances of differences provided in subparagraph (a) of this paragraph, the Department of
Budget and Management shall notify the Office of Policy Analysis within the Department
– 151 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
of Legislative Services in writing of:
(i) The differences between an appropriation in Section 1(3) Items
ZA00 through ZB02 of this Act and the proposed use of the funds; and
(ii) The justification that the proposed use of the funds is consistent
with the public purpose of the appropriation.
(c) (i) The Office of Policy Analysis shall have 45 days to review and
comment on the proposed use of the funds.
(ii) If the Office of Policy Analysis does not submit written objections
within 45 days, the Department of Budget and Management shall provide certification in
writing to the Board of Public Works that the proposed use of funds may be approved
notwithstanding technical differences in the appropriation in Section 1(3) Items ZA00
through ZB02 of this Act.
(d) It is the intent of the General Assembly that the provisions of this
paragraph:
(i) Provide an administrative process authorizing the approval of
grants by the Board of Public Works, provided that the proposed use of funds is consistent
with the public purpose of the original appropriation; and
(ii) Be applicable to this Act and all prior Maryland Consolidated
Capital Bond Loans.
(10) Notwithstanding § 8–122.1 of the State Finance and Procurement Article, the
principal amount of any loan authorized under this Act shall be reduced by the cash
proceeds, excluding any accrued interest, received for the State bonds and allocated by the
Comptroller to the loan.
(11) Notwithstanding §§ 8–125(e) and 8–132 of the State Finance and Procurement
Article, the State Treasurer shall determine the amount of premium from the sale of bonds
in fiscal year years 2026 and 2027 to be transferred to the Annuity Bond Fund. Upon each
issuance of State bonds in fiscal year years 2026 and 2027, the Treasurer shall notify the
Comptroller of the Treasurer’s determination and the Comptroller shall credit the premium
accordingly. Premium from the sale of bonds in fiscal year years 2026 and 2027 that is not
transferred to the Annuity Bond Fund may, upon approval of the Board of Public Works, be
expended by the Comptroller for any of the public purposes set forth in Section 1(3) of this
Act, including any applicable architects’ and engineers’ fees.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Chapter 445 of the Acts of 2005
– 152 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) With respect to any parking facility financed using any combination of cash,
revenue bonds, or other debt and constructed on the State property bounded by Rowe
Boulevard/Bladen Street, Calvert Street, St. Johns Street, and Bloomsbury Square in
Annapolis or any other location within 1,320 feet of the boundaries of that property:
(1) The operator of that facility shall allocate for 12 months of the year at
least 250 parking spaces for employees of the General Assembly which shall be assigned by
the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Delegates.
(2) FROM JANUARY 1 THROUGH MAY 1 OF EACH YEAR, THE 250
PARKING SPACES REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION TO BE ALLOCATED FOR
EMPLOYEES OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY SHALL BE SEPARATELY ALLOCATED WITH
RESTRICTED ACCESS IN A MANNER THAT THE SPACES ARE AVAILABLE ONLY FOR
EMPLOYEES OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY AT ALL TIMES.
[(2)] (3) Spaces in the facility shall be made available to the General
Assembly on the financial terms equivalent to the most favorable terms under which spaces
may be provided to other State agencies.
[(3)] (4) All contracts for financing, construction, or operation of this
facility shall be made subject to the requirements of this section.
(b) The Department of General Services may not reduce the total number of
parking spaces available to staff of the General Assembly in the parking lot adjacent to the
Lowe House Office Building (“B” lot), the adjoining parking garage (“A” Garage), or the Gotts
Garage below the number assigned on April 11, 2005 without the written consent of the
President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Delegates.
(c) The Department of General Services, the Maryland Transportation Authority,
and any other public agencies or instrumentalities involved in the financing, construction,
or operation of the parking facilities referenced in this Section shall be subject to the
requirements of this Section.
Chapter 463 of the Acts of 2014
Section 1(3)
ZA02 LOCAL SENATE INITIATIVES
– 153 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(BJ) Rockville Science Center. Provide a grant equal to the lesser of
(i) [$75,000] $0 or (ii) the amount of the matching fund
provided, to the Board of Trustees of the Rockville Science
Center, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, and capital equipping of the
Rockville Science Center. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this
Act, the matching fund may consist of in kind contributions
(Montgomery County) .................................................................. [75,000]
0
Chapter 463 of the Acts of 2014, as amended by Chapter
495 of the Acts of 2015, Chapter 27 of the Acts of 2016,
Chapter 22 of the Acts of 2017, Chapter 9 of the Acts of
2018, Chapter 14 of the Acts of 2019, Chapter 537 of the
Acts of 2020, Chapter 63 of the Acts of 2021, and Chapter
344 of the Acts of 2022
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan of 2014 in the total principal amount of [$1,172,780,987]
$1,172,705,987. This loan shall be evidenced by the issuance, sale, and delivery of State
general obligation bonds authorized by a resolution of the Board of Public Works and
issued, sold, and delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article.
Chapter 495 of the Acts of 2015
Section 1(3)
DEPARTMENT OF JUVENILE SERVICES
VE01 RESIDENTIAL SERVICES
(B) New Female Detention Center. Provide funds to continue
design and begin acquiring easements for utility connections for
a replacement detention facility for female youths on the
grounds of the Thomas O’Farrell Youth Center (Carroll
County) ......................................................................................... [2,525,000]
2,182,168
– 154 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
Chapter 495 of the Acts of 2015, as amended by Chapter
27 of the Acts of 2016, Chapter 22 of the Acts of 2017,
Chapter 9 of the Acts of 2018, Chapter 14 of the Acts of
2019, Chapter 63 of the Acts of 2021, Chapter 344 of the
Acts of 2022, Chapter 102 of the Acts of 2023, and
Chapter 720 of the Acts of 2024
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan of 2015 in the total principal amount of [$1,058,380,749]
$1,058,037,917. This loan shall be evidenced by the issuance, sale, and delivery of State
general obligation bonds authorized by a resolution of the Board of Public Works and
issued, sold, and delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article.
Chapter 27 of the Acts of 2016
Section 1(3)
DA07.01 DEPARTMENT OF AGING
(Statewide)
(A) Senior Centers Capital Grant Program. Provide grants to
acquire property and to design, construct, renovate, and equip
senior citizen activities centers. The funds appropriated for this
purpose shall be administered in accordance with §§ 10–501
through 10–510 of the Human Services Article.
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
AUTHORIZATION MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1,
2028 ............................................................................................. 1,680,000
Chapter 27 of the Acts of 2016, as amended by Chapter 9
of the Acts of 2018 and Chapter 14 of the Acts of 2019
Section 1(3)
DEPARTMENT OF JUVENILE SERVICES
VE01 RESIDENTIAL SERVICES
(A) New Female Detention Center. Provide funds to continue
design, continue acquiring easements for utility connections,
– 155 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
and begin construction for a replacement detention facility for
female youths on the grounds of the Thomas O’Farrell Youth
Center, provided that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act,
work may continue on this project prior to the appropriation
of all funds necessary to complete this project (Carroll
County) ..................................................................................... [1,168,000]
176,400
Chapter 27 of the Acts of 2016, as amended by Chapter
22 of the Acts of 2017, Chapter 9 of the Acts of 2018,
Chapter 14 of the Acts of 2019, Chapter 537 of the Acts of
2020, Chapter 63 of the Acts of 2021, Chapter 344 of the
Acts of 2022, and Chapter 102 of the Acts of 2023
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan of 2016 in the total principal amount of [$964,522,415]
$963,530,815. This loan shall be evidenced by the issuance, sale, and delivery of State
general obligation bonds authorized by a resolution of the Board of Public Works and
issued, sold, and delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article.
Chapter 22 of the Acts of 2017
Section 1(3)
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
(O) Maryland Independent College and University Association –
McDaniel College. Provide a grant equal to the lesser of (i)
$3,000,000 or (ii) the amount of the matching fund provided, to
the Board of Trustees of McDaniel College for the design,
construction, and equipping of the Gill Physical Education
Learning Center, subject to the requirement that the grantee
provide an equal and matching fund for this purpose.
Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund
may consist of funds expended prior to the effective date of this
Act. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
AUTHORIZATION MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1,
2028 (Carroll County) .................................................................. 3,000,000
(AW) Southern Maryland Studies Center. Provide a grant of
$500,000 to the Board of Trustees of the College of Southern
– 156 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
Maryland for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Southern Maryland Studies Center,
located in Charles County (Charles County) ..............................
[500,000]
0
Chapter 22 of the Acts of 2017, as amended by Chapter 537 of the Acts
of 2020 and Chapter 141 of the Acts of 2023
Section 1(3)
ZA01 MARYLAND HOSPITAL ASSOCIATION
(I) Union Hospital of Cecil County. Provide a grant to the Board
of Directors of Union Hospital of Cecil County to acquire,
design, construct, and equip a Behavioral Health Crisis
Assessment and Stabilization Center, subject to the
requirement that the grantee provide an equal and matching
fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this
Act, the matching fund may consist of funds expended prior
to the effective date of this Act[. Notwithstanding Section 1(5)
of this Act, the grantee has until June 1, 2030, to present
evidence that a matching fund will be provided.
Notwithstanding Section 1(7) of this Act, this grant may not
terminate before June 1, 2030] (Cecil County) ........................ [786,000]
0
Chapter 22 of the Acts of 2017, as amended by Chapter 537 of the Acts
of 2020, Chapter 344 of the Acts of 2022, Chapter 102 of the Acts of
2023, and Chapter 603 of the Acts of 2025
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan of 2017 in the total principal amount of [$1,084,416,895]
$1,083,630,895 $1,083,130,895. This loan shall be evidenced by the issuance, sale, and
delivery of State general obligation bonds authorized by a resolution of the Board of Public
Works and issued, sold, and delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 and
8–131.2 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
Chapter 9 of the Acts of 2018
Section 1(3)
– 157 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
DA07.01 DEPARTMENT OF AGING
(Statewide)
(A) Senior Centers Capital Grant Program. Provide grants to
acquire property and to design, construct, renovate, and equip
senior citizen activities centers. The funds appropriated for
this purpose shall be administered in accordance with §§
10–501 through 10–510 of the Human Services Article.
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
AUTHORIZATION MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1,
2028 .......................................................................................... 1,600,000
DB01 HISTORIC ST. MARY’S CITY COMMISSION
(St. Mary’s County)
(D) Maryland Heritage Interpretive Center. Provide funds to
design, construct, and conduct archeology on the site of the
Maryland Heritage Interpretive Center. NOTWITHSTANDING
SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS AUTHORIZATION MAY
NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2028 ................................. 1,000,000
RA11 MARYLAND STATE LIBRARY AGENCY
(B) State Library Resource Center. Provide funds to complete
construction of renovations and equip the Central Branch of
Baltimore City’s Enoch Pratt Free Library System (Baltimore
City) ........................................................................................... [4,831,000]
4,244,643
RB36 UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND OFFICE
(A) Shady Grove Educational Center – Biomedical Sciences and
Engineering Education Building. Provide funds to complete
construction and equipping of an academic facility at Shady
Grove Educational Center. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION
1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS AUTHORIZATION MAY NOT
TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2028 (Montgomery County) .... 23,114,000
RM00 MORGAN STATE UNIVERSITY
(Baltimore City)
(B) New Student Services Support Building. Provide funds to
continue design and construction of a new Student Services
Support Building to house student services functions, provided
that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue
– 158 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
on this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary
to complete the project. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7)
OF THIS ACT, THIS AUTHORIZATION MAY NOT TERMINATE
BEFORE JUNE 1, 2028 ............................................................... 46,060,000
RD00 ST. MARY’S COLLEGE OF MARYLAND
(St. Mary’s County)
(A) Academic Building and Auditorium. Provide funds to continue
design of and begin to construct and equip the relocation of
the existing athletic field, and to continue design of a new
academic building and auditorium ........................................... [3,600,000]
3,441,434
RM00 MORGAN STATE UNIVERSITY
(Baltimore City)
(B) New Student Services Support Building. Provide funds to
continue design and construction of a new Student Services
Support Building to house student services functions, provided
that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue
on this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary
to complete the project. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7)
OF THIS ACT, THIS AUTHORIZATION MAY NOT TERMINATE
BEFORE JUNE 1, 2028 ............................................................... 46,060,000
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
(U) Johns Hopkins University – Maryland Center for Cell Therapy
Manufacturing. Provide a grant to the Board of Trustees of
Johns Hopkins University for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, repair, renovation, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Maryland Center for Cell Therapy
Manufacturing (Baltimore City) .................................................. [5,000,000]
0
(CO) Armory Plaza. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of the
Hyattsville Community Development Corporation for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Armory Plaza (Prince George’s County) ....................................... [100,000]
0
ZA02 LOCAL SENATE INITIATIVES
(BB) Lisbon Volunteer Fire Department. Provide a grant equal to
– 159 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
the lesser of (i) $125,000 or (ii) the amount of the matching fund
provided, to the Board of Directors of the Lisbon Volunteer Fire
Company, Inc. for the Lisbon Volunteer Fire Department,
including a sprinkler system, fire alarm, and exhaust ejection
system. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching
fund may consist of in kind contributions (Howard County) ..... [125,000]
0
(BZ) Greenbelt Station Hiker and Biker Trail. Provide a grant equal
to the lesser of (i) [$75,000] $0 or (ii) the amount of the matching
fund provided, to the Mayor and City Council of the City of
Greenbelt for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Greenbelt Station Hiker and Biker
Trail (Prince George’s County) ..................................................... [75,000]
0
(CC) Prince George’s County Volunteer Marine, Fire and Rescue
Department. Provide a grant equal to the lesser of (i) [$50,000]
$0 or (ii) the amount of the matching fund provided, to the
Board of Directors of the Prince George’s County Volunteer
Marine, Fire and Rescue Department, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
facilities for Station 57. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this
Act, the matching fund may consist of real property (Prince
George’s County) ........................................................................... [50,000]
0
ZA03 LOCAL HOUSE OF DELEGATES INITIATIVES
(AX) Rockville Welcome Center. Provide a grant equal to the lesser
of (i) [$100,000] $0 or (ii) the amount of the matching fund
provided, to the Board of Directors of CASA de Maryland, Inc.
and the County Executive and County Council of Montgomery
County for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Rockville Welcome Center facility.
Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund
may consist of real property, in kind contributions, or funds
expended prior to the effective date of this Act (Montgomery
County) ......................................................................................... [100,000]
0
(BK) Riverfront Park Hiker and Biker Path. Provide a grant equal to
– 160 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
the lesser of (i) [$50,000] $0 or (ii) the amount of the matching
fund provided, to the Mayor and City Council of the City of
Laurel for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Riverfront Park Hiker and Biker Path [50,000]
(Prince George’s County) .............................................................. 0
Chapter 9 of the Acts of 2018, as amended by Chapter 344 of the Acts
of 2022, Chapter 102 of the Acts of 2023, and Chapter 720 of the Acts of
2024
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan of 2018 in the total principal amount of [$1,088,668,022]
$1,087,923,099 $1,082,798,099 $1,082,698,099 $1,082,423,099. This loan shall be
evidenced by the issuance, sale, and delivery of State general obligation bonds authorized
by a resolution of the Board of Public Works and issued, sold, and delivered in accordance
with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
Chapter 14 of the Acts of 2019
Section 1(3)
DA07.01 DEPARTMENT OF AGING
(Statewide)
(A) Senior Centers Capital Grant Program. Provide grants to
acquire property and to design, construct, renovate, and equip
senior citizen activities centers. The funds appropriated for
this purpose shall be administered in accordance with §§
10–501 through 10–510 of the Human Services Article.
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
AUTHORIZATION MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1,
2028 .......................................................................................... 818,000
DH01.04 MILITARY DEPARTMENT
(B) Havre de Grace Combined Support Maintenance Shop
Automotive and Surface Equipment Facility. Provide funds to
begin designing the Combined Support Maintenance Shop
Automotive and Surface Equipment Facility.
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
– 161 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
AUTHORIZATION MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1,
2028 (Harford County) ............................................................. 1,552,000
DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING
DW01.11 DIVISION OF HISTORICAL AND CULTURAL PROGRAMS
(Statewide)
(A) Maryland Historical Trust. Provide funds for the African
American Heritage Preservation Grant Program to assist in the
protection of properties with cultural and historic significance
to the African American community. The funds appropriated
for this purpose shall be administered in accordance with §
5A–330 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
AUTHORIZATION MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1,
2028 ............................................................................................ 1,000,000
(B) Maryland Historical Trust. Provide funds to be credited to the
Maryland Historical Trust Capital Grant Fund for historical
preservation and museum assistance. The funds appropriated
for this purpose shall be administered in accordance with §§
5A–328 and 5A–353 through 5A–359 of the State Finance and
Procurement Article. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF
THIS ACT, THIS AUTHORIZATION MAY NOT TERMINATE
BEFORE JUNE 1, 2028 ............................................................... 600,000
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
LA12.05 OFFICE OF MARKETING, ANIMAL INDUSTRIES AND
CONSUMER SERVICES
(A) Salisbury Animal Health Laboratory Replacement. Provide
funds to complete construction and equipping of a replacement
animal health laboratory in Salisbury (Wicomico County) ....... [12,417,000]
11,794,776
RB21 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND, BALTIMORE
(Baltimore City)
(A) Central Electric Substation and Electrical Infrastructure
Upgrades. Provide funds to continue construction and equip an
electric substation, recycling center, and electrical
infrastructure upgrades for the University of Maryland,
Baltimore. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS
– 162 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
ACT, THIS AUTHORIZATION MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE
JUNE 1, 2028 ............................................................................... 13,159,000
RD00 ST. MARY’S COLLEGE OF MARYLAND
(St. Mary’s County)
(A) Academic Building and Auditorium. Provide funds to
complete design and continue construction of a new academic
building and auditorium, provided that notwithstanding
Section 6 of this Act, work may commence on this project prior
to the appropriation of all funds necessary to complete this
project ........................................................................................ [13,208,000]
12,307,876
RP00 MARYLAND PUBLIC BROADCASTING COMMISSION
(B) Studio A Renovation and Addition. Provide funds to complete
design, construction, and equipping of the renovation and
expansion of Studio A (Baltimore County) .................................. [8,210,000]
8,085,835
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
(AQ) Maryland Independent College and University Association –
Stevenson University. Provide a grant equal to the lesser of (i)
$2,900,000 or (ii) the amount of the matching fund provided, to
the Board of Trustees of Stevenson University for the design,
construction, and equipping of a new academic building on the
Owings Mills Campus at Stevenson University, subject to the
requirement that the grantee provide an equal and matching
fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act,
the matching fund may consist of funds expended prior to the
effective date of this Act. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7)
OF THIS ACT, THIS AUTHORIZATION MAY NOT TERMINATE
BEFORE JUNE 1, 2028 (Baltimore County) .............................. 2,900,000
(BV) College Park Woods Community Facility Redevelopment.
Provide a grant to the Mayor and City Council of the City of
College Park for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the College Park Woods Community
Facility, located in Prince George’s County (Prince George’s
County) .......................................................................................... [200,000]
0
(BY) Stephen P. Turney Recreation Complex. Provide a grant to the
– 163 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Mayor and City Council of the City of Laurel for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Stephen P. Turney Recreation Complex (Prince George’s
County) ......................................................................................... [250,000]
0
(CB) YMCA of Cumberland. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of the Young Men’s Christian Association of
Cumberland, Maryland for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the pool area at the
Cumberland YMCA (Allegany County) ....................................... [50,000]
0
(DF) North County High School Field House. Provide a grant to the
Board of Education of Anne Arundel County for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
field house and accessory buildings at North County High
School, located in Anne Arundel County (Anne Arundel
County) ......................................................................................... [82,000]
0
(DO) Le Mondo. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of Le
Mondo, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Le Mondo arts development project,
located in Baltimore City (Baltimore City) .................................. [100,000]
0
(DT) Northeast Family Life Center. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of the Northeast Family and Community Center, Inc.
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Northeast Family Life Center facility, located
in Baltimore City (Baltimore City) .............................................. [50,000]
0
(EQ) Doctors Community Hospital. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of Doctors Community Hospital, Inc. for the planning,
design, construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of infrastructure
improvements at Doctors Community Hospital, including but
not limited to renovations to emergency room cubicles and the
installation of a campuswide camera security system (Prince
– 164 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
George’s County) ........................................................................... [250,000]
0
(FD) Bus Shelter Public Art Projects. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of the Prince George’s Arts and Humanities Council,
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of multiple bus shelter public art projects, located in
Prince George’s County (Prince George’s County) ........................ [100,000]
0
ZA01 MARYLAND HOSPITAL ASSOCIATION
(D) Howard County General Hospital, Inc. Provide a grant to the
Board of Trustees of the Howard County General Hospital, Inc.
to assist in the design, construction, and equipping of
renovations to the Berman Pavilion to create a comprehensive
Breast Center, subject to the requirement that the grantee
provide an equal and matching fund for this purpose.
Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching funds
may consist of funds expended prior to the effective date of this
Act. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
AUTHORIZATION MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1,
2028 (Howard County) ................................................................ 347,000
ZA02 LOCAL HOUSE OF DELEGATES INITIATIVES
(Statewide)
(J) Johnston Square Greenspace. Provide a grant equal to the
lesser of (i) $15,000 or (ii) the amount of the matching fund
provided, to the Board of Directors of ReBUILD Metro, Inc. and
the Mayor and City Council of the City of Baltimore for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
greenspace in Johnston Square, including landscaping, located
in Baltimore City. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the
matching fund may consist of in kind contributions (Baltimore
City) .............................................................................................. [15,000]
0
(M) New Creation Christian Church Hoop House. Provide a grant
of $100,000 to the Board of Directors of New Creation Christian
Church, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the New Creation Christian Church Hoop
House, located in Baltimore City (Baltimore City) ..................... [100,000]
– 165 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
0
(N) Restoration House. Provide a grant of [$50,000] $0 to the Board
of Directors of the Restoration House for Women and Children,
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Restoration House facility, located in Baltimore
City (Baltimore City) .................................................................... [50,000]
0
(AX) Allentown Splash, Tennis and Fitness Park. Provide a grant
equal to the lesser of (i) [$150,000] $0 or (ii) the amount of the
matching fund provided, to the Maryland–National Capital
Park and Planning Commission for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of a concession area and
related pool amenities for Allentown Splash, Tennis and Fitness
Park, located in Prince George’s County. Notwithstanding
Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund may consist of real
property (Prince George’s County) ............................................... [150,000]
0
ZA03 LOCAL SENATE INITIATIVES
(Statewide)
(B) Western Maryland Works. Provide a grant equal to the lesser
of (i) $60,000 or (ii) the amount of the matching fund provided,
to the Board of County Commissioners of Allegany County for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Western Maryland Works facility, located in
Allegany County. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the
matching fund may consist of real property, in kind
contributions, or funds expended prior to the effective date of
this Act (Allegany County) ........................................................... [60,000]
0
(C) YMCA of Cumberland. Provide a grant of $50,000 to the Board
of Directors of The Young Men’s Christian Association of
Cumberland Maryland for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the pool and related pool
facilities at the Cumberland YMCA, located in Allegany County
(Allegany County) ......................................................................... [50,000]
0
– 166 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
(H) North County High School Field House. Provide a grant of
$118,000 to the Board of Education of Anne Arundel County for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the field house and accessory buildings at North
County High School, located in Anne Arundel County (Anne
Arundel County) ........................................................................... [118,000]
0
(AN) Carroll Baldwin Hall. Provide a grant of $100,000 to the Board
of Directors of the Carroll Baldwin Memorial Institute, Inc. for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Carroll Baldwin Hall, located in Howard
County, subject to a requirement that the grantee provide and
expend a matching fund of $40,000 (Howard County) ............... [100,000]
0
(AP) Linwood School. Provide a grant equal to the lesser of (i)
$100,000 or (ii) the amount of the matching fund provided, to
the Board of Directors of the Linwood Center, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Linwood School, including site improvements to the school’s
parking lots, located in Howard County. Notwithstanding
Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund may consist of real
property or funds expended prior to the effective date of this
Act (Howard County) .................................................................... [100,000]
0
(AR) Centerway Local Park. Provide a grant equal to the lesser of (i)
[$250,000] $0 or (ii) the amount of the matching fund provided,
to the Maryland–National Capital Park and Planning
Commission for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of Centerway Local Park, including the
installation of playground equipment, located in Montgomery
County. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching
fund may consist of funds expended prior to the effective date
of this Act (Montgomery County) .................................................
[250,000]
0
(AU) Guru Nanak Health Clinic. Provide a grant equal to the lesser
of (i) [$100,000] $0 or (ii) the amount of the matching fund
provided, to the Board of Trustees of the Guru Nanak
Foundation of America, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
– 167 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
design, construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Guru Nanak
Foundation of America free health clinic facility, located in
Montgomery County (Montgomery County) ............................... [100,000]
0
(BD) Bus Shelter Public Art Projects. Provide a grant of [$50,000] $0
to the Board of Directors of the Prince George’s Arts and
Humanities Council, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of multiple bus shelter
public art projects, located in Prince George’s County (Prince
George’s County) .......................................................................... [50,000]
0
(BK) Prince George’s County Public Schools Electronic Signs.
Provide a grant of [$105,000] $0 to the Board of Education of
Prince George’s County for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of electronic signs for
Crossland High School, Potomac High School, and Thurgood
Marshall Middle School, located in Prince George’s County
(Prince George’s County) .............................................................. [105,000]
0
Chapter 14 of the Acts of 2019, as amended by Chapter 576 of the Acts
of 2021
Section 1(3)
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
(FE) East Baltimore Library and Library Annex. Provide a grant to
the Mayor and City Council of the City of Baltimore for the
planning, design, construction, repair, reconstruction,
renovation, site improvement, property acquisition, and capital
equipping of the East Baltimore Library and Library Annex,
subject to a requirement that the Johns Hopkins University
provide and expend a matching fund of $100,000. Further
provided that this authorization is contingent upon the
enactment of SB 793 (Baltimore City) ......................................... [100,000]
0
Chapter 14 of the Acts of 2019, as amended by Chapter 537 of the Acts
of 2020, Chapter 720 of the Acts of 2024, and Chapter 603 of the Acts of
– 168 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
2025
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan of 2019 in the total principal amount of [$1,085,520,365]
$1,083,873,852 $1,083,348,852 $1,082,798,852 $1,081,443,852. This loan shall be
evidenced by the issuance, sale, and delivery of State general obligation bonds authorized
by a resolution of the Board of Public Works and issued, sold, and delivered in accordance
with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
Chapter 537 of the Acts of 2020
Section 1(3)
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
LA12.05 OFFICE OF MARKETING, ANIMAL INDUSTRIES AND
CONSUMER SERVICES
(Wicomico County)
(A) Salisbury Animal Health Laboratory Replacement. Provide
funds to complete CONSTRUCTION AND equipping of a
replacement animal health laboratory in Salisbury.
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
AUTHORIZATION MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1,
2028 .............................................................................................. 1,074,000
RB23 BOWIE STATE UNIVERSITY
(Prince George’s County)
(B) Pedestrian and Vehicular Infrastructure Improvements.
Provide funds to design, construct, and equip pedestrian and
vehicular infrastructure improvements in connection with
development of a Maryland Area Regional Commuter line
station (Prince George’s County) ................................................ [150,000]
0
ZA02 LOCAL SENATE INITIATIVES
(BR) Mount Airy Center Street. Provide a grant of [$500,000] $0, to
the Mayor and Town Council of the Town of Mount Airy for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
– 169 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Mount Airy Center Street extension, located in Carroll County,
subject to a requirement that the grantee provide and expend a
matching fund of $450,000 (Carroll County) ............................. [500,000]
0
(CC) Carroll Manor Fire Company. Provide a grant of [$42,000] $0
to the Board of Directors of The Carroll Manor Fire Company,
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the sewer system at the Adamstown Fire Station,
located in Frederick County (Frederick County) ........................ [42,000]
0
(CI) Shafer Farm House. Provide a grant of [$100,000] $0, to the
Board of Directors of the Burkittsville Preservation Association,
Incorporated for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Shafer Farm House, including repairs
to the building’s roof, located in Frederick County, subject to a
requirement that the grantee provide and expend a matching
fund of $5,000. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the
matching fund may consist of real property (Frederick
County) ......................................................................................... [100,000]
0
(EE) Maryland Museum of Women’s History. Provide a grant of
$150,000 to the Board of Directors of the Mary Edwardine
Bourke Emory Foundation, Inc., Benefit Corp. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Maryland Museum of Women’s History facility, located in
Queen Anne’s County (Queen Anne’s County) ............................ [150,000]
0
Chapter 537 of the Acts of 2020, as amended by Chapter 576 of the Acts
of 2021
Section 1(3)
ZA03 LOCAL HOUSE OF DELEGATES INITIATIVES
(M) Blight Reduction and Homeownership Initiative. Provide a
grant equal to the lesser of (i) [$270,000] $0 or (ii) the amount
of the matching fund provided, to the Board of Directors of the
– 170 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
Cherry Hill Development Corporation for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
blighted homes for homeownership, located in Baltimore City.
Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund
may consist of in kind contributions (Baltimore City) ................ [270,000]
0
(P) Central Baltimore Partnership. Provide a [$1,000,000] grant to
the Board of Directors of The Central Baltimore Partnership,
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Station North Investment Fund, located in
Baltimore City (Baltimore City) ................................................... [1,000,000]
0
Chapter 537 of the Acts of 2020, as amended by Chapter 626 of the
Acts of 2022
Section 1(3)
ZA02 LOCAL SENATE INITIATIVES
(BX) Charles County – Basketball Courts. Provide a grant of
$100,000 to the Charles County Department of Recreation,
Tourism, and Parks for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of basketball courts in
Charles County (Charles County) ............................................... [100,000]
0
Chapter 537 of the Acts of 2020, as amended by Chapter 344 of the
Acts of 2022, Chapter 720 of the Acts of 2024, and Chapter 603 of the
Acts of 2025
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan of 2020 in the total principal amount of [$1,080,456,455]
$1,080,306,455 $1,080,056,455 $1,080,014,455 $1,078,144,455. This loan shall be
evidenced by the issuance, sale, and delivery of State general obligation bonds authorized
by a resolution of the Board of Public Works and issued, sold, and delivered in accordance
with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
– 171 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Chapter 63 of the Acts of 2021
Section 1(3)
RB26 FROSTBURG STATE UNIVERSITY
(Allegany County)
(B) Challenger Center. Provide funds to begin construction of the
Challenger Center, provided that notwithstanding Section 6 of
this Act, work may continue on this project prior to the
appropriation of all funds necessary to complete this
project .......................................................................................... [3,000,000]
0
DEPARTMENT OF JUVENILE SERVICES
VE01 RESIDENTIAL SERVICES
(A) Baltimore City Juvenile Justice Center Education Expansion.
Provide funds to complete design, begin construction, and begin
equipping the expansion of the existing Baltimore City
Juvenile Justice Center’s educational programming and
educational support spaces, provided that notwithstanding
Section 6 of this Act, work may commence on this project prior
to the appropriation of all funds necessary to complete this
project (Baltimore City) ............................................................... [2,550,000]
402,868
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
(V) Level82 Fund – Hilton Recreation Center Renovation. Provide a
grant to the Governing Boards of LEVEL82/Players
Philanthropy or the governing board of the Level82 Fund for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of a
recreation center (Baltimore City) ................................................ [500,000]
0
(DF) Germantown Volunteer Fire Department. Provide a grant to
the Board of Directors of the Germantown Volunteer Fire
Department, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Germantown
Volunteer Fire Department (Montgomery County) .................... [3,250,000]
0
– 172 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
(FQ) Manna Food Center. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors
of the Manna Food Center for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Manna Food Center
(Montgomery County) .................................................................. [150,000]
0
ZA02 LOCAL HOUSE OF DELEGATES INITIATIVES
(BT) Montgomery County Homeless Youth Drop–In Center. Provide
a grant to the Board of Directors of the Montgomery County
Collaboration Council for Children, Youth and Families, Inc.
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Montgomery County Homeless Youth Drop–In
Center, located in Montgomery County (Montgomery
County) ......................................................................................... [65,000]
0
ZA03 LOCAL SENATE INITIATIVES
(U) Northeast Market. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of
the Baltimore Public Markets Corporation for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Northeast Market facility, including the installation of an
energy efficient system, located in Baltimore City (Baltimore
City) .............................................................................................. [100,000]
0
Chapter 63 of the Acts of 2021, as amended by Chapter 344 of the Acts
of 2022, Chapter 720 of the Acts of 2024, and Chapter 603 of the Acts of
2025
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan of 2021 in the total principal amount of [$1,038,046,291]
$1,032,899,159 $1,032,799,159 $1,029,334,159 $1,028,834,159. This loan shall be
evidenced by the issuance, sale, and delivery of State general obligation bonds authorized
by a resolution of the Board of Public Works and issued, sold, and delivered in accordance
with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
Chapter 344 of the Acts of 2022
– 173 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Section 1(3)
RB31 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND BALTIMORE COUNTY
(Baltimore County)
(A) Sherman Hall Renovation. Provide funds to continue design
AND BEGIN CONSTRUCTION of the renovation of Sherman
Hall ................................................................................................ 1,886,000
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
(BC) FC Frederick, Inc. – New Youth Sporting Complex. Provide a
grant to the Board of Trustees of FC Frederick, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
FC Frederick Youth Sporting Complex (Frederick County) ....... [1,000,000]
400,000
(FU) Ambassador Theater. Provide a grant to the [Board of Directors
of Artspace Baltimore, LLC] AMBASSADOR CENTER FOR
ARTS AND CULTURE, INC. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, EXPANSION, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Ambassador Theater (Baltimore City) ......................................... [2,500,000]
2,250,000
(FY) The West North Avenue Development Authority. Provide a grant
to the Board of Directors of the West North Avenue Development
Authority for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of The West North Avenue Development
Authority (Baltimore City) ........................................................... [1,000,000]
0
(HJ) Behavioral Health Crisis Mobile Response Unit. Provide a
grant to the County Commissioners of Charles County for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Behavioral Health Crisis Mobile Response Unit, including the
acquisition and equipping of vehicles (Charles County) ............. [500,000]
0
ZA02 LOCAL SENATE INITIATIVES
– 174 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
(AM) Sanaa Center. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of the
Pennsylvania Avenue Black Arts and Entertainment District,
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Sanaa Center (Baltimore City) ......................... [100,000]
0
(DH) Food Systems Facility. Provide a grant to the Executive and
County Council of Montgomery County for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Montgomery County Food Council food systems facility
(Montgomery County) .................................................................. [75,000]
0
ZA03 LOCAL HOUSE OF DELEGATES INITIATIVES
(CL) Food Systems Facility. Provide a grant to the Executive and
County Council of Montgomery County for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Montgomery County Food Council food systems facility
(Montgomery County) .................................................................. [75,000]
0
Chapter 344 of the Acts of 2022, as amended by Chapter 102 of the
Acts of 2023
Section 1(3)
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
KA05 CAPITAL GRANTS AND LOANS ADMINISTRATION
(Statewide)
(C) Critical Maintenance Program. Provide funds to construct
capital improvements such as planned maintenance and repair
projects at public use facilities on State–owned and local
government property .................................................................... 4,000,000
Provided that the remainder of this authorization shall be
allocated as follows:
(7) Patapsco Valley State Park –
Alberton Lot Paving (Howard
County) ............................................ [100,000]
– 175 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
0
(19) Seneca Creek State Park –
Replace Security Fence and
Lights – Maintenance Complex
(Montgomery County) ...................... [29,000]
0
(21) Seneca Creek State Park – Install
Door Openers to Shop and Cold
Storage Overhead Doors
(Montgomery County) ..................... [20,000]
0
(26) Assateague State Park – Replace
Fiberglass Showers and Hot Water
Heaters – Bathhouse 1–5 and
Concession (Worcester County) ...... [125,000]
0
(30) Cedarville State Forest – Re–Roof
and Chimney Repairs Shelters #1
and #2 (Prince George’s County) ..... [60,000]
0
Chapter 344 of the Acts of 2022, as amended by Chapter 141 of the
Acts of 2023
Section 1(3)
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
(DV–1) Hancock Boys and Girls Club. Provide a grant to the Board of
County Commissioners of Washington County for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Hancock Boys and Girls Club (Washington County) .................. [300,000]
0
Chapter 344 of the Acts of 2022, as amended by Chapter 102 of the
Acts of 2023, Chapter 720 of the Acts of 2024, and Chapter 603 of the
Acts of 2025
Section 1
– 176 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan of 2022 in the total principal amount of [$1,179,261,662]
$1,178,311,662 $1,177,711,662 $1,176,361,662. This loan shall be evidenced by the
issuance, sale, and delivery of State general obligation bonds authorized by a resolution of
the Board of Public Works and issued, sold, and delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117
through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
Chapter 102 of the Acts of 2023
Section 1(3)
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL
SERVICES
QB01.01 DIVISION OF CORRECTION – HEADQUARTERS
(Baltimore City)
(A) Women’s Prerelease Center. Provide funds to begin design of a
new prerelease unit for women .................................................... [3,000,000]
0
RM00 MORGAN STATE UNIVERSITY
(D) New Health and Human Services Building, Phase II. Provide
funds to complete construction and equipping of the new
Health and Human Services Building (Baltimore City) ............. [60,604,000]
57,604,000
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
(BX) Frenchtown Wharf Park – Town of Elkton. Provide a grant to
the Mayor and Board of Commissioners of the Town of Elkton
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Town of Elkton’s Frenchtown Wharf Park
(Cecil County) ............................................................................... [200,000]
0
(DU) Baltimore Penn Station Redevelopment. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of the Central Baltimore Partnership, Inc.
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of infrastructure improvements to Baltimore Penn
Station, including the redevelopment of the Head House
building (Baltimore City) ............................................................. [2,000,000]
– 177 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
0
(KE) Willing Helpers Society Renovation. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of Willing Helpers Society, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Willing Helpers Society property (Charles County) ................... [350,000]
250,000
ZA02 LOCAL HOUSE OF DELEGATES INITIATIVES
(S) Douglas Village Apartments Phase I. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of the Douglas Memorial Community Church
Village, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of Douglas Village Apartments Phase I
(Baltimore City) ............................................................................ [150,000]
0
(AT) Frenchtown Wharf Park – Town of Elkton. Provide a grant to
the Town of Elkton for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Town of Elkton’s
Frenchtown Wharf Park (Cecil County) ...................................... [200,000]
0
ZA03 LOCAL SENATE INITIATIVES
(AU) Frenchtown Wharf Park – Town of Elkton. Provide a grant to
the Town of Elkton for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Town of Elkton’s
Frenchtown Wharf Park (Cecil County) ...................................... [100,000]
0
ZB02 LOCAL JAILS AND DETENTION CENTERS
(A) Frederick County Adult Detention Center Phase IV Medical
Addition. Provide a grant to Frederick County, Maryland, to
complete construction and equipping of a new medical unit at
the Frederick County Adult Detention Center, subject to the
requirement that the grantee provide an equal and matching
fund for this purpose (Frederick County) ................................... [1,011,000]
0
Chapter 102 of the Acts of 2023, as amended by Chapter 720 of the
– 178 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
Acts of 2024 and Chapter 603 of the Acts of 2025
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan of 2023 in the total principal amount of [$1,180,603,609]
$1,170,592,609 $1,167,992,609 $1,167,842,609. This loan shall be evidenced by the
issuance, sale, and delivery of State general obligation bonds authorized by a resolution of
the Board of Public Works and issued, sold, and delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117
through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
Chapter 102 of the Acts of 2023, as amended by Chapter 603 of the
Acts of 2025
Section 1(3)
DE02.01 BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS
STATE GOVERNMENT CENTER – ANNAPOLIS
(Anne Arundel County)
(C) State House and Old Treasury Building Restoration. Provide
funds to complete construction of the restoration of and
improvements to the exterior and grounds of the historic
Maryland State House and interior of the State House and
Old Treasury buildings, including the old Senate chamber, in
the Annapolis State Government Complex .............................. [18,339,000]
15,339,000
Chapter 720 of the Acts of 2024
Section 1(3)
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL
SERVICES
QB01.01 DIVISION OF CORRECTION
(Baltimore City)
(A) New Life Skills and Re–Entry Center for Women. Provide
funds to complete design of a prerelease facility for women in
the City of Baltimore .................................................................... [4,025,000]
0
– 179 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
RB25 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND EASTERN SHORE
(Somerset County)
(A) [Campus Flood Mitigation] CAMPUS SWITCHGEAR
REPLACEMENT. [Provide funds to complete design and
construction of site and building improvements to reduce
damage during flood events] PROVIDE FUNDS TO REPLACE
THE CAMPUS SWITCHGEAR ....................................................... 3,129,000
DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT
SA24 DIVISION OF NEIGHBORHOOD REVITALIZATION
(A) Baltimore Regional Neighborhood Initiative. Provide funds for
grants and loans to nonprofit community development
corporations or coalitions to fund comprehensive revitalization
strategies for Sustainable Communities in Baltimore City,
Baltimore County, and Anne Arundel County (Regional) .......... 20,500,000
Provided that $9,050,000 of this authorization may be used
only to provide grants as follows:
(5) Board of Directors of [KEYS
Empowerment, Inc.] A STRONG
FOUNDATION, INC. for the
acquisition, planning, design,
construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of [a
Harmony Hub site located on Belair
Rd.] VACANT HOMES IN THE
DARLEY PARK, 4X4 AND BEREA
COMMUNITIES ................................. 750,000
VE01 DEPARTMENT OF JUVENILE SERVICES
(Baltimore City)
(A) Maryland Youth Residence Center Renovation and Expansion.
Provide funds to begin design of the renovation and expansion
of a residential treatment center for male youths in Baltimore
City ................................................................................................ [1,430,000]
0
ZA02 LOCAL SENATE INITIATIVES
– 180 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
(Statewide)
(BE) Boys and Girls Club of Southern Maryland – Waldorf Club
Park. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of The Boys and
Girls Clubs of Southern Maryland, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Boys and Girls Club of Southern Maryland – Waldorf Club
Park (Charles County) ................................................................. [300,000]
0
Chapter 720 of the Acts of 2024, as amended by Chapter 603 of the
Acts of 2025
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan of 2024 in the total principal amount of [$1,805,846,500]
$1,800,391,500 $1,800,091,500. This loan shall be evidenced by the issuance, sale, and
delivery of State general obligation bonds authorized by a resolution of the Board of Public
Works and issued, sold, and delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 and
8–131.2 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
Chapter 603 of the Acts of 2025
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan of 2025 in the total principal amount of [$1,814,825,000]
$1,765,318,000 $1,763,718,000 $1,763,683,000. This loan shall be evidenced by the
issuance, sale, and delivery of State general obligation bonds authorized by a resolution of
the Board of Public Works and issued, sold, and delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117
through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
Section 1(3)
DE02.01 BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS
JUDICIARY/MULTISERVICE CENTERS
(C) New Supreme Court of Maryland Building. Provide funds to
continue construction of a new Supreme Court of Maryland
– 181 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Building in Annapolis, provided that notwithstanding Section
6 of this Act, work may continue on this project prior to the
appropriation of all funds necessary to complete this project[.
Further provided that $17,030,000 of this authorization shall
be used for the design, construction, and equipping of the New
State Veterans Home in Sykesville and serve as the matching
fund requirements should Maryland receive a conditional
federal award from the Veterans Home Construction Grant
Program prior to June 1, 2026] (Anne Arundel County) ........ 26,117,000
STATE GOVERNMENT CENTER – ANNAPOLIS
(Anne Arundel County)
(D) Revolutionary War Memorial for Black Soldiers. Provide
funds to construct a new monument that honors Black
Revolutionary War Soldiers ...................................................... [1,000,000]
750,000
DH01.04 MILITARY DEPARTMENT
MILITARY DEPARTMENT OPERATIONS AND
MAINTENANCE
(C) New Joint Force Headquarters at Camp Fretterd. Provide funds
to begin the design for the renovation and expansion of the
Camp Fretterd Readiness Center for the purposes of creating a
new Joint Forces Headquarters located at Camp Fretterd
Military Reservation (Baltimore County) .................................... [750,000]
0
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL
SERVICES
QB01.01 DIVISION OF CORRECTION
(Baltimore City)
(A) New Life Skills and Re–Entry Center for Women. Provide
funds to complete design and begin construction of a prerelease
facility for women ......................................................................... [2,000,000]
0
QT04 DIVISION OF PRETRIAL DETENTION
(Baltimore City)
(A) Baltimore Therapeutic Treatment Center. Provide funds to
complete design and begin construction of a therapeutic
– 182 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
treatment and detention center at the Baltimore City
Correctional Complex, provided that notwithstanding Section
6 of this Act, work may commence on this project prior to the
appropriation of all funds necessary to complete this project[.
Further provided that $45,857,000 of this authorization shall
be used for the design, construction, and equipping of the New
State Veterans Home in Sykesville and serve as the matching
fund requirements should Maryland receive a conditional
federal award from the Veterans Home Construction Program
prior to June 1, 2026] ................................................................... [45,857,000]
0
RB25 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND EASTERN SHORE
(Somerset County)
(A) [New Residence Hall] NUTTLE HALL DEMOLITION. Provide
funds for [preliminary design to assist with predevelopment
activities for a new residence hall] THE PLANNING, DESIGN,
AND CONSTRUCTION OF THE DEMOLITION OF NUTTLE
HALL INCLUDING ALL RELATED SITE AND UTILITY
WORK ........................................................................................... 1,000,000
DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT
SA24 DIVISION OF NEIGHBORHOOD REVITALIZATION
(A) Baltimore Regional Neighborhood Initiative. Provide funds for
grants and loans to nonprofit community development
corporations or coalitions to fund comprehensive revitalization
strategies for Sustainable Communities in Baltimore City,
Baltimore County, and Anne Arundel County (Regional) ........... 18,000,000
Provided that $8,350,000 of this authorization may be used only
to provide grants as follows:
(8) [Market Fresh Gourmet –
Poppleton] WESTSIDE OPEN
WORKS. Provide a grant to the
[Board of Directors of the
Neighborhood Impact Investment
Fund] BALTIMORE ARTS REALTY
CORPORATION for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation,
– 183 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the [Market
Fresh Gourmet facilities]
WESTSIDE OPEN WORKS
500,000
(Baltimore City) ................................
(D) National Capital Strategic Economic Development Fund.
Provide funds to assist government agencies and nonprofit
community development organizations to assist in
predevelopment activities for commercial and residential
development, including site acquisition, land assembly,
architecture and engineering, and site development for
revitalization in areas of the National Capital Region as set
forth by § 6–710 of the Housing and Community Development
Article (Regional) .......................................................................... 18,000,000
Provided that $9,400,000 of this authorization may be used only
to provide grants as follows:
(1) Board of Directors of the College
Park City – University Partnership
for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping
of PROPERTIES NEAR the College
Park Airport, including stormwater
and floodplain management (Prince
George’s County) ............................... 3,000,000
VE01 DEPARTMENT OF JUVENILE SERVICES
(Baltimore City)
(A) Maryland Youth Residence Center Renovation and Expansion.
Provide funds to continue design of the renovation and
expansion of a residential treatment center for male youths in
Baltimore City ............................................................................. [1,150,000]
0
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
(O) Inner Harbor Promenade. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of the Waterfront Management Authority for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of infrastructure improvements for the Inner Harbor
– 184 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
Promenade (Baltimore City) ........................................................ [35,000,000]
34,400,000
(FT) Mid Shore Regional Detention Center. Provide a grant to the
Board of County Commissioners of Queen Anne’s County for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Mid Shore Regional Detention Center
(Queen Anne’s County) ................................................................ [500,000]
0
(JE) Salem United Methodist Church. Provide a grant to the Board
of Directors of the Salem United Methodist Church for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Salem United Methodist Church (Montgomery
County) .......................................................................................... [150,000]
115,000
Section 1(11)
Notwithstanding §§ 8–125(e) and 8–132 of the State Finance and Procurement
Article, the State Treasurer shall determine the amount of premium from the sale of bonds
in fiscal years 2024 [and], 2025, AND 2026 to be transferred to the Annuity Bond Fund.
Upon each issuance of State bonds in fiscal years 2024 [and], 2025, AND 2026, the
Treasurer shall notify the Comptroller of the Treasurer’s determination and the
Comptroller shall credit the premium accordingly. Premium from the sale of bonds in fiscal
years 2024 [and], 2025, AND 2026 that is not transferred to the Annuity Bond Fund may,
upon approval of the Board of Public Works, be expended by the Comptroller for any of the
public purposes set forth in Section 1(3) of this Act, including any applicable architects’ and
engineers’ fees.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the General Assembly
declares that it is the public policy of this State to manage State general obligation bond
debt in a manner that will maintain Maryland’s high quality credit rating. The General
Assembly further declares that legislative oversight, control, and review of all forms of
State obligations are essential to maintenance of the State’s existing bond rating and
protection of the fiscal integrity of the State.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, before work may commence
pursuant to any supplement to any appropriation contained in this Act, satisfactory
evidence must be given to the Board of Public Works that the project can be completed with
the aggregate of the funds in this Act and previously appropriated for the stated purpose.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
– 185 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) with the approval of the Department of Budget and Management, any
appropriation for design provided in this Act may be used to fund construction if the amount
of the appropriation exceeds the amount required for design expenses, including allowances
for contingencies; and
(2) with the approval of the Department of Budget and Management, any
appropriation for construction provided in this Act may be used to purchase capital
equipment if the amount of the appropriation exceeds the amount required for construction
expenses, including allowances for contingencies.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as otherwise provided
in this Act, before a State agency or institution named in this Act as responsible for an
individual item may begin work with funds appropriated by this Act, the agency or
institution shall provide satisfactory evidence to the Board of Public Works that the work
described in the individual item can be completed with the funds specified for that item.
SECTION 7. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, with the approval of the
Department of Budget and Management, any appropriation under the provisions of this
Act that is in excess of the amount needed for a project may be credited to the Construction
Contingency Fund under § 3–609 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
Notwithstanding the fund balance restriction set forth in § 3–609(c) of the State Finance
and Procurement Article, any funds credited to the Fund may cause the total balance in
the Fund to exceed 1.25% of the capital debt affordability limit as determined under Title
8 of the State Finance and Procurement Article, in fiscal year 2027.
SECTION 8. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, if federal funds are available
to help accomplish any project identified in this Act, the State agency or institution
responsible for the project shall make efforts through proper administrative procedures to
obtain these federal funds. Before spending any funds appropriated by this Act, the agency
or institution shall certify its efforts to the Board of Public Works and state the reason for
any failure to obtain federal funds. If federal funds are obtained, they shall be used to defray
the costs of the project described in this Act and not to expand its scope.
SECTION 9. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(1) for any appropriation for the planning of a State–owned project provided in
this Act, if a program required by § 3–602(d) of the State Finance and Procurement Article
has not been submitted, the State agency or institution responsible for the project shall
submit a program to the Department of Budget and Management for approval before funds
may be expended from the appropriation; and
(2) for any appropriation for the construction of a State–owned project provided
in this Act, if preliminary plans and outline specifications required by § 3–602(f)(2)(i) of the
State Finance and Procurement Article have not been prepared, the State agency or
institution responsible for the project shall submit preliminary plans and outline
specifications to the Department of Budget and Management for approval before funds may
– 186 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
be expended from the appropriation.
SECTION 10. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That no portion of the proceeds of
a loan or any of the matching funds provided for a project funded under this Act may be
used for the furtherance of an essentially religious endeavor. Upon the request of the Board
of Public Works, a recipient of the proceeds of a loan under this Act shall submit evidence
satisfactory to the Board that none of the proceeds of the loan or any matching funds have
been or are being used for a purpose prohibited by this Act.
SECTION 11. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Comptroller may
advance funds to any loan funds account established pursuant to a general obligation bond
loan enabling Act for any expenditure authorized by that Act, provided that if general
obligation bonds have not been issued under the authority of that Act, the next ensuing
sale of general obligation bonds shall include the issuance of bonds under the authority of
that Act in an amount at least equivalent to the amount of the funds so advanced.
SECTION 12. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section(s) 13, 14, 15, and 16
of Chapter 603 of the Acts of the General Assembly of 2025 be repealed.
SECTION 13. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan Preauthorization Act of 2027 in the total principal amount
of $409,176,000 $456,406,000 $460,906,000 $496,206,000 $511,006,000. These loans shall
be evidenced by the issuance, sale, and delivery of State general obligation bonds
authorized by a resolution of the Board of Public Works and issued, sold, and delivered in
accordance with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the State Finance and
Procurement Article.
(2) The bonds to evidence these loans or installments of these loans may be sold
as a single issue or may be consolidated and sold as part of a single issue of bonds under §
8–122 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(3) The cash proceeds of the sale of the bonds shall be paid to the Treasurer and
first shall be applied to the payment of the expenses of issuing, selling, and delivering the
bonds, unless funds for this purpose are otherwise provided, and then shall be credited on
the books of the Comptroller and expended, on approval by the Board of Public Works, for
the following public purposes, including any applicable architects’ and engineers’ fees:
DE02.01 BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS
JUDICIARY/MULTISERVICE CENTERS
(A) New Supreme Court of Maryland Building. Provide funds to
continue construction of a new Supreme Court of Maryland
– 187 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Building in Annapolis, provided that notwithstanding Section 6
of this Act, work may continue on this project prior to the
appropriation of all funds necessary to complete this project
(Anne Arundel County) ................................................................ 52,692,000
(B) Washington County District Court Renovation and Expansion.
Provide funds to complete construction of a renovation and an
addition to the Washington County District Court in
Hagerstown (Washington County) ............................................... 739,000
MILITARY DEPARTMENT
DH01.04 MILITARY DEPARTMENT OPERATIONS AND
MAINTENANCE
(Frederick County)
(A) Frederick Readiness Center Renovation and Expansion.
Provide funds to complete construction of the renovation and
expansion of the Frederick Readiness Center ............................ 2,678,000
DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING
DW01.10 DIVISION OF HISTORICAL AND CULTURAL PROGRAMS
(A) African American Heritage Preservation Grant Program.
Provide funds to the Maryland Historical Trust to assist in the
protection of properties with cultural and historic significance
to the African American community. The funds appropriated
for this purpose shall be administered in accordance with §
5A–330 of the State Finance and Procurement Article ............. 250,000
(1) Dowden Chapel (Baltimore
County) ............................................. 250,000
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
KA05 CAPITAL GRANTS AND LOANS ADMINISTRATION
(A) Natural Resources Development Fund. Provide funds to
construct capital development projects on Department of
Natural Resources property in accordance with § 5–903(g) of
the Natural Resources Article .................................................... 1,424,000
3,424,000
(1) Rocky Gap State Park –
Campground Improvements
– 188 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
(Allegany County) ............................ 1,424,000
(2) Gwynns Falls State Park
(Baltimore City) ............................... 2,000,000
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
ML10 CLIFTON T. PERKINS HOSPITAL CENTER
(Howard County)
(A) Renovation of Clifton T. Perkins Hospital North Wing. Provide
funds to continue construction of renovations to the North Wing
of Clifton T. Perkins Hospital Center and an addition to the
hospital, provided that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act,
work may continue on this project prior to the appropriation of
all funds necessary to complete this project ............................... 28,593,000
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL
SERVICES
QR02.03 ROXBURY CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION
(Washington County)
(A) RCI Perimeter Fence System Replacement. Provide funds to
continue construction of the replacement perimeter fencing and
security systems at Roxbury Correctional Institution, provided
that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue
on this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary
to complete this project ............................................................... 12,801,000
UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND
RB21 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND, BALTIMORE CAMPUS
(Baltimore City)
(A) Central Electric Substation and Electrical Infrastructure
Upgrades. Provide funds to complete construction of an electric
substation and electrical infrastructure upgrades ..................... 12,376,000
RB22 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND, COLLEGE PARK CAMPUS
(Prince George’s County)
(A) New Health and Human Sciences Complex. Provide funds to
complete construction of the Health and Human Sciences
Complex for the School of Public Health and Academy for
Innovation and Entrepreneurship .............................................. 47,920,000
– 189 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
RB28 UNIVERSITY OF BALTIMORE
(Baltimore City)
(A) 101 W. Mt. Royal Ave. Property Acquisition. Provide funds to
acquire property at 101 W. Mt. Royal Ave .................................. 7,100,000
RB36 UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND OFFICE
(Baltimore City)
(A) Rita Colwell Center Deferred Maintenance. Provide funds to
complete construction of deferred maintenance improvements,
including roof replacement and central plant upgrades, at the
Rita Colwell Center in Baltimore City ....................................... 4,820,000
RC00 BALTIMORE CITY COMMUNITY COLLEGE
(Baltimore City)
(A) Learning Commons Renovation and Addition. Provide funds to
continue construction of the renovation and expansion of the
Bard Library to create a Learning Commons building, provided
that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue
on this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary
to complete this project ................................................................ 23,903,000
RE01 MARYLAND SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF
(Frederick County)
(A) New Student Residences. Provide funds to continue
construction of a new high school boys’ residence, high school
girls’ residence, flexible residence, satellite health center,
student center, and central offices at the Maryland School for
the Deaf in Frederick, provided that notwithstanding Section 6
of this Act, work may continue on this project prior to the
appropriation of all funds necessary to complete this project ... 22,937,000
RI00 MARYLAND HIGHER EDUCATION COMMISSION
(A) Community College Construction Grant Program. Provide
funds to assist the subdivisions in the acquisition of property
and in the design, construction, renovation, and equipping of
local and regional community college buildings, site
improvements, and facilities. The funds appropriated for this
purpose shall be administered in accordance with § 11–105(j)
of the Education Article, provided that notwithstanding Section
6 of this Act, work may continue on each of these projects prior
– 190 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
to the appropriation of all funds necessary to complete the
project .......................................................................................... 65,092,000
(1) Allegany College of Maryland –
Workforce Development and
Training Center Renovation
(Allegany County) ........................... 6,724,000
(2) Anne Arundel Community College
– Dragun Building Renovation
(Anne Arundel County) ................... 7,384,000
(3) Chesapeake College – New Queen
Anne’s Technical Building (Queen
Anne’s County) ................................. 16,447,000
(4) Community College of Baltimore
County – Catonsville – Automotive
Technology Center Renovation and
Expansion (Baltimore County) ....... 5,635,000
(5) Community College of Baltimore
County – Essex – Primary
Switchgear and Distribution
Replacement (Baltimore County) .... 6,038,000
(6) Prince George’s Community College
– New Charlene Mickens Dukes
Student Center (Prince George’s
County) ............................................. 22,864,000
RM00 MORGAN STATE UNIVERSITY
(Baltimore City)
(A) Campuswide Electric Infrastructure Upgrades. Provide funds
to continue construction of a new electrical substation,
substation upgrades, and related electrical infrastructure
components at Morgan State University, provided that
notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue on
this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary to
complete this project .................................................................... 37,250,000
(B) New Science Center, Phase II. Provide funds to continue
construction of the New Science Center, provided that
notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue on
this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary to
– 191 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
complete this project .................................................................... 74,944,000
UB00 MARYLAND ENVIRONMENTAL SERVICE
(A) State Water and Sewer Infrastructure Improvement Fund.
Provide funds to design, construct, and equip capital
improvements for State institutions. Expenditures for the
following projects may not exceed the amounts listed below by
more than 7.5% without notification to the General Assembly.
Funds may be spent only on the project listed below or on prior
or future authorized projects. Expenditure of any part of this
appropriation for a prior or future authorized project shall also
require notification to the General Assembly ............................. 11,712,000
(1) Albert Powell Fish Hatchery –
Wastewater Treatment Plant
(Washington County) ....................... 1,278,000
(2) Charlotte Hall Veterans Home –
Water Treatment Plant Upgrade
(St. Mary’s County) .......................... 5,766,000
(3) Maryland Correctional Institution
Boiler Plant – Physical Plant and
Major Systems Upgrade
(Washington County) ....................... 1,728,000
(4) Swallow Falls State Park – Water
and Wastewater Treatment Plant
Upgrade (Garrett County) ............... 2,940,000
WA01 DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE
(Prince George’s County)
(A) Barrack L – Forestville: New Barrack and Garage. Provide
funds to continue construction of a replacement barrack and
garage in Forestville, provided that notwithstanding Section 6
of this Act, work may continue on this project prior to the
appropriation of all funds necessary to complete this project .... 9,295,000
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
(A) Bowie Mill Bike Trail. Provide a grant to Montgomery County,
Maryland for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of Bowie Mill bike trail
– 192 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
(Montgomery County) .................................................................. 500,000
0
(B) Athlife Foundation. Provide a grant to Athlife Foundation, Inc.
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of infrastructure improvements, including
projects for Baltimore City Public Schools (Baltimore City) ..... 500,000
(C) B&O Railroad Museum Restoration. Provide a grant to the
B&O Railroad Museum, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
infrastructure improvements to the B&O Railroad Museum
(Baltimore City) ........................................................................... 3,000,000
(D) Burtonsville Park and Ride. Provide a grant to Montgomery
County, Maryland for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Burtonsville
Commuter Parking facility (Montgomery County) .................... 2,000,000
(E) Inner Harbor Promenade. Provide a grant to the Waterfront
Management Authority for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Inner Harbor
Promenade (Baltimore City) ....................................................... 600,000
(F) Howard House Revitalization. Provide a grant to the HH
Owner LLC for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the downtown Elkton
revitalization of the Historic Howard Hotel and adjacent
fire–damaged structures (Cecil County) .................................... 1,330,000
(G) Kingdom Care Center. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of Kingdom Global Community Development
Corporation (KGCDC) for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Kingdom Care
Center (Prince George’s County) ................................................ 500,000
(H) MedStar Southern Maryland Hospital. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of MedStar Southern Maryland Hospital
Center, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
– 193 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
improvement, and capital equipping of infrastructure
improvements to MedStar Southern Maryland Hospital,
including construction of an Advanced Critical Care Tower
(Prince George’s County) ............................................................. 10,000,000
13,000,000
(I) Montgomery County Fraternal Order of Police Lodge No. 35.
Provide a grant to the Montgomery County Fraternal Order of
Police Lodge No. 35, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of infrastructure
improvements to Lodge No. 35 (Montgomery County) .............. 250,000
(J) National Aquarium in Baltimore – Infrastructure
Improvements. Provide a grant to the National Aquarium in
Baltimore, Inc. to assist in the design, construction, renovation,
and equipping of infrastructure improvements at the National
Aquarium in Baltimore (Baltimore City) ................................... 5,000,000
(K) Olney Satellite Police Station and Community Facility. Provide
a grant to the Olney Chamber of Commerce, Inc. Montgomery
County, Maryland for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Olney Satellite
Police Station and community facility (Montgomery County) .. 2,000,000
(L) Pikesville Armory Foundation – Pikesville Armory Renovation.
Provide a grant to the governing board of the Pikesville Armory
Foundation, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Pikesville
Armory (Baltimore County) ........................................................ 3,000,000
(M) Sandy Spring Volunteer Fire Department. Provide a grant to
Sandy Spring Volunteer Fire Department, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Sandy Spring Volunteer Fire Department,
including Station 40 outbuilding (Montgomery County) ........... 1,450,000
(N) Westminster Fiber Project. Provide a grant to the Mayor and
City Council of the City of Westminster for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Westminster fiber project (Carroll County) ............................... 1,000,000
– 194 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
(O) North Locust Point Terminal. Provide a grant to the Maryland
Economic Development Corporation in coordination with the
Maryland Port Administration for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
infrastructure improvements to the North Locust Point
Terminal (Baltimore City) .......................................................... 5,000,000
(P) Bowleys Quarters Volunteer Fire Department. Provide a grant
to the Community Volunteer Fire Department of Bowleys
Quarters and Vicinity, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Bowleys Quarters Fire Station and Community Center
(Baltimore County) ...................................................................... 1,400,000
(Q) Bel Air Community Park. Provide a grant to the Town of Bel
Air for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of a community park
(Harford County) ......................................................................... 2,000,000
(R) International Union of Painters and Allied Trades, District
Council 51. Provide a grant to IUPAT District Council 51 for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of infrastructure improvements to the IUPAT
facility (Prince George’s County) ................................................ 350,000
(S) Solo Gibbs Recreation Center. Provide a grant to the Baltimore
City Department of Recreation and Parks for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Solo Gibbs Recreation Center (Baltimore City) ......................... 1,000,000
(T) Bluebird Education Network, Clay Hill Public Charter School.
Provide a grant to the Bluebird Education Network, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of Bluebird Education Network, Inc. facilities
(Baltimore City) ........................................................................... 1,000,000
(U) Luminis Health Doctors Community Medical Center – New
Obstetrical Care Tower. Provide a grant to the Luminis Health
Doctors Community Medical Center, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
– 195 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
infrastructure improvements to the Luminis Health Doctors
Community Medical Center, including a new obstetrical care
tower (Prince George’s County) ................................................... 10,000,000
(V) Suitland – Silver Hill Redevelopment. Provide a grant to PGC
Vision for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement,
and capital equipping of mixed–use community space in
Suitland (Prince George’s County) .............................................. 10,000,000
(W) White Oak Redevelopment. Provide a grant to Montgomery
County, Maryland for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of infrastructure
improvements in White Oak (Montgomery County) ................... 15,000,000
(X) Asian American Healthcare, Inc. Provide a grant to Asian
American Healthcare, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of infrastructure
improvements for the Asian American Healthcare, Inc. project
(Howard County) ......................................................................... 200,000
(Y) Howard County Chinese School Expansion for Cultural and
Educational Enrichment. Provide a grant to the Howard
County Chinese School, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Howard County Chinese School (Howard County) .................... 100,000
(Z) Mount Vernon Place Conservancy – North and South Squares
Revitalization. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of the
Mount Vernon Place Conservancy, Inc. for the planning, design,
construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the North and South
Squares at Mount Vernon Place (Baltimore City) ...................... 250,000
(AA) Arts Every Day. Provide a grant to Arts Every Day and
Baltimore City Public Schools for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of art
spaces, including black boxes (Baltimore City) .......................... 2,500,000
(AB) Former GEICO Headquarters Redevelopment. Provide a grant
to Montgomery County, Maryland for the acquisition, planning,
– 196 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
former GEICO headquarters, located at 5260 Western Avenue
(Montgomery County) .................................................................. 2,500,000
(AC) MD 32 Noise Mitigation for Fox Valley Estates. Provide a grant
to the Fox Valley Estates Homeowners Association for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the MD 32 Noise Mitigation for Fox Valley Estates
project (Howard County) ............................................................. 2,500,000
(AD) Port Discovery Capital Upgrades–Phase B. Provide a grant to
The Baltimore Children’s Museum, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of Port
Discovery Children’s Museum (Baltimore City) ......................... 800,000
(AE) Olney Boys and Girls Club. Provide a grant to the Olney Boys
and Girls Community Sports Association, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of Olney Boys and Girls Club facilities, including
lighting and fields (Montgomery County) ................................... 500,000
(AF) Owings Mills High School – Field Improvements. Provide a
grant to Baltimore County Public Schools for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
infrastructure improvements at Owings Mills High School,
including field improvements (Baltimore County) ..................... 1,000,000
(AG) City of Cambridge – Multiple Bridge Improvements. Provide a
grant to the City of Cambridge for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of five
bridges in Cambridge (Dorchester County) ................................ 2,000,000
(AH) Schucks Road Regional Complex. Provide a grant to Harford
County, Maryland for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Schucks Road
Regional Complex, including infrastructure improvements to
restroom facilities and to support the Miracle League special
needs baseball field and sensory trail (Harford County) ........... 500,000
– 197 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(AI) Ambassador Theater. Provide a grant to the Ambassador
Center for Arts and Culture, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Ambassador Theater (Baltimore City) ........................................ 250,000
(4) An annual tax is imposed on all assessable property in the State in rate and
amount sufficient to pay the principal of and interest on the bonds, as and when due and
until paid in full. The principal shall be discharged within 15 years after the date of issue
of the bonds.
SECTION 14. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan Preauthorization Act of 2028 in the total principal amount
of $215,424,000 $230,424,000. These loans shall be evidenced by the issuance, sale, and
delivery of State general obligation bonds authorized by a resolution of the Board of Public
Works and issued, sold, and delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 and
8–131.2 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(2) The bonds to evidence these loans or installments of these loans may be sold
as a single issue or may be consolidated and sold as part of a single issue of bonds under §
8–122 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(3) The cash proceeds of the sale of the bonds shall be paid to the Treasurer and
first shall be applied to the payment of the expenses of issuing, selling, and delivering the
bonds, unless funds for this purpose are otherwise provided, and then shall be credited on
the books of the Comptroller and expended, on approval by the Board of Public Works, for
the following public purposes, including any applicable architects’ and engineers’ fees:
DE02.01 BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS
JUDICIARY/MULTISERVICE CENTERS
(Anne Arundel County)
(A) New Supreme Court of Maryland Building. Provide funds to
complete construction of a new Supreme Court of Maryland
Building in Annapolis .................................................................. 26,346,000
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
ML10 CLIFTON T. PERKINS HOSPITAL CENTER
(Howard County)
(A) Renovation of Clifton T. Perkins Hospital North Wing. Provide
– 198 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
funds to complete construction of renovations to the North
Wing of Clifton T. Perkins Hospital Center and an addition to
the hospital ................................................................................. 4,766,000
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL
SERVICES
QR02.03 ROXBURY CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION
(Washington County)
(A) RCI Perimeter Fence System Replacement. Provide funds to
complete construction of the replacement perimeter fencing
and security systems at Roxbury Correctional Institution ........ 2,133,000
RC00 BALTIMORE CITY COMMUNITY COLLEGE
(Baltimore City)
(A) Learning Commons Renovation and Addition. Provide funds to
complete construction of the renovation and expansion of the
Bard Library to create a Learning Commons building .............. 3,984,000
RE01 MARYLAND SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF
(Frederick County)
(A) New Student Residences. Provide funds to continue
construction of a new high school boys’ residence, high school
girls’ residence, flexible residence, satellite health center,
student center, and central offices at the Maryland School for
the Deaf in Frederick, provided that notwithstanding Section 6
of this Act, work may continue on this project prior to the
appropriation of all funds necessary to complete this project ... 40,206,000
RI00 MARYLAND HIGHER EDUCATION COMMISSION
(A) Community College Construction Grant Program. Provide
funds to assist the subdivisions in the acquisition of property
and in the design, construction, renovation, and equipping of
local and regional community college buildings, site
improvements, and facilities. The funds appropriated for this
purpose shall be administered in accordance with § 11–105(j)
of the Education Article, provided that notwithstanding Section
6 of this Act, work may continue on each of these projects prior
to the appropriation of all funds necessary to complete the
project .......................................................................................... 68,515,000
(1) Chesapeake College – New Queen
– 199 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Anne’s Technical Building (Queen
Anne’s County) ................................. 8,223,000
(2) Community College of Baltimore
County – Catonsville – Student
Services Center Renovation and
Expansion (Baltimore County) ....... 1,926,000
(3) Community College of Baltimore
County – Essex – Primary
Switchgear and Distribution
Replacement (Baltimore County) .... 2,571,000
(4) Montgomery College – New
Germantown Student Services
Center (Montgomery County) ......... 32,408,000
(5) Prince George’s Community College
– New Charlene Mickens Dukes
Student Center (Prince George’s
County) ............................................. 23,387,000
RM00 MORGAN STATE UNIVERSITY
(Baltimore City)
(A) Campuswide Electric Infrastructure Upgrades. Provide funds
to continue construction of a new electrical substation,
substation upgrades, and related electrical infrastructure
components at Morgan State University, provided that
notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue on
this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary to
complete this project .................................................................... 13,039,000
(B) New Science Center, Phase II. Provide funds to complete
construction of the New Science Center ...................................... 55,551,000
WA01 DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE
(Prince George’s County)
(A) Barrack L – Forestville: New Barrack and Garage. Provide
funds to complete construction of a replacement barrack and
garage in Forestville ..................................................................... 884,000
(4) An annual tax is imposed on all assessable property in the State in rate and
amount sufficient to pay the principal of and interest on the bonds, as and when due and
until paid in full. The principal shall be discharged within 15 years after the date of issue
– 200 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
of the bonds.
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
(A) White Oak Redevelopment. Provide a grant to Montgomery
County, Maryland for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of infrastructure
improvements in White Oak (Montgomery County) .................... 15,000,000
SECTION 15. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan Preauthorization Act of 2029 in the total principal amount
of $36,349,000. These loans shall be evidenced by the issuance, sale, and delivery of State
general obligation bonds authorized by a resolution of the Board of Public Works and
issued, sold, and delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article.
(2) The bonds to evidence these loans or installments of these loans may be sold
as a single issue or may be consolidated and sold as part of a single issue of bonds under §
8–122 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(3) The cash proceeds of the sale of the bonds shall be paid to the Treasurer and
first shall be applied to the payment of the expenses of issuing, selling, and delivering the
bonds, unless funds for this purpose are otherwise provided, and then shall be credited on
the books of the Comptroller and expended, on approval by the Board of Public Works, for
the following public purposes, including any applicable architects’ and engineers’ fees:
RE01 MARYLAND SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF
(Frederick County)
(A) New Student Residences. Provide funds to complete
construction of a new high school boys’ residence, high school
girls’ residence, flexible residence, satellite health center,
student center, and central offices at the Maryland School for
the Deaf in Frederick .................................................................. 8,650,000
RI00 MARYLAND HIGHER EDUCATION COMMISSION
(A) Community College Construction Grant Program. Provide
funds to assist the subdivisions in the acquisition of property
and in the design, construction, renovation, and equipping of
local and regional community college buildings, site
improvements, and facilities. The funds appropriated for this
– 201 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
purpose shall be administered in accordance with § 11–105(j)
of the Education Article ............................................................... 25,781,000
(1) Community College of Baltimore
County – Catonsville – Student
Services Center Renovation and
Expansion (Baltimore County) ........ 8,271,000
(2) Montgomery College – New
Germantown Student Services
Center (Montgomery County) .......... 17,510,000
RM00 MORGAN STATE UNIVERSITY
(Baltimore City)
(A) Campuswide Electric Infrastructure Upgrades. Provide funds
to complete construction of a new electrical substation,
substation upgrades, and related electrical infrastructure
components at Morgan State University .................................... 1,918,000
(4) An annual tax is imposed on all assessable property in the State in rate and
amount sufficient to pay the principal of and interest on the bonds, as and when due and
until paid in full. The principal shall be discharged within 15 years after the date of issue
of the bonds.
SECTION 16. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
7–305.
(a) (1) In this section[, “capital] THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(2) “CAPITAL expenditure” includes an expenditure for:
[(1)] (I) acquisition of land, buildings, or equipment; or
[(2)] (II) new construction.
(3) “MISCELLANEOUS CAPITAL GRANT” MEANS A GRANT FOR A
CAPITAL PROJECT FOR AN ENTITY THAT IS NOT A UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT
– 202 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
FUNDED IN THE ANNUAL STATE OPERATING BUDGET WITHIN THE DEPARTMENT OF
GENERAL SERVICES.
(b) At the end of a fiscal year, the unspent part of an appropriation for a capital
expenditure made through the State budget or a supplementary appropriation act other than
an enabling act for a general obligation loan:
(1) does not revert to the General Fund; and
(2) with the approval of the Board of Public Works, may be carried in a
capital account until it is spent in accordance with subsection (c) of this section or until the
authority to spend the appropriation for a project terminates.
(c) Money carried in a capital account under subsection (b) of this section may be
spent only for a capital purpose.
(d) Unless otherwise provided by law, the authority to spend the appropriation for
a project terminates:
(1) [2 years after the effective date of the appropriation act that authorizes
the project, if:
(i) evidence that a required matching fund will be provided has not
been presented to the Board; or
(ii) no part of the project is under contract and the Board has not
encumbered money for any part of the project;
(2)] 1 year after the latest of abandonment, completion, or acceptance of the
project; or
[(3)] (2) except to the extent the Board has encumbered money for a State
project or program authorized by an appropriation act, 7 years after the effective date of the
appropriation act that authorized the project unless:
(i) the appropriation act provides otherwise; or
(ii) in an emergency, the Board unanimously grants a temporary
exception for 1 year.
(E) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES TO A MISCELLANEOUS CAPITAL GRANT
3 YEARS OR MORE AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THE APPROPRIATION ACT THAT
AUTHORIZED THE GRANT.
– 203 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1 EACH YEAR, THE DEPARTMENT OF
GENERAL SERVICES SHALL SUBMIT TO THE LEGISLATIVE POLICY COMMITTEE, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, A REPORT
THAT IDENTIFIES EACH GRANT FOR WHICH:
(I) NO PART OF THE GRANT IS UNDER CONTRACT APPROVED BY
THE BOARD; AND
(II) THE BOARD HAS NOT ENCUMBERED MONEY FOR ANY PART
OF THE GRANT.
8–128.
(a) [If, within 2 years after the date of an authorization of State debt, evidence that
a required matching fund will be provided has not been presented to the Board or no part of
the project or program for which the enabling act authorized the State debt is under contract
and the Board has not encumbered money for any part of the project or program, the
authorization terminates unless:
(1) the enabling act provides otherwise; or
(2) in an emergency, the Board unanimously grants a temporary exception
for a period of 1 year] IN THIS SECTION, “MISCELLANEOUS CAPITAL GRANT” MEANS A
GRANT FOR A CAPITAL PROJECT FOR AN ENTITY THAT IS NOT A UNIT OF STATE
GOVERNMENT FUNDED IN THE ANNUAL STATE CAPITAL BUDGET AS PART OF:
(I) THE MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS;
(II) THE LOCAL HOUSE OF DELEGATES INITIATIVES; OR
(III) THE LOCAL SENATE INITIATIVES.
(b) Unless otherwise provided in an enabling act, an authorization of State debt
for a project or program shall terminate no later than 1 year after the abandonment,
completion, or acceptance of the project or program, as determined by the Board.
(c) Except to the extent that money authorized by an enabling act for a State project
or program has been encumbered by the Board, an authorization of State debt shall
automatically terminate 7 years after the date of the authorization, unless:
(1) the enabling act provides otherwise; [or]
– 204 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
(2) in an emergency, the Board unanimously grants a temporary exception
for 1 year; OR
(3) THE AUTHORIZATION IS FOR A PROGRAM THAT:
(I) IS ADMINISTERED BY A UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT WHICH
RECEIVES FUNDS THAT ARE DISTRIBUTED BY THE UNIT TO INDIVIDUAL PROJECTS;
AND
(II) RECEIVES FUNDS THAT MAY BE REALLOCATED BY THE UNIT
BETWEEN PROJECTS WITHOUT REQUIRING A BUDGET AMENDMENT OR AN ACT OF
THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
(D) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES TO A MISCELLANEOUS CAPITAL GRANT
3 YEARS OR MORE AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THE ENABLING ACT THAT
AUTHORIZED THE GRANT.
(2) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1 EACH YEAR, THE DEPARTMENT OF
GENERAL SERVICES SHALL SUBMIT TO THE LEGISLATIVE POLICY COMMITTEE, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, A REPORT
THAT IDENTIFIES EACH GRANT FOR WHICH:
(I) NO PART OF THE GRANT IS UNDER CONTRACT APPROVED BY
THE BOARD; AND
(II) THE BOARD HAS NOT ENCUMBERED MONEY FOR ANY PART
OF THE GRANT.
[(d)] (E) If [bonds have not been issued] AN AUTHORIZATION IS TERMINATED
IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION, the amount of any unissued bonds [from a]
SPECIFICALLY INTENDED FOR THE terminated authorization shall be canceled and be of
no further effect.
[(e)] (F) If AN AUTHORIZATION IS TERMINATED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS
SECTION AND bonds have been issued SPECIFICALLY TO FUND THE AUTHORIZATION,
the amount of any unspent bond proceeds [from a] ASSOCIATED WITH THE terminated
authorization shall be disposed of as provided in § 8–129 of this subtitle.
[(f)] (G) (1) The Board shall enforce the provisions of this section.
– 205 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) A failure to comply with or give effect to the provisions of this section
may not affect the validity or enforceability of State debt.
[(g)] (H) The Board shall submit for publication in the Maryland Register a
notice of any authorization of State debt that has been terminated or extended under this
section; the notice shall include the chapter number and year of enactment of the enabling
act and each amendment to the enabling act.
[(h)] (I) A termination or extension under this section may become effective only
after the publication of notice in the Maryland Register.
[(i)] (J) (1) The Treasurer, in consultation with the Comptroller, shall submit
a report on January 1 each year to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the
State Government Article, the General Assembly.
(2) The report shall list all projects or programs for which authorization
would be terminated in the upcoming year under the provisions in this section or § 7–305 of
this article.
8–129.
(a) [With] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, WITH
the approval of the Board, the Governor shall dispose of unspent BOND proceeds [of]
SPECIFICALLY ISSUED TO FUND an enabling act within 1 year after the termination of the
State debt authorization under § 8–128 of this subtitle.
(b) [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, THE
Governor shall:
(1) use the proceeds to reduce State debt authorizations, as provided in §
8–126(b) through (d) of this subtitle;
(2) allocate the proceeds to the Construction Contingency Fund, as provided
in § 3–609 of this article; or
(3) order the proceeds to be credited to the Annuity Bond Fund, to pay the
outstanding bonded indebtedness of the State.
(C) IF BONDS HAVE NOT BEEN ISSUED SPECIFICALLY TO FUND AN
AUTHORIZATION:
(1) THE PROVISIONS OF SUBSECTIONS (A) AND (B) OF THIS SECTION
DO NOT APPLY TO THE AUTHORIZATION; AND
– 206 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
(2) THE AMOUNT OF ANY UNISSUED BONDS FROM A TERMINATED
AUTHORIZATION SHALL BE CANCELED AND BE OF NO FURTHER EFFECT.
[(c)] (D) The Board shall enforce the provisions of this section.
SECTION 17. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That §§ 7–305(e) and 8–128(d) of
the State Finance and Procurement Article, as enacted by Section 16 of this Act, shall be
construed to apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect
on or application to any miscellaneous capital grants authorized before the effective date of
this Act.
SECTION 18. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the repeal of §§ 7–305(d)(1)
and 8–128(a) of the State Finance and Procurement Article, as enacted by Section 16 of this
Act, shall be construed to apply retroactively and shall be applied to and interpreted to affect
any prior appropriation act or enabling act that authorized State debt for capital projects or
programs.
SECTION 19. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the modification of §
8–128(c) of the State Finance and Procurement Article, as enacted by Section 16 of this Act,
shall be construed to apply retroactively and shall be applied to and interpreted to affect any
prior appropriation act or enabling act that authorized State debt for capital projects or
programs.
SECTION 16. 20. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the net new debt to be
authorized by this Act may not exceed $1,750,000,000 as evidenced by the following:
Debt to be authorized by this Act ...................................... 1,824,782,000
1,758,261,906
1,839,940,406
1,847,099,000
Subtotal .............................................................................. 1,824,782,000
1,758,261,906
1,839,940,406
1,847,099,000
Reductions in previously authorized State Debt made in this
bill ........................................................................................ 74,782,000
86,732,000
91,564,000
97,099,000
New debt to be authorized by this Act ............................... 1,750,000,000
1,671,529,906
– 207 –

Ch. 5 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
1,748,376,406
1,750,000,000
Bond premium proceeds authorized by this Act .......................5,000,000
Total authorizations and bond premium proceeds authorized
by this Act .......................................................................... 1,829,782,000
1,763,261,906
1,844,940,406
1,852,099,000
SECTION 17. 21. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Board of Public
Works may approve contracts and otherwise obligate funds authorized in this Act upon the
effective date of the relevant section of this Act.
SECTION 18. 22. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 13 of this Act
shall take effect June 1, 2027.
SECTION 19. 23. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 14 of this Act
shall take effect June 1, 2028.
SECTION 20. 24. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 15 of this Act
shall take effect June 1, 2029.
SECTION 21. 25. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in
Sections 18, 19, and 20 22, 23, and 24 of this Act, this Act shall take effect June 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 8, 2026.
– 208 –